Well of course I read the previous reviews regarding amazon shipping the grey-market version of this timer and figured that certainly by now they were shipping a US version... wrong!I just received mine today and it's got the international warranty card and users manual. I haven't decided if I'm going to return it or not but figured that anyone else considering ordering this item should be advised that it appears that amazon is only shipping the grey-market version of this unit</review_text>
Bought these for my Nikon D200 about 3 months ago. Never having used Tiffen before I took a chance on a recommendation. Vignetting can be an issue for polarizing filters and the vignetting on this one is the worse I've seen. Build quality of all the filters is really not very good. Going to go back to Hoya's which are much better</review_text>
Im not from USA. My brother bought me the camara in a trip three months ago and it is not working!! It has serious conection problems in the body that I cant fix in my country. I lost 1000 US</review_text>
I received the remote this evening and have not been able to get the remote to work with my Canon Rebel XT Camera.  Followed the directions that were furnished with the remote to no avail.  It appears that this remote is defective</review_text>
I am not impressed with Tiffen filters I got in this set.  The finish of the rings are poor.  Despite of previously poor reputaion, I recently purchased some 67mm Quantaray filter from the local Ritz Camera store which are of much better quality compared to this set of Tiffen filters.  I never got Tiffens before, had good experience with Hoyas.  I will probably stay with those from now on.  Now come to think of it, Ritz camera indicated the Quantaray they had were made by Hoya.The glass on all the filters are quite a bit more reflective compared to the Hoyas and the Quantarays.  Not a good sign.The circular polarizer had some smudges and some lense swirl that after 10 sheets of lense tissue and quite a bit of cleaning solution failed to be fully cleared off.  Quite frustrating.  All of the filters came with lint and a few little smudges on them, not sure if the store handling or the manufacturer handling was to blame, but none of the other filters I got before had this kind of problem right out of the box.The set might be cheap, but it sure is for a good reason</review_text>
This bag is very small. My Canon 20D fits nicely with a small lens, but you cannot fit more than one lens with the camera body. We kept the bag for informal use when we only need the body and one lens to avoid always having to carry a bulky bag</review_text>
The bag is suppose to hold two cameras,I have a rebel and two lens and cant fit them in with lens filters and extra batteries. I recomend you buy a bigger bag it does not meet the billing here. might be good for a couple of point and shoot cameras but not SL</review_text>
I was all set to purchase this bag but wanted to try it out first.  I had great difficulty finding one locally but finally after many many phone calls I located one bag and asked the merchant to hold it till I could get there to try it out.  Firstly, the bag is nice but doesn't hold as much as I thought.  It still could have worked for my but for one thing: this bag is not designed for those with a, er.....womanly build.  It was the most uncomfortable bag I have ever tried out and looked absolutely ridiculous on me.  So glad I was able to take it for a test drive before purchasing online.  Just a word of warning to the ladies;-</review_text>
I paid extra for Air Next Day service.  Item was advertised as available and ready to ship immediately.  Item eventually arrived two weeks later.  I had left for a trip.  Item was eventually sent back to merchant.  Merchant didn't credit me for item returned.  I had to email merchant and wait for another 2 weeks before item was credited.  I won't buy from Willoughby's again</review_text>
They sent me wrong lens cover and said I ordered the wrong one..........don't think so since I got copy.......poor customer service all around.....</review_text>
I have gotten better results with Sterlingtek batteries for a fraction of the price...like less the $15 shipped</review_text>
When I received the camera I thought of giving it a 5 star because the good looking and nice picture.After 6 months use, I wish I could give it a 0 star. It's true it looks good but it's very hard to hold the camera. It droped twice when i took pictures. Also the lens is too small. The dirt is very easy to get onto the lens and very hard to clean b/c it's small. Thanks the dirty lens, the picture quality is worse than ever.The battery is very small too. After 6 months use, it can not hold enought power to shoot 10 pictures!They have to put the buttons here and there to fit the small space. It's not a user friendly camera.</review_text>
I bought this monopod about 3 weeks ago after reading the reviews here. I'm not sure if I got a defective unit but I've had these problems from the gitgo:-I noticed the 2 lower sections will not open and close smoothly, they would get stuck about 2-3 inches from the lock and you'd need force to expand/retract them. Very interestingly, if the section right above the one I'm trying to expand/retract is unlocked then the operation is smooth and flawless!-The ballhead does not support my Nikon D80 and lightest lens (18-55mm) a less than 2 lbs combo, which is much lighter than the 4.4 lbs weight limit indicated in the specs. The camera just slumps in one direction or another regardless of how hard I try to make sure the ballhead is locked tightly.Again, it might have been a defective unit, but I thought I'd point my observations out anyway. I wanted to buy this from Amazon, it wasn't in stock, it was sitting in my shopping cart and when it became available Amazon bumped the price to $40+, so I went elsewhere and got it for $30.</review_text>
Polarizing filters are used to eliminate glare on non-metallic surfaces like glass or water. They can also be used to increase the contrast and color saturation of your image. I use my polarizer not only to eliminate glare, but also to make skies a nice shade of blue or to get some "pop" out of clouds.There are so many options to consider when purchasing the Polarizing filter for your needs. For instance, linear vs. circular, film or digital versions, or quality vs. price.If you are making use of a TTL or auto-focusing system, Circular Polarizers are designed to work with those features. Linear Polarizers has their uses, but they are manufactured differently and may not work. Unless you are certain, just get a Circular Polarizing filter.There are some digital circular polarizers on the market. I am not sure what makes a cir-pl lens better for digital as opposed to film. I use a Canon 20D Digital SLR and see no problems caused by using a supposed non-digital filter on a digital camera.Most of the time, when it comes to filters; you get what you pay for. Does that mean you need an expensive polarizer? Of course not, just be sure to get the right filter for your needs.  What ever polarizing filter you get, make sure it is color neutral to prevent unwanted tinting.  Spending more on a color balanced filter will save time in post.  If you need multiple filter sizes, consider saving money by using step down rings.Currently I use the Hoya Pro1 filters, as the Canon polarizing filters I previously owned were without question bulkier and heavier. The weight might not seem like much, but when you stick all your items in a backpack all the extra bits of weight add up quickly.  I can spend a good amount of time with my equipment on my back so this is a big concern for me.  When it came down to the images, at times I would see a browning tint on my photos. The tint is easy to clean up in Photoshop CS2, but I don't see that problem with the Hoya Pro1 filter.Overall, I would recommend against the Canon polarizing filters.  I originally thought, "it is Canon, it must be quality."  Since then I have replaced all my Canon filters.  This filter works, but comes at a cost of disadvantages to other similarly priced filters.PROS:Can be used for film or digital camerasEliminates internal reflections and ghostingCONS:Bulky and heavyNot neutral color balance</review_text>
As a professional photographer, I find myself going through 5-6 of these cords each year. My equipment is my livelyhood and although  it is used often, I am exceptionally careful with all of my gear and do not bang it around or abuse it.  I use a stroboframe which makes it necessary to use this cord to raise the flash well above the focal plane of the camera.  These cords are very expensive to get just a few months out of them.  Eventually, the hot shoe connector will either become loose and the connection will no longer function or the plastic connector will break and your flash unit will fall to the ground. (This has happened twice to me and fortunately I was able to catch the flash unit!)The cord is indespensible if you need it, but contact Canon USA and ask them to reengineer this cord or expect to replace them every few months</review_text>
I am on my third off-camera cord (about one per year).  Two have broken.  As other reviewers noted, the four screws under the metal retaining clip on the "female" end of the cord loosen and eventually fail.I have found that a thin narrow knife can be used to remove the black "spring" cover over the screws on the shoe.  You can then tighten the screws with a screwdriver.  If you use Locktite on the screws then they will not loosen.  Canon should do this at the factory.I use this cord with a Stroboframe "portrait/landscape" grip which raises the flash over the camera by six inches thus eliminating red eye and providing a much more pleasing light.  The stroboframe grip comes with the right size threaded screw for this cord.When my cords failed I lost the extended-through the lens metering just like another reviewer noted.I am not a professional photographer and only use the camera occasionally yet the cord still fails.  Canon should re-engineer this cord to make it more durable.Unfortunately, I do not believe that there are alternative cords. It looks like I will need to keep buying Canon cords</review_text>
I have been using this cord for about a year, and I had problems with its durability.  It actually worked fine for a for the first 5 months, but then it started to fall apart.  When mounted on the hotshoe of my flash bracket, the thin plastic shoe (where the flash is attached to) developed a crack and eventually broke off, making it useless to mount the flash.  I had to buy a replacement part from Canon (who charged me $16 for this small plastic piece).  I flipped the flash carefully from then on, but then it still cracked!!  I wrote to Canon and asked them to reinforce the bottom maybe made of metal instead of thin plastic. So far, there is no response.  A few months later, the cord, for some unknown reason, makes my 550ex flash switch from the ETTL to TTL mode, and making the flash fire at full power, overexposing  the entire image.  I checked the flash by putting it directly on the camera's hotshoe, and the flash worked fine, switching back to the ETTL mode.  For a piece of equipment from Canon, it's hard to imagine it giving so many problems. It's like they only paid tons more attention to their cameras than their accessories.  As there are no other OEM manufacturers of this cord, I am forced to get another one and hope for the best.</review_text>
Beware of  assuming that  the UV filter recommended by Amazon for a particular camera with a fixed lense size that I purchased is the correct  size.  It wasn't even close.  No size was given for the lense diameter. I returned the filter for a full refund minus my shipping & all the hassel of  packaging it</review_text>
I agree with the previous review.  The deluxe blower brush just left more dirt in the camera because the hair of the brush is falling out</review_text>
This kit is just junk. The &quot;deluxe blower brush&quot; is a cheap plastic blower in the tiniest size. There is a &quot;tweezers&quot; that is just folded aluminum sheet metal - there's no way that is getting anywhere near my cameras. There are a few sheets of lense tissue and a few swabs to use with the cleaning solution. The &quot;lintless cleaning cloth&quot; is an about 3&quot; x 5&quot; piece of something akin to reusable paper towels that you'll use about three times and then throw away. This kit is not worth buying at any price, because it's not worth the shipping charges</review_text>
Polarizing filters are used to eliminate glare on non-metallic surfaces like glass or water. They can also be used to increase the contrast and color saturation of your image. I use my polarizer not only to eliminate glare, but also to make skies a nice shade of blue or to get some "pop" out of clouds.There are so many options to consider when purchasing the Polarizing filter for your needs. For instance, linear vs. circular, film or digital versions, or quality vs. price.If you are making use of a TTL or auto-focusing system, Circular Polarizers are designed to work with those features. Linear Polarizers has their uses, but they are manufactured differently and may not work. Unless you are certain, just get a Circular Polarizing filter.There are some digital circular polarizers on the market. I am not sure what makes a cir-pl lens better for digital as opposed to film. I use a Canon 20D Digital SLR and see no problems caused by using a supposed non-digital filter on a digital camera.Most of the time, when it comes to filters; you get what you pay for. Does that mean you need an expensive polarizer? Of course not, just be sure to get the right filter for your needs.  What ever polarizing filter you get, make sure it is color neutral to prevent unwanted tinting.  Spending more on a color balanced filter will save time in post.  If you need multiple filter sizes, consider saving money by using step down rings.Currently I use the Hoya Pro1 filters, as the Canon polarizing filters I previously owned were without question bulkier and heavier. The weight might not seem like much, but when you stick all your items in a backpack all the extra bits of weight add up quickly.  I can spend a good amount of time with my equipment on my back so this is a big concern for me.  When it came down to the images, at times I would see a browning tint on my photos. The tint is easy to clean up in Photoshop CS2, but I don't see that problem with the Hoya Pro1 filter.Overall, I would recommend against the Canon polarizing filters.  I originally thought, "it is Canon, it must be quality."  Since then I have replaced all my Canon filters.  This filter works, but comes at a cost of disadvantages to other similarly priced filters.PROS:Can be used for film or digital camerasEliminates internal reflections and ghostingCONS:Bulky and heavyNot neutral color balance</review_text>
I purchased this bag because I did not wnat to spend a ton of money on a case to protect my Canon Rebel EOS digital camera. I only have 2 lenses, but the bag is capable of holding the camera and 4 lenses as well as pockets for cables, batteries, etc. I think this is a great unit, for the beginner (like me) or the pro.</review_text>
For nearly $100, this adaptor provides very little (1.5X) magnification.  It is also a nuisance because you have to switch the camera settings every time you use the lens for it to function properly.  This is no big deal with the wide angle adaptor, which is used infrequently by me, but it is when you want to capture a fleeting image at a distance.  It is lightweight, but cumbersome and doesn't accept filters.  For real telephoto capabilities, get an SLR with interchangeable lenses.  I sent this product back.</review_text>
Description or product is wrong.  There is no quad independent power/charging indicators.  They are set up in banks of two.  One light for two charging bays. Batteries must be charged in banks of two.  Tried e-mailing Vidpro for additional info on this charger. E-mail came back as undeliverable.  Cannot find any reviews on the internet for this charger</review_text>
The documentation is terrible. Its going to take a lot of practice. If you're just going to stick it on top your camera its fine. However I want to use it off-camera to trigger 2 x SB600s.Just setting the D200 to fire a pre-flash that will trigger the SB800/Masster & SB600s it's a nightmare and its not covered in any detail, in the manual.The SB800 is designed for this purpose. So why not include information on how to do this?</review_text>
I bought this flash hoping to improve my indoor pictures with my Rebel XT.  Amazingly, I find absolutely no difference between using the built in flash of the camera or this unit.  I find pictures taken at a very reasonable distance (8-10 feet) to be under-exposed unless I correct the exposure using the menu.  Would be curious if the more expensive units including the 430EX are better, but I cannot recommend this one</review_text>
I was expecting much more from this flash, I already started looking for the better one. If I knew this was a closeout item I'd never buy it. It died on me with no indication, sent to canon fixed and returned with a big scratch on it. Now it does work but sometings wrong with recycle time even with brand new duracell batteries...Save money and buy 5XX series flash..</review_text>
At 300mm this lens is VERY soft, it's hard to get a shot that looks like it's in focus.  To do so, you need to shoot at about f/11, and then since there is little light available, you usually have to bump the ISO to 800 or 1600 just to get an acceptable shutter speed. Of course, the high ISO then introduces other artifacts.  The focus is also dead slow and often doesn't lock on.  This is a lens that I have constantly fought with.  Don't upgrade to the new 70-300 IS either, as it's only marginally better.Buy the 70-200 f/4L.  It's a far superior lens</review_text>
This camera worked very well until the lens got jammed in its extended position.  I sent the camera for warranty service (I had it less than 7 months), and they refused to honor the warranty because it was a bit scuffed and a little decorative ring on the end of the lens that had been attached with 2-sided tape had come off. They claimed this happened due to physical damage, but this occurred during normal use: I was just changing modes and the lens didn't retract. Don't bother trying to get warranty service unless the unit looks brand new.  Even then, don't be surprised if they renege on the warranty.I had another A410 that did the very same thing (lens got jammed), but was stolen in a break-in before I sent it out for service (so I suppose it was no loss after all).  Obviously there is a design flaw that causes the lens to extend too far and come off track inside.In short, this camera is not suitable for frequent use in the field. If you buy it, and plan to use it a lot, expect to be buying another camera or paying for a repair that should be covered under warranty (which I'm not doing) soon.</review_text>
This camera is incredibly frustrating.  I must admit that under ideal lighting conditions outdoors on a moderate to fully sunny day, the camera takes wonderful pictures.  However, photos using indooor and mixed lighting conditions leave alot to be desired.  If you want to take any indoor pictures with natural light, this is not the camera for you.  The reason being is that if the flash is not activated or the lighting is not perfect, the camera slows down the shutter speed considerably.  Since the camera does not have very good image stabilization (if any) indoor pictures are blurry unless you have the hands of a surgeon.  Of course you can use the flash, but then your subject will be overlit, while the background is pitch dark.  And forget about taking long range pictures indoors (i.e. at a graduation ceremony or wedding) because if the flash is on, you will get a black picture because the camera does not compensate the shutter speed for distance, it only adjusts to whether or not it thinks the flash is on.  If it is off, your picture will be blurred because the shutter stays open for 1-2 seconds.  Since I take alot of indoor pictures, this camera is worthless to me.  If you only plan to take outdoor pictures in ideal light, this is the camera for you.  If you want to do any natural light photography, forget it.</review_text>
I bought this lens for my Canon 30D after reading every professional review I could find.  I knew going in that this lens wasn't perfect but, was supposed to be better than the 18-55 kit lens.  I liked the range that it provided and the image stabilization.  I shot pictures with this lens and was extremely dissapointed.  The pictures were not sharp at all and the colors were dull.  I thought it might have been my new camera at first because I couldn't imagine the quality would be this bad.  I ruled this out after I used my Canon 28-105 lens I had for my Canon film SLR and the results were much better.  For the digital focal length though, my old lens wouldn't suffice because of the 1.6x focal factor.Later, I decided on the Tamron 17-50/2.8 after reading reviews.  The salesperson at the professional camera store guessed that my pictures were very soft when I told him I had this Canon lens.  He said, "let me guess, you'd like to try the Tamron 17-50/2.8."  He said that this was the very best lens to buy in the price range and to take it home and try it. I could return it with no questions asked if I wasn't satisfied.  He also said that he hadn't had one person return it yet.My first images with this lens were great.  They were SHARP and had way more vibrant color.  There is absolutely no comparison at all.  I was hesitant to buy a third party lens but, my fears were instantly eliminated after seeing the results.  This is the first review I have ever posted on Amazon.  I was so dissapointed that I wanted to help others not make the same mistake.  After spending $$$ on a digital SLR, it would be a waste not to get great pictures with it because of the lens.  Before taking a chance on buying the Canon, do yourself a BIG favor and try the Canon and Tamron at a local store.</review_text>
I do video work and was attracted to the sale price and extra height of this particular tripod.  Come to find out, this model does not have a fluid head, meaning, if you do any panning with a camcorder, it won't be as smooth as you'd probably like it to be.  Also, at the end of a pan the head tends to "unwind," causing your panned image to back up a little ways.  Thus, I think it's rather misleading to label this as a "Photo / Video" tripod.Additionally, I don't really care for the cheap feel of some of the plastic knobs and adjusters.  Finally, mine came with a few, very minor cosmetic blemishes, almost as if it were used.Instead of video, I'll be utilizing this one as a microphone mount.If you want to do video, please buy a tripod with a fluid head.  You'll love it, I guarantee that.That's why I give this one 2 stars</review_text>
Looks nice. Unfortunately did not power up the camera, so I can't say much else. Going to cost me return shipping at the very least. Sorry I didn't buy the Canon product instead</review_text>
Im not from USA. My brother bought me the camara in a trip three months ago and it is not working!! It has serious conection problems in the body that I cant fix in my country. I lost 1000 US</review_text>
I purchased this camera in August 2006 and have sent it out for repair 4 times already for the same problem and it is November 2006. Kodak just keeps telling me to send it to get repaired. Is that right?It takes great pictures but when you try to download them to your computer it works the first time. You try to do it a second time and it freezes and gives you a cannot read device message. I have two kids and the most important thing is to send picture emails to all the relatives across the globe on their updated lives. I now have to go to my local photo place to get a CD and prints made and then download them into my EasyShare software. Oh, shouldn't it be easier after spending that much money on a camera.Also, I had to purchase a dock adapter for my printer dock. When I put the camera on the dock, it doesn't charge the battery or print pictures, the screen just goes grey.This camera has had its main board and firmware repaired and replaced every time that it has come back to me. The cost of shipping, CD's and prints has just added to the headache this camera has given me.Kodak has not been helpful at all and they inform me the only form of communication of through email. What are they afraid of, they need to face the problem and satisfy their customers.Do not purchase this camera, it is a great if you just never want to get them out of the camera</review_text>
I only wish I could return this camera. Its automatic focus does not work well in photographing landscape scenes and plants (what I do most) and its manual focus is difficult (very difficult) to use. My much cheaper, and lower resolution, old Minolta does a much better job in low light conditions. I find I have to delete half my photographs due to bad focus. In addition, photo files take 5 to 6 seconds to save to my so-called high-speed memory card.Don't buy this camera</review_text>
This item is either not coated or has a single coating and thus any time sun hits the filter, it produces flare in the picture.  Furthermore, after doing more research it turns out that these uncoated or single coated filters can cause up to 9% light loss vs multi-coated filters like Hoya S-HMC or B+W MRC filters.  As for polarizer effect itself, I think it's amazing and you owe it to yourself to at least try it on a nice sunny day. (the sky and foliage will look completely different and alive</review_text>
To customer before me, you camera D200 might be on recall. Please check the Nikon website for more info. You have described the exact recall problem. Good luck! BTW, have you tried or someone tried this battery on a D70? I am thinking to consolidate and have all greys batteries rather than black for the D70 and grays from the D200.</review_text>
Amazon's aggressive marketing tacticts now include shipping you goods when you called them to cancel it. I will never buy from Amazon again. I bought over 100 items over 5 years. I purchased the camera on a 1 day delivery plan. They then just ship 4-5 day completely insensitive to a photographer's needs. I cancelled order 2 days before it ships, they say sorry we cannot cancel. 2 days??? come-on. I guess the $3000 just creates nice interest.The end for me and amazon, I do not like this kind of "aggressive marketing".Good advice, Rather buy direct from B&H Photo, pay double if you like, but you will get what you pay for there, not aggressive marketing and shoving of a product down your throat at their terms.I am truly annoyed. Run, hide.</review_text>
I bought this lens based on the super telephoto ability and low cost. You truly get what you pay for, and this thing isn't worth a plug nickel. I took a few shots on a tripod and could not believe how terrible this lens was @ 300mm (480mm on a Digital Rebel XT). Incredibly soft. Even stopped down, I would never want to make an enlargement from it. Stay away. Don't believe the fools who are novices, you will be disappointed with this lens. You're much better off to buy the older & used 100-300mm 5.6 (the L version costs more too) but both are so much better than this junker. You're even more crazy if you think you can take decent photo's with this lens handheld. Having switched from Nikon when switching to digital, I almost judged Canon from this one lens, which I'm glad I didn't. Don't waste your money or learn the hard way like I did. This lens also had terrible purple fringing, almost as bad as the kit 18-55mm. After extensive research and testing I now own and am happy with the following Canon lenses:Canon 10-22mmCanon 28-105mm (3.5 version)Canon 100-300mm (5.6 non-L version) I will sell for the L version when I can afford it.The kit 18-55mm makes usable shots, but when I could afford it, I sold it too.You will get better results buying a Rebel XT and an older 100-300mm than you would with a brand new XTI and this terrible 75-300mm lens.</review_text>
The minute I took the monopod out of cover it broke. The mounting head fell apart from the leg. The glue they use is very bad. I didn't return the product because I think the replacement would be the same quality and it was not worth the affords. I just fixed it myself</review_text>
"You get what you pay for"Most of the time that cliche is true, but there are products out there that break this rule.  The Philips DVP642 is one of them, a great quality, versatile product selling at a bargain price.  This is not.I was hoping the same of this product from all the "glowing" reviews on here.  However, this quality of this monopod is very disappointing.  First of all, you have to ask yourself, why do you need a monopod over a tripod?  For myself and most, it's because we need some stability and portability for our telephoto zoom lenses.    However, telephoto zooms are long and heavy so the monopod should be designed strong and solid to live up to the task.  This monopod doesn't even come close.Here are it's bad points:-The aluminum construction is very cheap quality.  The leg segments wobble laterally when you extend and close them.  It feels like thin, cheap aluminum and the monopod feels it could break in half like a toothpick at any time.-The head is very cheap and not solid.  No matter how tight I tightened the head, my camera would slope down.  The workmanship of the head is so cheap that at any point, you think that you're going to break the PLASTIC tightening screw if you tighten it too much.  I think we've all experienced that in the past.-The leg locks are not tight.  When you push down on the monopod, the leg segments slide back into themselves.In the end, it was a risk I took hoping that I could get a high-quality product for a cheap price.  Sometimes, you can get away with that.  Walmart sells a very decent functioning tripod for only $30.  In this case, I should've bought a REAL monopod.  Oh well, I wasted $16 that I could've used to help pay for a higher quality monopod</review_text>
Last march (2002) i bought this camera and it was wonderful, although it was "refurbished" by CANON it worked perfectly. I bought also a new battery and a 48MB Compactflash memory card and everything was working fine. 6 months later the camera had electrical problems and warranty had expired. Now the cost to fix this problem is far bigger than to buy a new camera because warranty period for "refurbished" items is less than 6 months</review_text>
I was deeply dissapointed in this lens hood.  Given that the cost is about 10% of the cost of the lens for which it was intended (the 70-300 IS in this case) I expected it to be of stiff durable polycarbonate.-Positives-fulfills the basic function of a lens hood- prevents flare, etc.The bayonet locking system is excellent, much easier to deal with than scew-on type lens hoods.that's about it.-Negatives-The polycarbonate is so thin I half expect it to be translucent.The hood must be gripped by the base to remove it, as grippng the thin end of the hood may break it; or at least it feels like it may break it.Its very long.  Especially on the 70-300 which is already a long lens, this makes a fully extended zoom about a foot long.  That's pretty conspicuous.It's very overpriced vs. generic lenses ($50 vs. $5-10 for rubber or metal).I traded it in and went with a kalt rubber lens hood.  2 stars for the great bayonet design, but the rest of it is weak</review_text>
Canon's 28-135mm with IS (Image Stabilizer) is a far better choice for the money</review_text>
Ok, I imagine if you forked over the $900 for this baby you would not want me telling you that you got a bad deal, but I am going to say it anyway.  This little baby is way over priced, not to mention you need a lot more than just this to make it work.  You need a wireless router!!  So rather than just complain, let me tell you what I want Canon to do about it and maybe we can start a revolution!With CF cards in the 12GB range it doesn't make sense that you would need this for capacity reasons (I know those of you with the biggest and brightes 16MP that shoot in JPEG & RAW on the highest settings just laughed at me), however where this item is worth it is if you want to immediately see your shots on a big screen or computer without having to take the shot, take out the card, etc.WHAT I WANT is a bluetooth compact flash card. They make these so I know it is possible.  I would like Canon to offer support for these compact flash cards so that I can immediately sync my bluetooth computer with my bluetooth camera.  Now that would make it so that when I am in the studio or shooting a wedding, I have the mobility 30 feet - 90 feet depending on card and I don't have to drag along a wireless router and I saved myself $700.  Get to it Canon - I am waiting!!!</review_text>
I got this for my S70. First off, in order to use it, you have to set the S70 to "radio control" (about 9 button pushes). Then you had better stay no further away than six feet or so (and only in *front* of the camera-the remote doesn't work from the rear!). Oh, and if you want to adjust your framing, forget it-the zoom is immobilized.If you need a "cable release," I strongly suggest simply using the self-timer built into the camera. It gives you 2-second and 10-second settings, and you're almost certain to have a steady tripod by that time.</review_text>
I have just bought the Sony Cybershot w100 camera little over a month ago and I have only taken 30-40 pictures, I loved it and then it just stopped working, so I recharged the baterry, no luck still the camera wouldn't turn off or on. So Thankfully I had bought a 2nd backup battery charged it and tried the camera again. No it doesn't work it only makes a slight ding sound and shuts off. Basically worthless. It seems like it might have short circuited. But I was so excitted to buy this camera I read all instructions before use, I haven't let anyone else use it and it hasn't been out of my sight, never been dropped, never in extreme hot or cold, always well protected. SO I am going to try to return it or exchange it. I am hoping to get good service or I will be really upset for spending so much money and research just to take 30-40 pictures. Hopefully I can let you know if they stand by their products. Before now I have always been happy with what I have bought from Amazo</review_text>
You got to have extremely steady hand, or camera stand to use this camaera.During my niece wedding, I put in a 2GB of memory and we were trigger happy, we must have took over couple hundred of pictures, however, I am very unhappy about the result. 3 out of 5 pictures are fuzzy, messy, out of focus.On the other hand, for the pictures that took a few mins to line up and with a very very steady hand, you got a great picture.Size is good, weight is a bit on the heavy side for the size, but to some people that's good quality</review_text>
Like another reviewer's, my experience has been mixed. I use this remote with the D50.Sometimes the remote works, then it goes on strike. Then suddenly it works again. Same distance and angle from the camera.I changed the battery - same result. I hardly use it anymore because it is so unreliable</review_text>
Image quality is pathetic.  It generates ludicrous amounts of noise even at the lowest ISO (80).Rest assured, you will be disappointed.  I returned mine within a day</review_text>
I purchased this set, and upon arrival, I found the circular polarizer to be defective.  Amazon quickly replaced the set, and this polarizer did not work either!  I returned the set, as I am not going to waste any more time trying to get a polarizer that works.  I'll pay more, and get a quality product from a different maker.  I will say that Amazon is second to nobody for customer service.  I appreciate that, and will continue to be an Amazon customer.  However, I can't say the same for Tiffen.</review_text>
I got it just today and used it for cleaning my lens. The solution might be useful, the blower is useful, the swabs can be useful with their pointed tips, but the so called "magic cloth" is anything but magic. It kept leaving lint on my lens</review_text>
The camera takes good pictures as long as you have a steady hand. Some pictures come out dark and some shadows on pictures.  Some pictures come out blurry - no stabalizer. This camera's randomly broke after about 1 year and I did not drop the camera (just like another reviewer).  I bought a Sony PDA and the same thing happened to that lcd - randomly broke - has a crack across the LCD. Of course, Sony said it was my fault and that I must have done something to it and refused to honor the warranty on that PDA - after 1 month? Since the camera was out of warranty, I knew there was nothing they were going to do. So if you want a DECENT camera with lousy customer service to support it - go for it! But if you want a great camera and a great company to support their products, look elsewhere. I used to be a great financial supporter of Sony products - monitors, computers, camcorder, memory sticks, etc. I am not buying anymore Sony products - I have lost the love for Sony and their products! Beware!Canon, here I come!</review_text>
I had my Sony DSC W70 for just one month when the viewing screen suddenly cracked without being dropped or hit. The glass itself was intact, but something underneath was clearly broken. Mailed it in to the factory service company for Sony, and I was informed 3 weeks later that it is not covered by warranty and will cost $181 to repair. This is 2/3 the cost of a new camera and does not make sense financially.I have a friend who had the same problem of a broken screen with the identical Sony camera.</review_text>
The camera worked fine; however, after six months, it stopped working.  I took it to a Pentax authorized repairer and Pentax refused to pay for the camera because the was dirt and grit in the zoom mechanism.  My use was in no way abusive.  I had a previous Canon Powershot S200 that lasted forever with the same usage, until I gave it away.  I guess I should have stayed with Canon.  I bought the Pentax for its size and lightweight, but what good is that if it doesn't last!  Don't get the Pentax and expect long term use out of it</review_text>
Yes, I have to agree with the previous review.  It doesn't seem to make any difference in reducing lens flare from light sources.  It doesn't seem to extend far enough to actually do anything.  If it was less expensive I wouldn't mind as much, and just chalk it up to extra protection.  But that seems to be all it's good for</review_text>
I bought it for my 18-55 EF-S, and it looks like it is not very efficient - but I guess it is normal for a 18mm (x 1.6). I would have prefered a "tulip" design like those of Sigma</review_text>
I bought this lens and was pretty excited about it, but I've been disappointed. Previous to this I bought the 50mm 1.8 for $70 and that lens completely puts this one to shame. I need a wider angle lens and went for this one, but all too often found myself quite disappointed with the results. Edges of subjects were all messy and just looked terrible, even at higher f stops. I shoot with a 20D.The USM is awesome though and will for sure be an option in whatever lens I choose to buy in place of this one. The focal range of 28-105 was also very nice, but to me the picture quality was not so good</review_text>
It takes around 3-4 seconds to take the picture after I click the button!!And then another 8-10 seconds just to store that picture on the SD card!!So basically, I cant take another picture until atleast 10-15 seconds of one picture!!</review_text>
Like most people I got this camera because it is quite compact for the quality of the image.  I've been pleased with the image quality when it works, but from the start it's felt flimsy and felt like it would die with any rough treatment.  Sure enough:* The shutter cover has often stuck open or shut.* Sometimes it refuses to start at all.* It sometimes powers on as you're putting it into your pocket, which opens the barrel which has got to damage the camera.* Finally, the LCD stopped working altogether.  This is after 8 months.Casio has decided I'm not under warranty (no explanation as to why, no phone number to argue with them), and is charging me $97 to repair it.Don't be seduced! It's a poor quality product</review_text>
Just for the record, my lens has frozen as many others have complained on this and earlier Casio models. Presently in Iraq, I do want to have a camera with me, but am not inclined to send it back in view of the reports of poor customer service. Sad. It looked to be a great camera</review_text>
I love Canon products and I have had a complete Canon system for about 10 years.   I love everything Canon does.  However I do not understand Canon's reasoning behind producing this lens.The reason for the EF-S lenses is offering wider angle by getting the rear elements of a lens closer to the "film" plane.  They cannot do this on film and full frame sensor cameras because the mirror is larger and would hit the rear elements of an EF-S lens.They have indicated, however, that by 35 mm that advantage is gone.   Why then do they produce a 60 mm Macro lens when they already have their macro requirements covered with they current three lenses?   I would guess that the short back focus makes the lens cheaper; but this lens is only $60 short of the excellent 100 f2.8 USM Macro.As I said, if for $60 I can get a lens that has 40 mm more reach (66 in 1.6crop cameras; useful in macro photography) and that works on ALL CANON CAMERAS, I'm not going to be thinking about this lens at all.Granted, you might not be thinking of buying a FF camera anytime soon, but Canon has indicated that eventually they will have FF on all their DSLR's, so why bother with this lens?The 17-85 or 10-22 are very reasonable offerings for the EF-S lineup, but the 60mm macro doesn't make any sense to me.my $0.0</review_text>
After reading the many good reviews here, I too bought the Lenmar battery to act as a second battery for my Canon digital camera.  I was totally pleased with the excellent performance as many others have noted.  The only difference I noticed between the Lenmar and OEM battery was that with lengthy continuous shooting with the LCD screen on the camera case got significantly hotter with the Lenmar battery that with the OEM.  This was not a problem until I was shooting on a 101 degree day (with the Lenmar battery in) and suddenly the screen went black.  I could view previously taken pictures (LCD OK) but any new photo I tried to take was black. I read later in the manual the upper operating temperature of the camera is 104 degrees.  Once the camera cooled it worked again for a while, but the black photo problem continued intermittenly for a few weeks then the camera completely stopped taking photos, no matter what.  So, was it the Lenmar battery's extra heat generation pushing the camera over its temperature limit and damaging the circuitry?  Would it have happened if the cooler running OEM battery was installed on the hot day?  I can't say for sure, but if you use a Lenmar battery I would be careful about operating it on a very hot 100 degree day (e.g. use the viewfinder, not the LCD since that generates heat, or turn the camera off a lot to cool down between shots).</review_text>
I have had this camera since Jan '05 and have so far taken approximately 10,000 shots while on trips and at weddings.Don't expect much from it and you will be happy. As an entry level DSLR it does what it's supposed to do in ideal conditions. I find it's strength is in taking people photographs in bright light, provided that they are not moving.Cons:In landscape photography this camera is lacking - both due to inadequate megapixels and it's inability to capture the natural blues and greens very well.Battery dies FAST. The battery I got with it hardly lasts a whole day of shooting, especially when shooting in RAW mode. I have yet to fill up a 1Gig card when shooting in RAW mode(Approx 150 shots) before the battery dies. Surprisingly when shooting jpegs, I get more shots per charge(Over 300) but hardly enough to last a day. I cannot tell you the number of times the battery has died on me while I was out on a hike. So I always carry a backup film camera (my trusty Elan 7).The viewfinder is very dim. When I look through my Elan 7 and then through the 300D, it is painfully obvious how dark the image is through the 300D's viewfinder. In indoor situations with low light this becomes a handicap, especially when having to resort to manual focus.Autofocus in low light for the 300d is terrible. When shooting indoors, the autofocus hunts and ends up focusing on something behind your intended subject. I have lots of beautiful photos of walls and sconces in the background in sharp focus while the people standing in front in the middle of the frame are an out of focus blur. This is despite having a 420Ex Flash on my camera that uses an infrared beam to assist with the focus.The 420EX flash is supposed to "talk" to the camera and adjust the power in order to ensure the subjects are not over or under exposed. However, with the 300d, this is a crap shoot at best and many of my indoor shots are over/under exposed.After about five months, the shutter button started sticking. I would click it and then it would remain depressed. The shutter button would only pop back up after I jiggled it a little.Another annoying thing about the camera is that the settings are displayed on the rear of the camera and not on the top beside the shutter button. And since there is only one thumbwheel, it is not easy to change aperature and shutter speed. For example, if you use the thumbwheel to change the aperature, then to change the shutter speed you would have to press another button while at the same time turning the thumbwheel. When you take thousands of shots over the life of the camera, this is a real annoyance.So would I recommend this camera:If you are a casual point and shoot person, it's an affordable entry into DSLRs that produces decent photos. But if you plan on shooting a lot indoors or want to take landscape photographs that can actually convey the colors accurately, look elsewhere</review_text>
Hey this is for everyone buying cameras over the world out of the united states, I have a problem with my camera and I don't have anyone to help, I've been trying some help in amazon's help area but they just have thousands of links but any simple email where I can ask for some help, I don't really understand why is this site so well known on &quot;customer service&quot;, but I just cannot communicate with no one in the company to ask anything, I'm just mad about this, if anyone can help me to contact amazon or fujifilm please post an email or whatever cause there's no such a thing like help in the &quot;help area&quot;. I need to repair my LCD monitor of my camera, it's really fragile, so if you're still thinking on buying in this site or even buying something from fujifilm, don't do it, they don't care about the customer satisfaction at all</review_text>
I received this filter and it had been used, seals were open and case that holds filters cracked, piece of plastic floating loose inside, smug marks on it. I was shocked, I order from amazon all the time and never had anything show up like this.</review_text>
When I opened the package, I found the filter box seals (one at each side) were broken, an indication that it was not new. I thought it's ok as long as the glass is clean and clear. When I opened the filter box, three pieces, the ring, the glass and the circular clamp, jumped out. While it's bad sign, I still thought it's ok as long as I could put them together. Well, the glass was not clear, as if it was sanded in the middle with a fine sand paper (I never saw any filter or lens in that shape  before!). Before to ship it back, I did try to put three pieces togather (so next person will not see these pieces jump out when open the box). Guess what, the circular clamp was about 2-3mm longer and two ends couldn't meet!!! I couldn't image any scenario under which this could happen, since it was from Amazon, not from some unknowns of eBay (actually, any eBayer will have to worry about the Feedback). I was really shocked that Amazon shipped that garbage to its customer!Hope this is just a random incident and Amazon does have a very easy return practice. Otherwise, I would not buy anything from Amazon</review_text>
I picked this up with a music order for my 350d - big mistake.  The class came chipped, scratched and smuged; Tiffen filters are of very poor quality.Do yourself a favor, like I did, and find your local camera supply store and pick up an optical grade filter for maybe, oh, 10 dollars more.  This Tiffen one was so bad that the scratches made their way onto some shots and ruined an entire day of shooting</review_text>
DO NOT buy the case Canon sells for this camera. It takes 20 seconds to take the camera out or put it in</review_text>
They tell you tha this product holds 6AA batteries, and works with the 20D's battery grip, but when I received the item it is for a completely different product and DOES NOT WORK with the 20D's BG-E2 grip.  It has the product name of CPM-E3, just as stated...but it accepts 8 AAA batteries and doesn't even come close to working with the BG-E2.</review_text>
I have known Canon to be a very high quality company. However, I was deeply shocked and disappointed to find that this camera fails to meet the expectations I had about this camera. A few years ago I bought the Fujiffilm 3800. I loved this camera but after a few ski trips I found it rather bulky. I then bought the Canon S500 becaus of its small size and after many good reviews about the S400. For most of the pictures I take on a ski trip this camera is fine. However, if you are taking pictures other than outdoors in the daytime, this camera is worse than a disposable camera. First, there is no red-eye reduction. It simply does not work when I set it to take flash with red-eye reduction. Second, pictures taken at dusk or dawn come out blurry. I would speculate that the shutter speed is way too slow and you would need a tripod. Third, night picture?....Forget about it. I tried to get a beatiful picture of the Chicago skyline but the picture was underexposed. So, I tried the manual mode and played with the exposure settings and I could not get a setting that would produce non-blurry pictures. Looks like I'll be back in the market for a Fujifilm. After all the reviews I've read, I'm waiting for the other shoe to drop (E18, LCD, etc.). Not to mention the terrible service that I have been reading about</review_text>
After just over a year, my lens jammed and the display read "e18".  So I was pretty upset to discover that this is an extremely common defect - and a defect that Canon refuses to admit.  Try Googling Canon S500 e18", and you'll see what I meant.Don't buy it unless you want a very expensive paperweight</review_text>
1 year old... 3 e18 errors   2 battery erros   shipped back for service 4 times!   search the net for e18 before you buy!</review_text>
I purchased the canon powershot s500 digital elph last March. I kept getting blurry pictures so I called Canon technical support. They went through the whole procedure to make sure my camera was all set up. Well I followed their directions but everything was the way it should have been. So they said I should send it in because there was obviously a problem with it. Then I sent it in and had to pay for the shipping there. They sent it back and said they had switched out some optical thing. Well I just finally went to get my pictures developed and they all have the same problem. They never fixed the problem. Mind you this was the approximately 9 months of my son's life before the age of 2. I called tech support and ended up having to wait more than 24 hours for a call back from a supervisor. She said they would send me pre paid envelope to check out the camera. Well I was greatful and had to tell her that during babysitting in late August a little boy had dropped my camera so there was damage to the outside part of the camera, but it did not effect the quality of the pictures because they were the same as prior to the day it was dropped. She said that they would probably not cover it due to the fact that it might have been caused by the dropped camera. I told I have proof of when it happened and that the pictures prior to that date are coming in blurry just like it was before I sent it in the first time. I started to cry that my son's 9 months are all ruined and she was practically laughing when I got off the phone. The camera is worse than a disposable camera. Don't waste your time or money on this piece of junk. I recommend Olympus. My Olympus prior to this was only 3 megapixels and was better quality than this piece of junk. I am planning on contacting the Better Business Bureau regarding this matter. Please don't waste your time on this, like I have to! I hope this helps people make better choices! Good luck! I wish someone could have forecasted this for me</review_text>
After owning three other Canon cameras I am through with Canon. All my other cameras were fine. This cameras LCD broke within the first month of normal use. Never dropped! All of my other Digital cameras held up for years. Ive had two powershot s50s 1 lost and 1 stolen. Never had a problem and those were both dropped numbers of times.This is a product defect/design flaw and Canon will not cover it under warranty. $150.00 to get it repaired and It will happen again, or you may start getting the E18 errors. This is a expensive paperweight!Poor design. Very dissapointed. I will never buy another Canon product again</review_text>
For average people who want a camera that just works-and takes good pics you should not buy this. I don't know about the specifics, but like other reviewers mine got stuck and quit working for no reason after a couple of months. So, I don't really see what all the bells and whistles are for if it doesn't even take a picture. It was fine while it worked, it ate batteries but the pics were good</review_text>
I have owned several Canon digital cameras and like them very much.  I purchased the A520 as a gift for a family member.  After several months the lens cover problem that everyone writes about started happening.  It would stick paritally open or closed or all the way open.  The key word being stick or stuck.  I took it to a Canon Service Center and they repaired it under warranty.  After trying to use it for the 1st time several weeks later the lens cover was stuck open and would not budge.  I took it back to the Service Center and they repaired it again.  While looking at the paperwork after the repair they stated courtesy repair only and not under warranty.  It was under warranty and had 90 days from the date they did not repair it the first time.  After emailing Canon they said to just email them if I have a problem and they would see what they could do.  Very POOR.  I like Canon digital cameras but wish I had never purchased the A520.  I bought it because of it's low price, which was a big mistake</review_text>
This is my third digital camera, I bought it after my tot dunked my previous camera under water.   I did a lot of research before I bought this and it was highly rated in Consumer Reports.After a few months of ok pictures (the macro setting is not very good though) the lens cover started sticking but I learned to live with it.  I would manually open up the lens cover each time.  Then the lens cover got stuck in the open position and I was learning to live with that.   But now the camera is almost completely dead.  It will not power up properly and sometimes it beeps.  I'm not sure but I think I am out of the warranty period with this.I will not buy another Canon Camera.  This camera was made too cheaply.  I wish things were not made to break right away</review_text>
I bought this camera on the recommendation of a store technician over another HP digital.  The camera has spent as much time in the repair shop as it has being used.  The delay between pictures is incredibly long.  The lens/shutter doesn't open properly.  (Two other family members who own Powershot A520's are having the same problems</review_text>
This gets 1 star for the simple fact that it doesn't seem to fit my Mark II body properly.</review_text>
These are my experiences with the extender mounted to my EOS 10D. I'm currently debating whether or not to buy it for my new 30D, but it looks like I don't want to risk wasting my money. Let me explain:Let me start by saying that the only reason I gave this 2 stars instead of 1 is because it did prevent my nose from smudging the LCD screen. I shoot events at nightclubs a lot, so I'm always (a) running around to get shots, causing me to sweat, which causes a sweaty and oily nose tip and (b) I always show the subjects their photos after I take them, so having a smudgy screen can be kind of annoying. For further clarification, I'm Asian, so my nose is not as defined or long as other ethnicities.I run around a lot when I shoot. So the constant activity eventually led the extender to naturally fall off. I got lucky once, and found it in the general vicinity of where I was, but the second time, I wasn't so lucky. So what did I do? I purchased another one. Not only did I have to purchase the extender, I had to purchase the viewfinder replacement (the piece with the soft rubber) because that was attached to the lost extender. Another 2 weeks in, and again, same problem. I didn't even bother buying any replacements, as by this time, I upgraded to the 30D.If you don't plan on doing a lot of running around, then this piece may be okay for you. However, please take into consideration that this piece also fell off for me while putting my camera back in my Canon Backpack. For some reason, the piece didn't fit tightly with the mount on the camera.Another problem, as most people mentioned, is that images are very noticeably smaller through this extender, so be prepared to have strained eyes if you plan on using your camera all day.I guess I'll check it out at my local camera shop and see how it fits with the 30D; I'll be sure to write another review if the results are different than with the 10D</review_text>
OK, maybe a 1 star is actually fair since my nose doesn't smudge the LCD screen as much.  The MOST annoying thing for me is it constantly falls off the camera.  Both my 30D and Rebel XT.  If I am lucky enough it will fall off, get lost and eventually I will not be reminded I wasted money on this accesory</review_text>
I wear glasses and press against the viewfinder as hard as I can to help keep the shot stable (I shoot birds at 700mm). The first thing my friend and I did was to compare two identical lenses/cameras etc. - one with, one without, the extender.Result: - the image appeared the same size, and the extender slightly blurred the image. In other words - completely useless</review_text>
Yes, it does provide a bit more eye relief, and can make it easier to see the whole frame (by making it smaller), BUT there is a major problem with this.  The eyepiece lens surface will not be as deeply couched in the rubber trim when you use this, and the result is a lot more reflections flashing around in the eyepiece when you have light behind you.  This is especially a problem when you are wearing glasses.</review_text>
The frame and the pictures it displays are fine.  Sometimes it is a little hard to get it to download photos from my PC.  My major complaint is the power supply.  The original power supply dies after 4 months.  It was repalced under warranty (after some grief with customer service).  The raplacement died some months later after the warranty had expired.  I then had to buy one.  That one died after a few months and the company didn't have the replacement in stock.  After months of waiting from them to stock the item I gave up and after lots of searching on the web I found a supply made by another compay.  I had to change the connector to make it match the connector on the frame.  It's been doing fine since then.  I should note that my daughter has the same frame and has had almost identical problems.  It looks like there are a lot more of these types of frames on the market now.  I would do a lot of shopping before buying this one</review_text>
The 5x7 digital photo frame from Pacific Digital is very cheaply made, the lcd is very dark and flickers constantly.</review_text>
It looks great, genuine leather, much better than synthetic. Like a brand named leather wallet. But there is no where you can tie the case to the camera. Hence you have to hold onto it with another hand when you pull the camera out to take photos.  There is no where to put the essential accessories (battery and another memory stick). There is no way to clip to the belt. Will like to return if if not the hassle of mailing and the associated cost. Bought another handy synthetic case afterwards</review_text>
This filter is fine for normal shooting, but if you do low-light work, beware; you will see bad internal reflections on night shots, and will need to remove the filter</review_text>
I bought this camera in february, and after taking 6 shots the camera almost died, I could review the photos I had taken, but when switched the dial to take photos the camera turned out black either the LCD/EFV, and only turned off when I removed batteries, I sent it to Fuji repair center, and got it back again almost one month later. then six months later the camera did exactly same thing, I haven't received my camera back yet, But I'm sure never will buy a Fuji camera again and of course my camera will died again in the next months after I get from the repair center and at the end of the day I will have wasted almost 500 dlls</review_text>
Very disappointed by Canon on the fit of this adapter.Adapater and shade attachments block camer lens view andcreate flash shadows</review_text>
Gosh, i would really like to review this adapter, but---Amazon has put my order on indefinate hold, as thier supplier is unable to get any more.But wait! What's that blurb on the product page -"Availability: Ususally ships within 24 hours" and "Want it delivered Tomorrow? Order it in the next 5 hours and 36 minutes, and choose One-Day Shipping at checkout. See details."So they can't deliver it, yet they still list it as available for delivery tomorrow? Don't order from Amazon</review_text>
There's little more to say....great item, almost a "must have", but forty bucks for a half ounce of plastic is absolutely criminal</review_text>
I purchased a 510 PowerShot in summer of 2005. After couple time of use the zoom on the cameras lens wouldn't work anymore. I cound't take any picture anymore. I contacted Canon over this and they ask me to pay shiping to send the camera to them to fix.</review_text>
I admit that I'm far from an expert on digital cameras. I did take over 32,000 photographs with 35mm cameras for over 20 years.I purchased a 510 PowerShot in July of 2005. It wasn't too long before the zoom on the cameras lens wouldn't work. I contacted Canon over this and can you believe this company had the audacity to charge ME for shipping THEIR faulty camera back to them. I can understand them saying, 'we'll charge you at first, BUT once we establish that the fault is due to us, we'll then reimburse you back.'I enclosed a type written letter with the camera asking that Canon contact me when they received my camera (in the mail) and I also asked that they contact me when it was being shipped back. (I also emailed them the same request). Neither of my wishes was ever fulfilled on Canon's behalf.That in itself was enough for me and I've been bitter about that ever since. I've also told every person that I've met who wanted to buy a digital camera about this incident. I'm pleased to say, I've steered most away from this company.What else can I say about this camera:This camera is slow at times after its taken a picture. I've missed out on some good shots due to this.It eats batteries like there's no tomorrow so one MUST have rechargeable AA's to even make this camera worth its while.I've not used other digital cameras so maybe they are all this way but if I take a 3 minute movie (with this camera) in my home during the day and go outside, most things outside are VERY WHITE. Almost like looking at an infra red photograph.When filming outside, when one goes inside during the day, everything is dark. Like I said, maybe all digital cameras are this way?I wouldn't recommend this camera or anything that Canon makes if you want my personal opinion. Think about that. You have to pay the shipping for a camera that's barely a few months old and still UNDER warranty. That's disgusting, that's all I have to say.There should be a ZERO for this, not a 1 star</review_text>
I agree with M. Arse with the 2star rating. I was disappointed with this camera from the beginning. Not a user friendly one and the pictures turn out very grainy with bad color quality unless you are in an optimum light. I'm interested in the 7 Mp camera Canon offers. I've read that it has much better shutter speed. Recommended??</review_text>
I have owned this camera for about a year and I have never really enjoyed it.  For a point and shoot it is bad, it takes pictures way too slowly and I often miss out on a good shot.  It is also not as user friendly as I would have hoped it to be with so many scene settings.  While I enjoy some of them, most of the time my pictures turn out grainy (in low light), whitewashed (with flash) or blurry (of even slowly moving objects).  I have tried changing the exposure time and shutter speed to counter some of these things, but I rarely get a good picture when I need it.  I never had these problems with my ELPH s200.  This camera is also a lot more bulkier as well, and the cover over the lens has started to stick so that it does not fully open when turned on. If given the option I would not buy this camera again</review_text>
Hello All,Lens hoods are pretty much a necessity, but this has to be the mostly poorly made hood I've ever used. Unlike other hoods that screw on, this one requires you to press to opposing clips and then slide the hood one, and release the clips. This leads to problems of alignment, meaning both sides of the clip need to be perfectly aligned in order for the hood to fit right. Although it's a pain and I hate...I don't really have another alternative. Either go w/o a hood, or take this one. Either way, guess I'd rather have a hood on the lense than not having one</review_text>
Wow... Now if you really want to see a rip-off, here it is. Not to be damaging to Amazon.com but hey for the 50mm just get some carboard and tape it to the front to shield it from the sun. The hood is definitely not worth it</review_text>
It's unfortunate that one of the best lens bargains out there is followed up by one of the worst photo ripoffs -- this hood.  How can you pay $75 for a great prime lens, and $25 for a flimsy piece of plastic to cover it</review_text>
Boy, this is way too much to pay for a hood on this lens.  It's a great a lens, but this is hardly worth the price</review_text>
The camera case only works if you wear a belt-- there is no clip on. The case itself holds only the camera, not even space for a spare battery or memory card. (I've heard the case will darken your camera, but I didn't end up using the case). The neck strap is not useful, it's too long. At '34 inches, if you're not careful you could swing your camera into something and break it. (The Canon Camera rocks, however.</review_text>
A close friend made the unfortunate mistake of plunking down 2 grand for this camera.  Honestly Olympus produces cameras that can do the same thing for $400.  I've used hers and the image quality is horrible and the colours are wrong 9 times out of 10.  If you're going to spend that much on a camera, get the D70 instead and buy a nice extra lens or some other gadgets to go with.  The pictures are better and it offers more MP</review_text>
This camera will probably go down in Nikon's history as one of its most over-priced  and disappointing cameras. I bought mine through Amazon from Calumet in January 2003. From the start, the colors never looked right, especially the ghastly magenta-toned skin tones.  I also bought the SB800s (3 of them), thinking the CLS would be a great addition. But the system uses IR and is unreliable in any situation except very tight environments.The camera has a wonderful feel, viewfinder and reasonably good controls. But the results are disappointing. The sensor is undersized for this class of camera and considering what its competition (Canon) offers. Nikon finally realized this and on Dec. 13 decided to dump all these cameras by lowering the price $1,200. It just so happened mine was in Melville, N.Y., with a long list of issues to be repaired while it was still under warranty. These include bad AF performance since upgrading to V2 of the firmware, bad color, overexposure, blurry images with the VR lens and inconsistent color balance from frame to frame even when using a preset value.I would strongly suggest that you don't buy this camera and thereby reward Nikon for producing an inferior product originally sold at a ridiculous price for what it offers. Indeed, forget Nikon and go to Canon</review_text>
Good: Motor drive speed.  Grip feel. Takes Nikon lenses.  Reacts fast to pressing the shutter release.Bad: Skin tone renditions a color other than skin.  White balance doesn't balance well. Noise at anything above ISO 200, looks like 3200. CF card door tough to open. Screen fogs if you breathe when you shoot. Battery cover is not part of the battery.  Button placement not as intuitive as on the D100.  4.1MP allows for virtually no cropping of enlargements.Dumped mine a month after I got it</review_text>
While this lens has an attractive price tag, this lens has serious trouble with sharpness. Only at high shutter speeds (1/250 and above approx.) or with a good flash and middle apertures (f/8 to f/22 approx.) does it deliver sharp images. Horribly slow autofocus. I am already saving to buy and L-series or the IS USM version</review_text>
Polarizing filters are used to eliminate glare on non-metallic surfaces like glass or water. They can also be used to increase the contrast and color saturation of your image. I use my polarizer not only to eliminate glare, but also to make skies a nice shade of blue or to get some "pop" out of clouds.There are so many options to consider when purchasing the Polarizing filter for your needs. For instance, linear vs. circular, film or digital versions, or quality vs. price.If you are making use of a TTL or auto-focusing system, Circular Polarizers are designed to work with those features. Linear Polarizers has their uses, but they are manufactured differently and may not work. Unless you are certain, just get a Circular Polarizing filter.There are some digital circular polarizers on the market. I am not sure what makes a cir-pl lens better for digital as opposed to film. I use a Canon 20D Digital SLR and see no problems caused by using a supposed non-digital filter on a digital camera.Most of the time, when it comes to filters; you get what you pay for. Does that mean you need an expensive polarizer? Of course not, just be sure to get the right filter for your needs.  What ever polarizing filter you get, make sure it is color neutral to prevent unwanted tinting.  Spending more on a color balanced filter will save time in post.  If you need multiple filter sizes, consider saving money by using step down rings.Currently I use the Hoya Pro1 filters, as the Canon polarizing filters I previously owned were without question bulkier and heavier. The weight might not seem like much, but when you stick all your items in a backpack all the extra bits of weight add up quickly.  I can spend a good amount of time with my equipment on my back so this is a big concern for me.  When it came down to the images, at times I would see a browning tint on my photos. The tint is easy to clean up in Photoshop CS2, but I don't see that problem with the Hoya Pro1 filter.Overall, I would recommend against the Canon polarizing filters.  I originally thought, "it is Canon, it must be quality."  Since then I have replaced all my Canon filters.  This filter works, but comes at a cost of disadvantages to other similarly priced filters.PROS:Can be used for film or digital camerasEliminates internal reflections and ghostingCONS:Bulky and heavyNot neutral color balance</review_text>
I purchased this bag because I did not wnat to spend a ton of money on a case to protect my Canon Rebel EOS digital camera. I only have 2 lenses, but the bag is capable of holding the camera and 4 lenses as well as pockets for cables, batteries, etc. I think this is a great unit, for the beginner (like me) or the pro.</review_text>
For nearly $100, this adaptor provides very little (1.5X) magnification.  It is also a nuisance because you have to switch the camera settings every time you use the lens for it to function properly.  This is no big deal with the wide angle adaptor, which is used infrequently by me, but it is when you want to capture a fleeting image at a distance.  It is lightweight, but cumbersome and doesn't accept filters.  For real telephoto capabilities, get an SLR with interchangeable lenses.  I sent this product back.</review_text>
Description or product is wrong.  There is no quad independent power/charging indicators.  They are set up in banks of two.  One light for two charging bays. Batteries must be charged in banks of two.  Tried e-mailing Vidpro for additional info on this charger. E-mail came back as undeliverable.  Cannot find any reviews on the internet for this charger</review_text>
I received the remote this evening and have not been able to get the remote to work with my Canon Rebel XT Camera.  Followed the directions that were furnished with the remote to no avail.  It appears that this remote is defective</review_text>
The documentation is terrible. Its going to take a lot of practice. If you're just going to stick it on top your camera its fine. However I want to use it off-camera to trigger 2 x SB600s.Just setting the D200 to fire a pre-flash that will trigger the SB800/Masster & SB600s it's a nightmare and its not covered in any detail, in the manual.The SB800 is designed for this purpose. So why not include information on how to do this?</review_text>
I was expecting much more from this flash, I already started looking for the better one. If I knew this was a closeout item I'd never buy it. It died on me with no indication, sent to canon fixed and returned with a big scratch on it. Now it does work but sometings wrong with recycle time even with brand new duracell batteries...Save money and buy 5XX series flash..</review_text>
At 300mm this lens is VERY soft, it's hard to get a shot that looks like it's in focus.  To do so, you need to shoot at about f/11, and then since there is little light available, you usually have to bump the ISO to 800 or 1600 just to get an acceptable shutter speed. Of course, the high ISO then introduces other artifacts.  The focus is also dead slow and often doesn't lock on.  This is a lens that I have constantly fought with.  Don't upgrade to the new 70-300 IS either, as it's only marginally better.Buy the 70-200 f/4L.  It's a far superior lens</review_text>
This camera worked very well until the lens got jammed in its extended position.  I sent the camera for warranty service (I had it less than 7 months), and they refused to honor the warranty because it was a bit scuffed and a little decorative ring on the end of the lens that had been attached with 2-sided tape had come off. They claimed this happened due to physical damage, but this occurred during normal use: I was just changing modes and the lens didn't retract. Don't bother trying to get warranty service unless the unit looks brand new.  Even then, don't be surprised if they renege on the warranty.I had another A410 that did the very same thing (lens got jammed), but was stolen in a break-in before I sent it out for service (so I suppose it was no loss after all).  Obviously there is a design flaw that causes the lens to extend too far and come off track inside.In short, this camera is not suitable for frequent use in the field. If you buy it, and plan to use it a lot, expect to be buying another camera or paying for a repair that should be covered under warranty (which I'm not doing) soon.</review_text>
This camera is incredibly frustrating.  I must admit that under ideal lighting conditions outdoors on a moderate to fully sunny day, the camera takes wonderful pictures.  However, photos using indooor and mixed lighting conditions leave alot to be desired.  If you want to take any indoor pictures with natural light, this is not the camera for you.  The reason being is that if the flash is not activated or the lighting is not perfect, the camera slows down the shutter speed considerably.  Since the camera does not have very good image stabilization (if any) indoor pictures are blurry unless you have the hands of a surgeon.  Of course you can use the flash, but then your subject will be overlit, while the background is pitch dark.  And forget about taking long range pictures indoors (i.e. at a graduation ceremony or wedding) because if the flash is on, you will get a black picture because the camera does not compensate the shutter speed for distance, it only adjusts to whether or not it thinks the flash is on.  If it is off, your picture will be blurred because the shutter stays open for 1-2 seconds.  Since I take alot of indoor pictures, this camera is worthless to me.  If you only plan to take outdoor pictures in ideal light, this is the camera for you.  If you want to do any natural light photography, forget it.</review_text>
I bought this lens for my Canon 30D after reading every professional review I could find.  I knew going in that this lens wasn't perfect but, was supposed to be better than the 18-55 kit lens.  I liked the range that it provided and the image stabilization.  I shot pictures with this lens and was extremely dissapointed.  The pictures were not sharp at all and the colors were dull.  I thought it might have been my new camera at first because I couldn't imagine the quality would be this bad.  I ruled this out after I used my Canon 28-105 lens I had for my Canon film SLR and the results were much better.  For the digital focal length though, my old lens wouldn't suffice because of the 1.6x focal factor.Later, I decided on the Tamron 17-50/2.8 after reading reviews.  The salesperson at the professional camera store guessed that my pictures were very soft when I told him I had this Canon lens.  He said, "let me guess, you'd like to try the Tamron 17-50/2.8."  He said that this was the very best lens to buy in the price range and to take it home and try it. I could return it with no questions asked if I wasn't satisfied.  He also said that he hadn't had one person return it yet.My first images with this lens were great.  They were SHARP and had way more vibrant color.  There is absolutely no comparison at all.  I was hesitant to buy a third party lens but, my fears were instantly eliminated after seeing the results.  This is the first review I have ever posted on Amazon.  I was so dissapointed that I wanted to help others not make the same mistake.  After spending $$$ on a digital SLR, it would be a waste not to get great pictures with it because of the lens.  Before taking a chance on buying the Canon, do yourself a BIG favor and try the Canon and Tamron at a local store.</review_text>
I do video work and was attracted to the sale price and extra height of this particular tripod.  Come to find out, this model does not have a fluid head, meaning, if you do any panning with a camcorder, it won't be as smooth as you'd probably like it to be.  Also, at the end of a pan the head tends to "unwind," causing your panned image to back up a little ways.  Thus, I think it's rather misleading to label this as a "Photo / Video" tripod.Additionally, I don't really care for the cheap feel of some of the plastic knobs and adjusters.  Finally, mine came with a few, very minor cosmetic blemishes, almost as if it were used.Instead of video, I'll be utilizing this one as a microphone mount.If you want to do video, please buy a tripod with a fluid head.  You'll love it, I guarantee that.That's why I give this one 2 stars</review_text>
Looks nice. Unfortunately did not power up the camera, so I can't say much else. Going to cost me return shipping at the very least. Sorry I didn't buy the Canon product instead</review_text>
They sent me wrong lens cover and said I ordered the wrong one..........don't think so since I got copy.......poor customer service all around.....</review_text>
I bought this monopod about 3 weeks ago after reading the reviews here. I'm not sure if I got a defective unit but I've had these problems from the gitgo:-I noticed the 2 lower sections will not open and close smoothly, they would get stuck about 2-3 inches from the lock and you'd need force to expand/retract them. Very interestingly, if the section right above the one I'm trying to expand/retract is unlocked then the operation is smooth and flawless!-The ballhead does not support my Nikon D80 and lightest lens (18-55mm) a less than 2 lbs combo, which is much lighter than the 4.4 lbs weight limit indicated in the specs. The camera just slumps in one direction or another regardless of how hard I try to make sure the ballhead is locked tightly.Again, it might have been a defective unit, but I thought I'd point my observations out anyway. I wanted to buy this from Amazon, it wasn't in stock, it was sitting in my shopping cart and when it became available Amazon bumped the price to $40+, so I went elsewhere and got it for $30.</review_text>
Im not from USA. My brother bought me the camara in a trip three months ago and it is not working!! It has serious conection problems in the body that I cant fix in my country. I lost 1000 US</review_text>
This kit is just junk. The &quot;deluxe blower brush&quot; is a cheap plastic blower in the tiniest size. There is a &quot;tweezers&quot; that is just folded aluminum sheet metal - there's no way that is getting anywhere near my cameras. There are a few sheets of lense tissue and a few swabs to use with the cleaning solution. The &quot;lintless cleaning cloth&quot; is an about 3&quot; x 5&quot; piece of something akin to reusable paper towels that you'll use about three times and then throw away. This kit is not worth buying at any price, because it's not worth the shipping charges</review_text>
I purchased this camera in August 2006 and have sent it out for repair 4 times already for the same problem and it is November 2006. Kodak just keeps telling me to send it to get repaired. Is that right?It takes great pictures but when you try to download them to your computer it works the first time. You try to do it a second time and it freezes and gives you a cannot read device message. I have two kids and the most important thing is to send picture emails to all the relatives across the globe on their updated lives. I now have to go to my local photo place to get a CD and prints made and then download them into my EasyShare software. Oh, shouldn't it be easier after spending that much money on a camera.Also, I had to purchase a dock adapter for my printer dock. When I put the camera on the dock, it doesn't charge the battery or print pictures, the screen just goes grey.This camera has had its main board and firmware repaired and replaced every time that it has come back to me. The cost of shipping, CD's and prints has just added to the headache this camera has given me.Kodak has not been helpful at all and they inform me the only form of communication of through email. What are they afraid of, they need to face the problem and satisfy their customers.Do not purchase this camera, it is a great if you just never want to get them out of the camera</review_text>
I only wish I could return this camera. Its automatic focus does not work well in photographing landscape scenes and plants (what I do most) and its manual focus is difficult (very difficult) to use. My much cheaper, and lower resolution, old Minolta does a much better job in low light conditions. I find I have to delete half my photographs due to bad focus. In addition, photo files take 5 to 6 seconds to save to my so-called high-speed memory card.Don't buy this camera</review_text>
This item is either not coated or has a single coating and thus any time sun hits the filter, it produces flare in the picture.  Furthermore, after doing more research it turns out that these uncoated or single coated filters can cause up to 9% light loss vs multi-coated filters like Hoya S-HMC or B+W MRC filters.  As for polarizer effect itself, I think it's amazing and you owe it to yourself to at least try it on a nice sunny day. (the sky and foliage will look completely different and alive</review_text>
To customer before me, you camera D200 might be on recall. Please check the Nikon website for more info. You have described the exact recall problem. Good luck! BTW, have you tried or someone tried this battery on a D70? I am thinking to consolidate and have all greys batteries rather than black for the D70 and grays from the D200.</review_text>
I purchased the 75-300mm for a trip to a NASCAR Nextel Cup Championship in Homestead, FL. I was mostly disappointed with the lens from the beginning. The lens is not very sharp, feels very cheap, and the autofocus is slow and hilariously innaccurate in low light.I packed up and returned the lens about an hour after I got off the plane. I am going to save my money for something sturdier and with a better maximum aperture.I suggest you do the same.</review_text>
I bought this lens based on the super telephoto ability and low cost. You truly get what you pay for, and this thing isn't worth a plug nickel. I took a few shots on a tripod and could not believe how terrible this lens was @ 300mm (480mm on a Digital Rebel XT). Incredibly soft. Even stopped down, I would never want to make an enlargement from it. Stay away. Don't believe the fools who are novices, you will be disappointed with this lens. You're much better off to buy the older & used 100-300mm 5.6 (the L version costs more too) but both are so much better than this junker. You're even more crazy if you think you can take decent photo's with this lens handheld. Having switched from Nikon when switching to digital, I almost judged Canon from this one lens, which I'm glad I didn't. Don't waste your money or learn the hard way like I did. This lens also had terrible purple fringing, almost as bad as the kit 18-55mm. After extensive research and testing I now own and am happy with the following Canon lenses:Canon 10-22mmCanon 28-105mm (3.5 version)Canon 100-300mm (5.6 non-L version) I will sell for the L version when I can afford it.The kit 18-55mm makes usable shots, but when I could afford it, I sold it too.You will get better results buying a Rebel XT and an older 100-300mm than you would with a brand new XTI and this terrible 75-300mm lens.</review_text>
The minute I took the monopod out of cover it broke. The mounting head fell apart from the leg. The glue they use is very bad. I didn't return the product because I think the replacement would be the same quality and it was not worth the affords. I just fixed it myself</review_text>
"You get what you pay for"Most of the time that cliche is true, but there are products out there that break this rule.  The Philips DVP642 is one of them, a great quality, versatile product selling at a bargain price.  This is not.I was hoping the same of this product from all the "glowing" reviews on here.  However, this quality of this monopod is very disappointing.  First of all, you have to ask yourself, why do you need a monopod over a tripod?  For myself and most, it's because we need some stability and portability for our telephoto zoom lenses.    However, telephoto zooms are long and heavy so the monopod should be designed strong and solid to live up to the task.  This monopod doesn't even come close.Here are it's bad points:-The aluminum construction is very cheap quality.  The leg segments wobble laterally when you extend and close them.  It feels like thin, cheap aluminum and the monopod feels it could break in half like a toothpick at any time.-The head is very cheap and not solid.  No matter how tight I tightened the head, my camera would slope down.  The workmanship of the head is so cheap that at any point, you think that you're going to break the PLASTIC tightening screw if you tighten it too much.  I think we've all experienced that in the past.-The leg locks are not tight.  When you push down on the monopod, the leg segments slide back into themselves.In the end, it was a risk I took hoping that I could get a high-quality product for a cheap price.  Sometimes, you can get away with that.  Walmart sells a very decent functioning tripod for only $30.  In this case, I should've bought a REAL monopod.  Oh well, I wasted $16 that I could've used to help pay for a higher quality monopod</review_text>
Last march (2002) i bought this camera and it was wonderful, although it was "refurbished" by CANON it worked perfectly. I bought also a new battery and a 48MB Compactflash memory card and everything was working fine. 6 months later the camera had electrical problems and warranty had expired. Now the cost to fix this problem is far bigger than to buy a new camera because warranty period for "refurbished" items is less than 6 months</review_text>
I was deeply dissapointed in this lens hood.  Given that the cost is about 10% of the cost of the lens for which it was intended (the 70-300 IS in this case) I expected it to be of stiff durable polycarbonate.-Positives-fulfills the basic function of a lens hood- prevents flare, etc.The bayonet locking system is excellent, much easier to deal with than scew-on type lens hoods.that's about it.-Negatives-The polycarbonate is so thin I half expect it to be translucent.The hood must be gripped by the base to remove it, as grippng the thin end of the hood may break it; or at least it feels like it may break it.Its very long.  Especially on the 70-300 which is already a long lens, this makes a fully extended zoom about a foot long.  That's pretty conspicuous.It's very overpriced vs. generic lenses ($50 vs. $5-10 for rubber or metal).I traded it in and went with a kalt rubber lens hood.  2 stars for the great bayonet design, but the rest of it is weak</review_text>
Canon's 28-135mm with IS (Image Stabilizer) is a far better choice for the money</review_text>
Ok, I imagine if you forked over the $900 for this baby you would not want me telling you that you got a bad deal, but I am going to say it anyway.  This little baby is way over priced, not to mention you need a lot more than just this to make it work.  You need a wireless router!!  So rather than just complain, let me tell you what I want Canon to do about it and maybe we can start a revolution!With CF cards in the 12GB range it doesn't make sense that you would need this for capacity reasons (I know those of you with the biggest and brightes 16MP that shoot in JPEG & RAW on the highest settings just laughed at me), however where this item is worth it is if you want to immediately see your shots on a big screen or computer without having to take the shot, take out the card, etc.WHAT I WANT is a bluetooth compact flash card. They make these so I know it is possible.  I would like Canon to offer support for these compact flash cards so that I can immediately sync my bluetooth computer with my bluetooth camera.  Now that would make it so that when I am in the studio or shooting a wedding, I have the mobility 30 feet - 90 feet depending on card and I don't have to drag along a wireless router and I saved myself $700.  Get to it Canon - I am waiting!!!</review_text>
I got this for my S70. First off, in order to use it, you have to set the S70 to "radio control" (about 9 button pushes). Then you had better stay no further away than six feet or so (and only in *front* of the camera-the remote doesn't work from the rear!). Oh, and if you want to adjust your framing, forget it-the zoom is immobilized.If you need a "cable release," I strongly suggest simply using the self-timer built into the camera. It gives you 2-second and 10-second settings, and you're almost certain to have a steady tripod by that time.</review_text>
I have just bought the Sony Cybershot w100 camera little over a month ago and I have only taken 30-40 pictures, I loved it and then it just stopped working, so I recharged the baterry, no luck still the camera wouldn't turn off or on. So Thankfully I had bought a 2nd backup battery charged it and tried the camera again. No it doesn't work it only makes a slight ding sound and shuts off. Basically worthless. It seems like it might have short circuited. But I was so excitted to buy this camera I read all instructions before use, I haven't let anyone else use it and it hasn't been out of my sight, never been dropped, never in extreme hot or cold, always well protected. SO I am going to try to return it or exchange it. I am hoping to get good service or I will be really upset for spending so much money and research just to take 30-40 pictures. Hopefully I can let you know if they stand by their products. Before now I have always been happy with what I have bought from Amazo</review_text>
You got to have extremely steady hand, or camera stand to use this camaera.During my niece wedding, I put in a 2GB of memory and we were trigger happy, we must have took over couple hundred of pictures, however, I am very unhappy about the result. 3 out of 5 pictures are fuzzy, messy, out of focus.On the other hand, for the pictures that took a few mins to line up and with a very very steady hand, you got a great picture.Size is good, weight is a bit on the heavy side for the size, but to some people that's good quality</review_text>
I bought this battery as a replacement for an old Canon BP511A.  It lasted about a couple of months before it started not taking a charge.  Complete waste of money</review_text>
I am not impressed with Tiffen filters I got in this set.  The finish of the rings are poor.  Despite of previously poor reputaion, I recently purchased some 67mm Quantaray filter from the local Ritz Camera store which are of much better quality compared to this set of Tiffen filters.  I never got Tiffens before, had good experience with Hoyas.  I will probably stay with those from now on.  Now come to think of it, Ritz camera indicated the Quantaray they had were made by Hoya.The glass on all the filters are quite a bit more reflective compared to the Hoyas and the Quantarays.  Not a good sign.The circular polarizer had some smudges and some lense swirl that after 10 sheets of lense tissue and quite a bit of cleaning solution failed to be fully cleared off.  Quite frustrating.  All of the filters came with lint and a few little smudges on them, not sure if the store handling or the manufacturer handling was to blame, but none of the other filters I got before had this kind of problem right out of the box.The set might be cheap, but it sure is for a good reason</review_text>
The filters that I got are poorly finished.  The 812 filter has a smudge on it, while all 3 filters don't screw on properly on my lens.  All filters come off EASILY.  They are totally useless.  I suggest that you buy filters in a real store so you can try them on your lens</review_text>
This bag is very small. My Canon 20D fits nicely with a small lens, but you cannot fit more than one lens with the camera body. We kept the bag for informal use when we only need the body and one lens to avoid always having to carry a bulky bag</review_text>
I was all set to purchase this bag but wanted to try it out first.  I had great difficulty finding one locally but finally after many many phone calls I located one bag and asked the merchant to hold it till I could get there to try it out.  Firstly, the bag is nice but doesn't hold as much as I thought.  It still could have worked for my but for one thing: this bag is not designed for those with a, er.....womanly build.  It was the most uncomfortable bag I have ever tried out and looked absolutely ridiculous on me.  So glad I was able to take it for a test drive before purchasing online.  Just a word of warning to the ladies;-</review_text>
Image quality is pathetic.  It generates ludicrous amounts of noise even at the lowest ISO (80).Rest assured, you will be disappointed.  I returned mine within a day</review_text>
Polarizing filters are used to eliminate glare on non-metallic surfaces like glass or water. They can also be used to increase the contrast and color saturation of your image. I use my polarizer not only to eliminate glare, but also to make skies a nice shade of blue or to get some "pop" out of clouds.There are so many options to consider when purchasing the Polarizing filter for your needs. For instance, linear vs. circular, film or digital versions, or quality vs. price.If you are making use of a TTL or auto-focusing system, Circular Polarizers are designed to work with those features. Linear Polarizers has their uses, but they are manufactured differently and may not work. Unless you are certain, just get a Circular Polarizing filter.There are some digital circular polarizers on the market. I am not sure what makes a cir-pl lens better for digital as opposed to film. I use a Canon 20D Digital SLR and see no problems caused by using a supposed non-digital filter on a digital camera.Most of the time, when it comes to filters; you get what you pay for. Does that mean you need an expensive polarizer? Of course not, just be sure to get the right filter for your needs. What ever polarizing filter you get, make sure it is color neutral to prevent unwanted tinting. Spending more on a color balanced filter will save time in post. If you need multiple filter sizes, consider saving money by using step down rings.Currently I use the Hoya Pro1 filters, as the Canon polarizing filters I previously owned were without question bulkier and heavier. The weight might not seem like much, but when you stick all your items in a backpack all the extra bits of weight add up quickly. I can spend a good amount of time with my equipment on my back so this is a big concern for me. When it came down to the images, at times I would see a browning tint on my photos. The tint is easy to clean up in Photoshop CS2, but I don't see that problem with the Hoya Pro1 filter.Overall, I would recommend against the Canon polarizing filters. I originally thought, "it is Canon, it must be quality." Since then I have replaced all my Canon filters. This filter works, but comes at a cost of disadvantages to other similarly priced filters.PROS:Can be used for film or digital camerasEliminates internal reflections and ghostingCONS:Bulky and heavyNot neutral color balance</review_text>
I have gotten better results with Sterlingtek batteries for a fraction of the price...like less the $15 shipped</review_text>
Polarizing filters are used to eliminate glare on non-metallic surfaces like glass or water. They can also be used to increase the contrast and color saturation of your image. I use my polarizer not only to eliminate glare, but also to make skies a nice shade of blue or to get some "pop" out of clouds.There are so many options to consider when purchasing the Polarizing filter for your needs. For instance, linear vs. circular, film or digital versions, or quality vs. price.If you are making use of a TTL or auto-focusing system, Circular Polarizers are designed to work with those features. Linear Polarizers has their uses, but they are manufactured differently and may not work. Unless you are certain, just get a Circular Polarizing filter.There are some digital circular polarizers on the market. I am not sure what makes a cir-pl lens better for digital as opposed to film. I use a Canon 20D Digital SLR and see no problems caused by using a supposed non-digital filter on a digital camera.Most of the time, when it comes to filters; you get what you pay for. Does that mean you need an expensive polarizer? Of course not, just be sure to get the right filter for your needs.  What ever polarizing filter you get, make sure it is color neutral to prevent unwanted tinting.  Spending more on a color balanced filter will save time in post.  If you need multiple filter sizes, consider saving money by using step down rings.Currently I use the Hoya Pro1 filters, as the Canon polarizing filters I previously owned were without question bulkier and heavier. The weight might not seem like much, but when you stick all your items in a backpack all the extra bits of weight add up quickly.  I can spend a good amount of time with my equipment on my back so this is a big concern for me.  When it came down to the images, at times I would see a browning tint on my photos. The tint is easy to clean up in Photoshop CS2, but I don't see that problem with the Hoya Pro1 filter.Overall, I would recommend against the Canon polarizing filters.  I originally thought, "it is Canon, it must be quality."  Since then I have replaced all my Canon filters.  This filter works, but comes at a cost of disadvantages to other similarly priced filters.PROS:Can be used for film or digital camerasEliminates internal reflections and ghostingCONS:Bulky and heavyNot neutral color balance</review_text>
I got it just today and used it for cleaning my lens. The solution might be useful, the blower is useful, the swabs can be useful with their pointed tips, but the so called "magic cloth" is anything but magic. It kept leaving lint on my lens</review_text>
Someone earlier had complained that this lense was suggested to them by amazon and it was the wrong size.  Well, that person isn't alone.  The camera I purchased is a Canon S2is, which I love.  The lense doesn't fit it.  I even bought the hood/lense adapter set and it STILL doesn't fit.  This simply is NOT the right lense for a Canon S2is, no matter what Amazon suggests.  Now, too much time has passed for me to return the lense.  I'm stuck with it, and I don't like that</review_text>
I was going to buy this camera for my teenage daughter today, but after reading the reviews I decided that it is not a god risk if the customer service is that bad and the screen seems to break without any kind of impact.I'm sure it takes nice pictures, but a lot of cameras take nice pictures.  I have to go where the service will at least respect you.</review_text>
The camera takes good pictures as long as you have a steady hand. Some pictures come out dark and some shadows on pictures.  Some pictures come out blurry - no stabalizer. This camera's randomly broke after about 1 year and I did not drop the camera (just like another reviewer).  I bought a Sony PDA and the same thing happened to that lcd - randomly broke - has a crack across the LCD. Of course, Sony said it was my fault and that I must have done something to it and refused to honor the warranty on that PDA - after 1 month? Since the camera was out of warranty, I knew there was nothing they were going to do. So if you want a DECENT camera with lousy customer service to support it - go for it! But if you want a great camera and a great company to support their products, look elsewhere. I used to be a great financial supporter of Sony products - monitors, computers, camcorder, memory sticks, etc. I am not buying anymore Sony products - I have lost the love for Sony and their products! Beware!Canon, here I come!</review_text>
I had my Sony DSC W70 for just one month when the viewing screen suddenly cracked without being dropped or hit. The glass itself was intact, but something underneath was clearly broken. Mailed it in to the factory service company for Sony, and I was informed 3 weeks later that it is not covered by warranty and will cost $181 to repair. This is 2/3 the cost of a new camera and does not make sense financially.I have a friend who had the same problem of a broken screen with the identical Sony camera.</review_text>
Don't buy this camera really.  I had it for a month and was taking good care of it.  I was initially thrilled.  The LCD screen got damaged -- no I didn't drop it.  The treatment from customer service was so poor and disturbing that I was shocked. The customer service representative actually questioned my integrity and proceed to talk to me as if I were an idiot.  A $181 repair bill for a $300 camera is not feasible.  It was a great camera at first, but I demand better treatment and respect from the company.  Look for a better camera, look on the web for comments on their customer service and don't buy this camera.  I had read very negative things about Sony but didn't think they applied -- they really are true.  I don't like being called a liar by anyone especially when I am the customer.  The camera is a month old and it is now garbage.  While I understand policies are policies in terms of a warranty, I will not accept such poor treatment and customer service.  I teach photography and will tell my students the same thing -- if customer service and respect matter to you, then do not buy this camera.</review_text>
The camera worked fine; however, after six months, it stopped working.  I took it to a Pentax authorized repairer and Pentax refused to pay for the camera because the was dirt and grit in the zoom mechanism.  My use was in no way abusive.  I had a previous Canon Powershot S200 that lasted forever with the same usage, until I gave it away.  I guess I should have stayed with Canon.  I bought the Pentax for its size and lightweight, but what good is that if it doesn't last!  Don't get the Pentax and expect long term use out of it</review_text>
Yes, I have to agree with the previous review.  It doesn't seem to make any difference in reducing lens flare from light sources.  It doesn't seem to extend far enough to actually do anything.  If it was less expensive I wouldn't mind as much, and just chalk it up to extra protection.  But that seems to be all it's good for</review_text>
I bought it for my 18-55 EF-S, and it looks like it is not very efficient - but I guess it is normal for a 18mm (x 1.6). I would have prefered a "tulip" design like those of Sigma</review_text>
this backpack was very uncomfortable. the inserts are stiff. it doesn't represent canon quality (I hope)</review_text>
I bought this lens and was pretty excited about it, but I've been disappointed. Previous to this I bought the 50mm 1.8 for $70 and that lens completely puts this one to shame. I need a wider angle lens and went for this one, but all too often found myself quite disappointed with the results. Edges of subjects were all messy and just looked terrible, even at higher f stops. I shoot with a 20D.The USM is awesome though and will for sure be an option in whatever lens I choose to buy in place of this one. The focal range of 28-105 was also very nice, but to me the picture quality was not so good</review_text>
Well of course I read the previous reviews regarding amazon shipping the grey-market version of this timer and figured that certainly by now they were shipping a US version... wrong!I just received mine today and it's got the international warranty card and users manual. I haven't decided if I'm going to return it or not but figured that anyone else considering ordering this item should be advised that it appears that amazon is only shipping the grey-market version of this unit</review_text>
From reading the other reviews, I seem to be one of the few to have mechanical issues with my A530.  Within a month after buying it, the lens cover began remaining half closed when the power is turned on.  I have to manually flick open the shutter/cover.  Then, the flash began intermittently malfunctioning and now the zoom function will only work in one direction (that is, it works to "zoom in" on something, to zoom back out I have to turn the camera off and back on.   To my knowledge, the camera has not been dropped or otherwise physically abused to cause these problems.I'm disappointed because I do like the photos that the camera takes when it does function properly.Fortunately, I bought it at Costco, so it's going back.</review_text>
Like most people I got this camera because it is quite compact for the quality of the image.  I've been pleased with the image quality when it works, but from the start it's felt flimsy and felt like it would die with any rough treatment.  Sure enough:* The shutter cover has often stuck open or shut.* Sometimes it refuses to start at all.* It sometimes powers on as you're putting it into your pocket, which opens the barrel which has got to damage the camera.* Finally, the LCD stopped working altogether.  This is after 8 months.Casio has decided I'm not under warranty (no explanation as to why, no phone number to argue with them), and is charging me $97 to repair it.Don't be seduced! It's a poor quality product</review_text>
PLEASE BE AWARE OF THIS CAMERA'S SHOCK SENSITIVITYI was pretty happy with this all-in-one compact camera until it had to be repaired for the SECOND time. It's sensitivity to vibration or a slight bump while the lens is out is way too sensitive for the real world. The result is it loses it's ability to focus and zoom. It didn't help that it commonly powered on while in a pocket, with the lens protruding, thereby causing unintentional harm to the lens assembly.The first time it happened Casio repaired it under warranty. The second time it was outside of warranty and the repair center wanted $137 to repair it - that's more than 1/3 the original purchase price. I won't reinvest in a weak product. I'd rather put that money into a new camera altogether</review_text>
Just for the record, my lens has frozen as many others have complained on this and earlier Casio models. Presently in Iraq, I do want to have a camera with me, but am not inclined to send it back in view of the reports of poor customer service. Sad. It looked to be a great camera</review_text>
I love Canon products and I have had a complete Canon system for about 10 years.   I love everything Canon does.  However I do not understand Canon's reasoning behind producing this lens.The reason for the EF-S lenses is offering wider angle by getting the rear elements of a lens closer to the "film" plane.  They cannot do this on film and full frame sensor cameras because the mirror is larger and would hit the rear elements of an EF-S lens.They have indicated, however, that by 35 mm that advantage is gone.   Why then do they produce a 60 mm Macro lens when they already have their macro requirements covered with they current three lenses?   I would guess that the short back focus makes the lens cheaper; but this lens is only $60 short of the excellent 100 f2.8 USM Macro.As I said, if for $60 I can get a lens that has 40 mm more reach (66 in 1.6crop cameras; useful in macro photography) and that works on ALL CANON CAMERAS, I'm not going to be thinking about this lens at all.Granted, you might not be thinking of buying a FF camera anytime soon, but Canon has indicated that eventually they will have FF on all their DSLR's, so why bother with this lens?The 17-85 or 10-22 are very reasonable offerings for the EF-S lineup, but the 60mm macro doesn't make any sense to me.my $0.0</review_text>
After reading the many good reviews here, I too bought the Lenmar battery to act as a second battery for my Canon digital camera.  I was totally pleased with the excellent performance as many others have noted.  The only difference I noticed between the Lenmar and OEM battery was that with lengthy continuous shooting with the LCD screen on the camera case got significantly hotter with the Lenmar battery that with the OEM.  This was not a problem until I was shooting on a 101 degree day (with the Lenmar battery in) and suddenly the screen went black.  I could view previously taken pictures (LCD OK) but any new photo I tried to take was black. I read later in the manual the upper operating temperature of the camera is 104 degrees.  Once the camera cooled it worked again for a while, but the black photo problem continued intermittenly for a few weeks then the camera completely stopped taking photos, no matter what.  So, was it the Lenmar battery's extra heat generation pushing the camera over its temperature limit and damaging the circuitry?  Would it have happened if the cooler running OEM battery was installed on the hot day?  I can't say for sure, but if you use a Lenmar battery I would be careful about operating it on a very hot 100 degree day (e.g. use the viewfinder, not the LCD since that generates heat, or turn the camera off a lot to cool down between shots).</review_text>
I have had this camera since Jan '05 and have so far taken approximately 10,000 shots while on trips and at weddings.Don't expect much from it and you will be happy. As an entry level DSLR it does what it's supposed to do in ideal conditions. I find it's strength is in taking people photographs in bright light, provided that they are not moving.Cons:In landscape photography this camera is lacking - both due to inadequate megapixels and it's inability to capture the natural blues and greens very well.Battery dies FAST. The battery I got with it hardly lasts a whole day of shooting, especially when shooting in RAW mode. I have yet to fill up a 1Gig card when shooting in RAW mode(Approx 150 shots) before the battery dies. Surprisingly when shooting jpegs, I get more shots per charge(Over 300) but hardly enough to last a day. I cannot tell you the number of times the battery has died on me while I was out on a hike. So I always carry a backup film camera (my trusty Elan 7).The viewfinder is very dim. When I look through my Elan 7 and then through the 300D, it is painfully obvious how dark the image is through the 300D's viewfinder. In indoor situations with low light this becomes a handicap, especially when having to resort to manual focus.Autofocus in low light for the 300d is terrible. When shooting indoors, the autofocus hunts and ends up focusing on something behind your intended subject. I have lots of beautiful photos of walls and sconces in the background in sharp focus while the people standing in front in the middle of the frame are an out of focus blur. This is despite having a 420Ex Flash on my camera that uses an infrared beam to assist with the focus.The 420EX flash is supposed to "talk" to the camera and adjust the power in order to ensure the subjects are not over or under exposed. However, with the 300d, this is a crap shoot at best and many of my indoor shots are over/under exposed.After about five months, the shutter button started sticking. I would click it and then it would remain depressed. The shutter button would only pop back up after I jiggled it a little.Another annoying thing about the camera is that the settings are displayed on the rear of the camera and not on the top beside the shutter button. And since there is only one thumbwheel, it is not easy to change aperature and shutter speed. For example, if you use the thumbwheel to change the aperature, then to change the shutter speed you would have to press another button while at the same time turning the thumbwheel. When you take thousands of shots over the life of the camera, this is a real annoyance.So would I recommend this camera:If you are a casual point and shoot person, it's an affordable entry into DSLRs that produces decent photos. But if you plan on shooting a lot indoors or want to take landscape photographs that can actually convey the colors accurately, look elsewhere</review_text>
Hey this is for everyone buying cameras over the world out of the united states, I have a problem with my camera and I don't have anyone to help, I've been trying some help in amazon's help area but they just have thousands of links but any simple email where I can ask for some help, I don't really understand why is this site so well known on &quot;customer service&quot;, but I just cannot communicate with no one in the company to ask anything, I'm just mad about this, if anyone can help me to contact amazon or fujifilm please post an email or whatever cause there's no such a thing like help in the &quot;help area&quot;. I need to repair my LCD monitor of my camera, it's really fragile, so if you're still thinking on buying in this site or even buying something from fujifilm, don't do it, they don't care about the customer satisfaction at all</review_text>
The camera worked perfectly for one week and then stopped working permanently. I just sent it off for repairs and have not received a diagnosis as to the root of the problem</review_text>
I received this filter and it had been used, seals were open and case that holds filters cracked, piece of plastic floating loose inside, smug marks on it. I was shocked, I order from amazon all the time and never had anything show up like this.</review_text>
When I opened the package, I found the filter box seals (one at each side) were broken, an indication that it was not new. I thought it's ok as long as the glass is clean and clear. When I opened the filter box, three pieces, the ring, the glass and the circular clamp, jumped out. While it's bad sign, I still thought it's ok as long as I could put them together. Well, the glass was not clear, as if it was sanded in the middle with a fine sand paper (I never saw any filter or lens in that shape  before!). Before to ship it back, I did try to put three pieces togather (so next person will not see these pieces jump out when open the box). Guess what, the circular clamp was about 2-3mm longer and two ends couldn't meet!!! I couldn't image any scenario under which this could happen, since it was from Amazon, not from some unknowns of eBay (actually, any eBayer will have to worry about the Feedback). I was really shocked that Amazon shipped that garbage to its customer!Hope this is just a random incident and Amazon does have a very easy return practice. Otherwise, I would not buy anything from Amazon</review_text>
I picked this up with a music order for my 350d - big mistake.  The class came chipped, scratched and smuged; Tiffen filters are of very poor quality.Do yourself a favor, like I did, and find your local camera supply store and pick up an optical grade filter for maybe, oh, 10 dollars more.  This Tiffen one was so bad that the scratches made their way onto some shots and ruined an entire day of shooting</review_text>
DO NOT buy the case Canon sells for this camera. It takes 20 seconds to take the camera out or put it in</review_text>
They tell you tha this product holds 6AA batteries, and works with the 20D's battery grip, but when I received the item it is for a completely different product and DOES NOT WORK with the 20D's BG-E2 grip.  It has the product name of CPM-E3, just as stated...but it accepts 8 AAA batteries and doesn't even come close to working with the BG-E2.</review_text>
As a professional photographer, I find myself going through 5-6 of these cords each year. My equipment is my livelyhood and although  it is used often, I am exceptionally careful with all of my gear and do not bang it around or abuse it.  I use a stroboframe which makes it necessary to use this cord to raise the flash well above the focal plane of the camera.  These cords are very expensive to get just a few months out of them.  Eventually, the hot shoe connector will either become loose and the connection will no longer function or the plastic connector will break and your flash unit will fall to the ground. (This has happened twice to me and fortunately I was able to catch the flash unit!)The cord is indespensible if you need it, but contact Canon USA and ask them to reengineer this cord or expect to replace them every few months</review_text>
I am on my third off-camera cord (about one per year).  Two have broken.  As other reviewers noted, the four screws under the metal retaining clip on the "female" end of the cord loosen and eventually fail.I have found that a thin narrow knife can be used to remove the black "spring" cover over the screws on the shoe.  You can then tighten the screws with a screwdriver.  If you use Locktite on the screws then they will not loosen.  Canon should do this at the factory.I use this cord with a Stroboframe "portrait/landscape" grip which raises the flash over the camera by six inches thus eliminating red eye and providing a much more pleasing light.  The stroboframe grip comes with the right size threaded screw for this cord.When my cords failed I lost the extended-through the lens metering just like another reviewer noted.I am not a professional photographer and only use the camera occasionally yet the cord still fails.  Canon should re-engineer this cord to make it more durable.Unfortunately, I do not believe that there are alternative cords. It looks like I will need to keep buying Canon cords</review_text>
I have been using this cord for about a year, and I had problems with its durability.  It actually worked fine for a for the first 5 months, but then it started to fall apart.  When mounted on the hotshoe of my flash bracket, the thin plastic shoe (where the flash is attached to) developed a crack and eventually broke off, making it useless to mount the flash.  I had to buy a replacement part from Canon (who charged me $16 for this small plastic piece).  I flipped the flash carefully from then on, but then it still cracked!!  I wrote to Canon and asked them to reinforce the bottom maybe made of metal instead of thin plastic. So far, there is no response.  A few months later, the cord, for some unknown reason, makes my 550ex flash switch from the ETTL to TTL mode, and making the flash fire at full power, overexposing  the entire image.  I checked the flash by putting it directly on the camera's hotshoe, and the flash worked fine, switching back to the ETTL mode.  For a piece of equipment from Canon, it's hard to imagine it giving so many problems. It's like they only paid tons more attention to their cameras than their accessories.  As there are no other OEM manufacturers of this cord, I am forced to get another one and hope for the best.</review_text>
Over 90% of pictures I took by this Canon are blurry. No way can you fix it. I really got fed up with it. Waist your money. Waist your time. More important, waist your precious moments!</review_text>
I have known Canon to be a very high quality company. However, I was deeply shocked and disappointed to find that this camera fails to meet the expectations I had about this camera. A few years ago I bought the Fujiffilm 3800. I loved this camera but after a few ski trips I found it rather bulky. I then bought the Canon S500 becaus of its small size and after many good reviews about the S400. For most of the pictures I take on a ski trip this camera is fine. However, if you are taking pictures other than outdoors in the daytime, this camera is worse than a disposable camera. First, there is no red-eye reduction. It simply does not work when I set it to take flash with red-eye reduction. Second, pictures taken at dusk or dawn come out blurry. I would speculate that the shutter speed is way too slow and you would need a tripod. Third, night picture?....Forget about it. I tried to get a beatiful picture of the Chicago skyline but the picture was underexposed. So, I tried the manual mode and played with the exposure settings and I could not get a setting that would produce non-blurry pictures. Looks like I'll be back in the market for a Fujifilm. After all the reviews I've read, I'm waiting for the other shoe to drop (E18, LCD, etc.). Not to mention the terrible service that I have been reading about</review_text>
After just over a year, my lens jammed and the display read "e18".  So I was pretty upset to discover that this is an extremely common defect - and a defect that Canon refuses to admit.  Try Googling Canon S500 e18", and you'll see what I meant.Don't buy it unless you want a very expensive paperweight</review_text>
1 year old... 3 e18 errors   2 battery erros   shipped back for service 4 times!   search the net for e18 before you buy!</review_text>
I purchased the canon powershot s500 digital elph last March. I kept getting blurry pictures so I called Canon technical support. They went through the whole procedure to make sure my camera was all set up. Well I followed their directions but everything was the way it should have been. So they said I should send it in because there was obviously a problem with it. Then I sent it in and had to pay for the shipping there. They sent it back and said they had switched out some optical thing. Well I just finally went to get my pictures developed and they all have the same problem. They never fixed the problem. Mind you this was the approximately 9 months of my son's life before the age of 2. I called tech support and ended up having to wait more than 24 hours for a call back from a supervisor. She said they would send me pre paid envelope to check out the camera. Well I was greatful and had to tell her that during babysitting in late August a little boy had dropped my camera so there was damage to the outside part of the camera, but it did not effect the quality of the pictures because they were the same as prior to the day it was dropped. She said that they would probably not cover it due to the fact that it might have been caused by the dropped camera. I told I have proof of when it happened and that the pictures prior to that date are coming in blurry just like it was before I sent it in the first time. I started to cry that my son's 9 months are all ruined and she was practically laughing when I got off the phone. The camera is worse than a disposable camera. Don't waste your time or money on this piece of junk. I recommend Olympus. My Olympus prior to this was only 3 megapixels and was better quality than this piece of junk. I am planning on contacting the Better Business Bureau regarding this matter. Please don't waste your time on this, like I have to! I hope this helps people make better choices! Good luck! I wish someone could have forecasted this for me</review_text>
Don't buy this camera!!!  Prone to "Memory Error" & E18 errors after warranty is up.  Cost min $150 plus shipping to fix.This camera was great until 23 months went by then I started mysteriously losing pictures due to file format errors.  I switched memory cards and it happened again.  Then the "memory error" displayed after a month or so of losing pictures.  Now it doesn't work at all.  I called canon to see what type of service could be provided and if they would fix what appears to be a factory defect since so many people have reported this problem.  Minimum cost is $150 or I could upgrade to a refurb S500 for $199 w/6 month warranty.  They have to be kidding, $250 get me a new one.  For what appears to be common problem I was expecting more from canon.  Guess I won't be buying another canon.Google this "Canon "Memory Error" E18" and see for yourself that Canon cameras have problems.</review_text>
The Powershot A520 On Switch stopped working right after I started using the camera</review_text>
For average people who want a camera that just works-and takes good pics you should not buy this. I don't know about the specifics, but like other reviewers mine got stuck and quit working for no reason after a couple of months. So, I don't really see what all the bells and whistles are for if it doesn't even take a picture. It was fine while it worked, it ate batteries but the pics were good</review_text>
I have owned several Canon digital cameras and like them very much.  I purchased the A520 as a gift for a family member.  After several months the lens cover problem that everyone writes about started happening.  It would stick paritally open or closed or all the way open.  The key word being stick or stuck.  I took it to a Canon Service Center and they repaired it under warranty.  After trying to use it for the 1st time several weeks later the lens cover was stuck open and would not budge.  I took it back to the Service Center and they repaired it again.  While looking at the paperwork after the repair they stated courtesy repair only and not under warranty.  It was under warranty and had 90 days from the date they did not repair it the first time.  After emailing Canon they said to just email them if I have a problem and they would see what they could do.  Very POOR.  I like Canon digital cameras but wish I had never purchased the A520.  I bought it because of it's low price, which was a big mistake</review_text>
This is my third digital camera, I bought it after my tot dunked my previous camera under water.   I did a lot of research before I bought this and it was highly rated in Consumer Reports.After a few months of ok pictures (the macro setting is not very good though) the lens cover started sticking but I learned to live with it.  I would manually open up the lens cover each time.  Then the lens cover got stuck in the open position and I was learning to live with that.   But now the camera is almost completely dead.  It will not power up properly and sometimes it beeps.  I'm not sure but I think I am out of the warranty period with this.I will not buy another Canon Camera.  This camera was made too cheaply.  I wish things were not made to break right away</review_text>
I bought this camera on the recommendation of a store technician over another HP digital.  The camera has spent as much time in the repair shop as it has being used.  The delay between pictures is incredibly long.  The lens/shutter doesn't open properly.  (Two other family members who own Powershot A520's are having the same problems</review_text>
This gets 1 star for the simple fact that it doesn't seem to fit my Mark II body properly.</review_text>
OK, maybe a 1 star is actually fair since my nose doesn't smudge the LCD screen as much.  The MOST annoying thing for me is it constantly falls off the camera.  Both my 30D and Rebel XT.  If I am lucky enough it will fall off, get lost and eventually I will not be reminded I wasted money on this accesory</review_text>
I wear glasses and press against the viewfinder as hard as I can to help keep the shot stable (I shoot birds at 700mm). The first thing my friend and I did was to compare two identical lenses/cameras etc. - one with, one without, the extender.Result: - the image appeared the same size, and the extender slightly blurred the image. In other words - completely useless</review_text>
Yes, it does provide a bit more eye relief, and can make it easier to see the whole frame (by making it smaller), BUT there is a major problem with this.  The eyepiece lens surface will not be as deeply couched in the rubber trim when you use this, and the result is a lot more reflections flashing around in the eyepiece when you have light behind you.  This is especially a problem when you are wearing glasses.</review_text>
Im not from USA. My brother bought me the camara in a trip three months ago and it is not working!! It has serious conection problems in the body that I cant fix in my country. I lost 1000 US</review_text>
The frame and the pictures it displays are fine.  Sometimes it is a little hard to get it to download photos from my PC.  My major complaint is the power supply.  The original power supply dies after 4 months.  It was repalced under warranty (after some grief with customer service).  The raplacement died some months later after the warranty had expired.  I then had to buy one.  That one died after a few months and the company didn't have the replacement in stock.  After months of waiting from them to stock the item I gave up and after lots of searching on the web I found a supply made by another compay.  I had to change the connector to make it match the connector on the frame.  It's been doing fine since then.  I should note that my daughter has the same frame and has had almost identical problems.  It looks like there are a lot more of these types of frames on the market now.  I would do a lot of shopping before buying this one</review_text>
A great idea poorly executed.  The construction is cheap.  The screen is marginal at best.  But worst of all, it refuses to recognize any of the 3 digital cameras I have on hand or a USB card reader.A piece of junk that I am now returnin</review_text>
The 5x7 digital photo frame from Pacific Digital is very cheaply made, the lcd is very dark and flickers constantly.</review_text>
I purchased the 8 X 10 Photo Frame as a way to display photos at my wedding reception and planned to use it in my home thereafter.  I was able to get the product running and to load a 'test' set of pictures, but the product then 'froze' at the startup screen.  I checked the Pacific Digital support website, which provided steps (basically, a sequence of buttons to hold down) to 'unfreeze' and reinitialize the unit.  I tried this sequence several times, to no avail, and then called Pacific Digital customer service.  After repeated messages left on a voice mail system ("we're sorry we missed your call - we'll get back to you") at all times of the day and night, I was unable to contact anyone at the company and no calls were ever returned.  Long story short - our wedding came and went, the problem was never (and will apparently never be) resolved, and the Digital Photo Frame is now a $390 paperweight.  Absolutely useless.  My recommendation: DO NOT PURCHASE A PACIFIC DIGITAL PRODUCT.  This is clearly a fly-by-night outfit</review_text>
The charger unit or the batteries (or both) don't work right: I use the batteries one at a time, in rotation to power my Zen MP3 player. Sometimes I put discharged batteries in the charger, plug it in, the light blinks red, then goes off.  Only supposed to show either red (discharged, charging) or green (fully charged.)  This morning 3 batteries show fully charged, I take one out, it is discharged. All these problems happened with a first unit, I returned it to Monster and after they took their sweet time, got a replacement which works just as erratically. Monster's stuff looks good, but it is the last time I am going to buy their brand</review_text>
It looks great, genuine leather, much better than synthetic. Like a brand named leather wallet. But there is no where you can tie the case to the camera. Hence you have to hold onto it with another hand when you pull the camera out to take photos.  There is no where to put the essential accessories (battery and another memory stick). There is no way to clip to the belt. Will like to return if if not the hassle of mailing and the associated cost. Bought another handy synthetic case afterwards</review_text>
Im not from USA. My brother bought me the camara in a trip three months ago and it is not working!! It has serious conection problems in the body that I cant fix in my country. I lost 1000 US</review_text>
I bought this camera in february, and after taking 6 shots the camera almost died, I could review the photos I had taken, but when switched the dial to take photos the camera turned out black either the LCD/EFV, and only turned off when I removed batteries, I sent it to Fuji repair center, and got it back again almost one month later. then six months later the camera did exactly same thing, I haven't received my camera back yet, But I'm sure never will buy a Fuji camera again and of course my camera will died again in the next months after I get from the repair center and at the end of the day I will have wasted almost 500 dlls</review_text>
Very disappointed by Canon on the fit of this adapter.Adapater and shade attachments block camer lens view andcreate flash shadows</review_text>
Gosh, i would really like to review this adapter, but---Amazon has put my order on indefinate hold, as thier supplier is unable to get any more.But wait! What's that blurb on the product page -"Availability: Ususally ships within 24 hours" and "Want it delivered Tomorrow? Order it in the next 5 hours and 36 minutes, and choose One-Day Shipping at checkout. See details."So they can't deliver it, yet they still list it as available for delivery tomorrow? Don't order from Amazon</review_text>
There's little more to say....great item, almost a "must have", but forty bucks for a half ounce of plastic is absolutely criminal</review_text>
I purchased a 510 PowerShot in summer of 2005. After couple time of use the zoom on the cameras lens wouldn't work anymore. I cound't take any picture anymore. I contacted Canon over this and they ask me to pay shiping to send the camera to them to fix.</review_text>
I admit that I'm far from an expert on digital cameras. I did take over 32,000 photographs with 35mm cameras for over 20 years.I purchased a 510 PowerShot in July of 2005. It wasn't too long before the zoom on the cameras lens wouldn't work. I contacted Canon over this and can you believe this company had the audacity to charge ME for shipping THEIR faulty camera back to them. I can understand them saying, 'we'll charge you at first, BUT once we establish that the fault is due to us, we'll then reimburse you back.'I enclosed a type written letter with the camera asking that Canon contact me when they received my camera (in the mail) and I also asked that they contact me when it was being shipped back. (I also emailed them the same request). Neither of my wishes was ever fulfilled on Canon's behalf.That in itself was enough for me and I've been bitter about that ever since. I've also told every person that I've met who wanted to buy a digital camera about this incident. I'm pleased to say, I've steered most away from this company.What else can I say about this camera:This camera is slow at times after its taken a picture. I've missed out on some good shots due to this.It eats batteries like there's no tomorrow so one MUST have rechargeable AA's to even make this camera worth its while.I've not used other digital cameras so maybe they are all this way but if I take a 3 minute movie (with this camera) in my home during the day and go outside, most things outside are VERY WHITE. Almost like looking at an infra red photograph.When filming outside, when one goes inside during the day, everything is dark. Like I said, maybe all digital cameras are this way?I wouldn't recommend this camera or anything that Canon makes if you want my personal opinion. Think about that. You have to pay the shipping for a camera that's barely a few months old and still UNDER warranty. That's disgusting, that's all I have to say.There should be a ZERO for this, not a 1 star</review_text>
I agree with M. Arse with the 2star rating. I was disappointed with this camera from the beginning. Not a user friendly one and the pictures turn out very grainy with bad color quality unless you are in an optimum light. I'm interested in the 7 Mp camera Canon offers. I've read that it has much better shutter speed. Recommended??</review_text>
I have owned this camera for about a year and I have never really enjoyed it.  For a point and shoot it is bad, it takes pictures way too slowly and I often miss out on a good shot.  It is also not as user friendly as I would have hoped it to be with so many scene settings.  While I enjoy some of them, most of the time my pictures turn out grainy (in low light), whitewashed (with flash) or blurry (of even slowly moving objects).  I have tried changing the exposure time and shutter speed to counter some of these things, but I rarely get a good picture when I need it.  I never had these problems with my ELPH s200.  This camera is also a lot more bulkier as well, and the cover over the lens has started to stick so that it does not fully open when turned on. If given the option I would not buy this camera again</review_text>
I've had the A510 for about six months and have been pleasantly surprised by the ease of use and reasonable picture quality for a 3.2M camera.After six months the lens and cover have jammed and I noticed that many Amazon reviewers have had the same issue. One evening I took several pictures and the next morning the camera would not operate.I'm hoping the service center can provide me better service than some of the reviewers.</review_text>
I paid extra for Air Next Day service.  Item was advertised as available and ready to ship immediately.  Item eventually arrived two weeks later.  I had left for a trip.  Item was eventually sent back to merchant.  Merchant didn't credit me for item returned.  I had to email merchant and wait for another 2 weeks before item was credited.  I won't buy from Willoughby's again</review_text>
I bought this camera two years ago, the pictures were always perfect, even though from the sixth month it started getting stains everywhere, but then i found out that it was normal, not good but it usually happens to this cameras. But the worst of all is tha fact that it displays the Error 18 (E18), the lens gets stock and the camera won't work at all. I searched in google about it, because the user guide says nothing about this error, and then I read many reviews that said that there was nothing to do about it and many Canon cameras have the same defect... I am really mad and dissapointed on CANON, i will never buy a camera of this brand, and I wouldn't recommend it, unless you are willing to buy a camera for 2 years or LESS and then throw your money to the trash</review_text>
When I received the camera I thought of giving it a 5 star because the good looking and nice picture.After 6 months use, I wish I could give it a 0 star. It's true it looks good but it's very hard to hold the camera. It droped twice when i took pictures. Also the lens is too small. The dirt is very easy to get onto the lens and very hard to clean b/c it's small. Thanks the dirty lens, the picture quality is worse than ever.The battery is very small too. After 6 months use, it can not hold enought power to shoot 10 pictures!They have to put the buttons here and there to fit the small space. It's not a user friendly camera.</review_text>
SD110 NOT A GOOD DIGITAL CAMERA. BETTER YET FIND SOMETHING ELSE. I'VE HAD THIS CAMERA ALMOST A YEAR BUT I JUST SELDOM USE IT BECAUSE THE RESULT OF THE PICTURES ARE VERY DISAPPOINTING. IT IS JUST FINE DOWNLOADING THEM ON THE INTERNET BUT WHEN YOU HAVE IT PRINTED ON THE PAPER, THE PICTURES GET BLURRED. NOW,IM LOOKING FOR ANOTHER DIGICAM THAT WON'T DISAPPOINT ME</review_text>
It's unfortunate that one of the best lens bargains out there is followed up by one of the worst photo ripoffs -- this hood.  How can you pay $75 for a great prime lens, and $25 for a flimsy piece of plastic to cover it</review_text>
Boy, this is way too much to pay for a hood on this lens.  It's a great a lens, but this is hardly worth the price</review_text>
The camera case only works if you wear a belt-- there is no clip on. The case itself holds only the camera, not even space for a spare battery or memory card. (I've heard the case will darken your camera, but I didn't end up using the case). The neck strap is not useful, it's too long. At '34 inches, if you're not careful you could swing your camera into something and break it. (The Canon Camera rocks, however.</review_text>
A close friend made the unfortunate mistake of plunking down 2 grand for this camera.  Honestly Olympus produces cameras that can do the same thing for $400.  I've used hers and the image quality is horrible and the colours are wrong 9 times out of 10.  If you're going to spend that much on a camera, get the D70 instead and buy a nice extra lens or some other gadgets to go with.  The pictures are better and it offers more MP</review_text>
This camera will probably go down in Nikon's history as one of its most over-priced  and disappointing cameras. I bought mine through Amazon from Calumet in January 2003. From the start, the colors never looked right, especially the ghastly magenta-toned skin tones.  I also bought the SB800s (3 of them), thinking the CLS would be a great addition. But the system uses IR and is unreliable in any situation except very tight environments.The camera has a wonderful feel, viewfinder and reasonably good controls. But the results are disappointing. The sensor is undersized for this class of camera and considering what its competition (Canon) offers. Nikon finally realized this and on Dec. 13 decided to dump all these cameras by lowering the price $1,200. It just so happened mine was in Melville, N.Y., with a long list of issues to be repaired while it was still under warranty. These include bad AF performance since upgrading to V2 of the firmware, bad color, overexposure, blurry images with the VR lens and inconsistent color balance from frame to frame even when using a preset value.I would strongly suggest that you don't buy this camera and thereby reward Nikon for producing an inferior product originally sold at a ridiculous price for what it offers. Indeed, forget Nikon and go to Canon</review_text>
Good: Motor drive speed.  Grip feel. Takes Nikon lenses.  Reacts fast to pressing the shutter release.Bad: Skin tone renditions a color other than skin.  White balance doesn't balance well. Noise at anything above ISO 200, looks like 3200. CF card door tough to open. Screen fogs if you breathe when you shoot. Battery cover is not part of the battery.  Button placement not as intuitive as on the D100.  4.1MP allows for virtually no cropping of enlargements.Dumped mine a month after I got it</review_text>
While this lens has an attractive price tag, this lens has serious trouble with sharpness. Only at high shutter speeds (1/250 and above approx.) or with a good flash and middle apertures (f/8 to f/22 approx.) does it deliver sharp images. Horribly slow autofocus. I am already saving to buy and L-series or the IS USM version</review_text>
I found the product to be made very poorly....all it too is one drop on the floor and the camera battery door cracked and that was is for the camera too....NOT A KID friendly camera at all</review_text>
I bought this for my 8 year old daughter to begin learning about digital photography. It has been nothing but a headache from day one. We have yet to be able to download any pictures. All of the endless number of pictures she has taken have been erased before we can download them. The one button mode is very confusing and the directions although written in English seem to be in a foreign language.  The directions say do not return to the store if you are having difficulties. You are suppose to call the phone #, but good luck getting through. I've tried for 2 days straight. They apparently are experiencing high call volume from all the other unhappy customers who were fooled into buying this "Educational camera".  As I am shopping for another camera, I will not buy anything from the company who manufactured this camera-  Sakar</review_text>
This camera is garbage. It was a disappointment for my son and a waste of my money. It was hard to figure out, it took lousy pictures, it burned through batteries. Avoid this camera. I just wish I could give it zero stars</review_text>
got this from toys-r-us for 35 dollars, it stopped working within a week,if there was a rating less than one star I'd give it that, they should call it dummy - buyer - you've - been - conned camera ki</review_text>
I purchased this for my 4 year old son because he LOVES to take pictures.  I didn't want to spend a lot of money, however this product is way over priced for the quality and ease of use.  Not to mention after having it less than 24 hours it completely stopped working.  However, when it did work every single picture was blurry.  There is only one button for every option and it is very confusing.  I wouldn't recommend this product to anyone.  It is being returned</review_text>
This camera was a pain to pick the mode to get the camera to work.  It's batteries died all the time and lost all of the pictures.  When you did get a picture loaded on the computer the software was terrible.  We trashed it within 2 weeks of purchasing</review_text>
i had just recently bought this camera, and it was OK. the quaility of the pictures was pretty ok. i couldnt really understand it, and what really stinks is that i lost the stupid CD that comes with it and now i cant install it. overall i would say that the camera is a stinky peice of JUNK. now im begging my parent to buy me a REALL DIGITAL CAMERA!!not a peice of crap.</review_text>
was dropped onece and it broke. Computer doen't recongise software with windows xp. kids were disappointed they couldn't see there pictures. Called the company and they were no help</review_text>
We bought three of these for Christmas presents and two of them stopped working already.  They won't turn on at all.  One of them broke almost immediately, and Philips sent a refurbished unit to replace it.  That one is now broken, too.  The units have not been dropped or mistreated in any way.</review_text>
Up to you, but I would buy a generic branded battery of the same type (Lithium BP522).  I bought a generic battery and it works just as well -- saved me $50</review_text>
This one is a product of bad quality, the cap of the batteries to a few days I damage enough of light is needed in order that the sign meets slightly clear, product of bad quality I do not recommend it to him(you,them) and for quality the price must be low</review_text>
Well at least, some stuff is cool, free cam bag, the pics come out excellent. The video feature is really crappy and when you play back video its very choppy and the audio is a little hard to know whats being heard. Also you could through dozens of batteries with this cam. The adapter doesnt help only if youre going to sit down and review whats on it or keep the power from draining. The sd card kept popping out for someone which caused the cam to "freeze up".Bottom line...I recommend at least researching other brands of mini-tapeless cams...but this one...isnt worth 159 or whatever. Its trash. Go for something else</review_text>
Not too long after I purchased this camera the screen turned white when I turned it on. I would turn it off and on and nothing would help. Finally I would take the batteries out and put them back in. This seemed to fix the problem a few times. After that I thought it was just operator error. But it wasn't. The camera finally gave out and the white screen never went away. So after being annoyed I left the camera alone for awhile. An event came up about a month later. I got my camera and tried to turn it on. Nothing happened. So I changed the batteries. Still nothing happened. I'm not sure what happened. I do believe I purchased a LEMON camera. I'm hoping to resolve these issues with Samsung. It was one of the cheapest cameras on the market at the time. So I guess you get what you pay for!</review_text>
I guess I really shouldn't complain because my husband won the camera in an office rally. But the pictures it takes are disgraceful for a Samsung product every two to three pictures are blurred unrecognizably-where you can't even tell what you have taken. If you have found yourself among the fortunate few who actually found success with this camera thank your lucky stars. Even if it is a less expensive choice versus the other cameras on the market today spend the extra money it would be worth it not to miss any family moments like my family did,on this useless piece of CRAP</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my 13-yr old daughter as her first digital camera. It was a Christmas present so I am highly dissapointed that 3 months after purchase, the flash stopped working. The picture quality was good but it hardly makes up for the fact that she can no longer take photo's indoors or in low light. I would not recommend this camera.</review_text>
I thought I was ordering the right size batteries, but I found out too late this was not the case. Now I am unable to get full credit for them when I return them</review_text>
I only wish I had read the previous review before I bought this item.  I too was trying to convert my Hi8 tapes to digital format using the pass-through on my Sony MiniDV handycam.  I bought this way-too-expensive cable, mostly because it was the only option available.  It seems ridiculous to me that a cable should cost as much as a low-end disk drive or graphics card, considering the technology involved in those devices.But my real problem is with the failure of Sony to reveal that the S-video connection is useless for input.  This information is nowhere on the package, nor is it on their website.  There IS a notice saying "please make sure this cable is compatible with your camcorder before you purchase".  You can't read that warning when buying online, and if buying at a store, there's no way to know what's compatible because they don't include a list of compatible camcorders on the package. I guess they assume everyone will run home and check their website, then come back to the store and buy it, instead of just buying it and seeing if it works.There is a section of the Handycam manual describing how one might record from another video device using a cable such as this one, however they fail to mention that the SONY cable won't work, despite the premium price they charge.  If the problem is that they couldn't make it work with both a composite and S-video cable, then they should have just made it work for S-video, since a composite cable comes with the camera.Shame on you, Sony, for adding a little aggravation to my day, and shame on you for creating yet another proprietary communications standard that allows you to rake us over the coals when we need to buy accessories supporting that standard.  It's enough to make me want to buy a Canon camcorder (I buy Canon digital cameras precisely because I don't want to submit to proprietary Sony standards like MemoryStick).Rant over.</review_text>
Conclusions:To start from the end I got the Xacti CA6, tested it and returned it. Here are the pros and cons.Pros -1. Very small, just put in your pocket and go2. Easy and simple controls3. Super fast start up from sleep mode4. Good video quality when lighting conditions are good5. the ability to take stills while in video mode (I had no issue with the video pausing, no way around that)6. You get video and 6mp stills in one device for a reasonable price7. SD card that records for a long time8. Easy transfer to computer for editingCons -1. Indoor video unacceptable, although the video is brighter the ones my Sony digicam takes, it is extremely grainy (more so than my Sony digicam videos!!)2. Super slow zoom when in video mode3. In good lighting it is very difficulty to take stills that are not blurry (especially when trying to capture a kid on the move, for scenery it might be OK)4. In low lighting stills are unusable (even at short distance) due to a very, very weak flash.5. Red eye almost every time the flash works6. Strap is a joke7. No lens coverSo in short, on paper this camera is great, I love having the SD format rather than tape or DVD, the size is amazing and the ability to take both video and stills at a high resolution is priceless.But....the stills are useless both in good and bad lighting (see above) and the video is usable only if shot in very good lighting conditions (for a new dad that shoots many videos indoors this is impractical).This camera is only for outdoor people who shoot in good lighting conditions and have a very very steady hand (for taking stills). For almost everyone else it is not adequate, I will have to compromise on having both a dedicated still camera and a miniDV camcorder  (going for the Elura 100).....Ya, I know people told me that this was the best option beforehand, I was hoping to prove them wrong....; - (</review_text>
In an email, Adorama specified that the filter diameter was, "28mm." On the amazon.com website is states that the same filter is a 55mm filter mounting! Either they don't know their products or they don't care about the customers. Now I have to return it because of faulty information they supplied. Please beware that their shipping charges equal approximately 25% of the purchase price - an amount I feel is beyond absurd. I can buy this locally for a lot less (even though I would have to pay sales tax). Buyer beware</review_text>
My cannon died the day before my daughters birthday so I ran out and tried a bunch of cameras in the morning and bought one.  Although this camera is 6 mp, my 3.0 Cannon took much clearer pictures.  I have had this camera for 9 months and I am sending it in for the second time for repair.  First the power button stopped working, and then on Easter (something about holidays) all of the functions of the buttons switched.  When I pushed delete, the menu came up.  Even the mode selector wasn't working.  It was reviewing the pictures in all three modes.  I will say that sony support online is very helpful, but I need something more reliable.  I am done with this camera</review_text>
It worked fine the first week. Then the focus stopped working. I sent it to repair. It worked well for a couple of weeks and then the focus stopped working. I sent it for repair for the second time. It worked well for a couple of weeks and then stopped working. Also, it is impossible to contact the repair center or the customer relation center at SONY!!! They make you wait over an hour!!!Si if you want a camera for two of three weeks this is probably what you are looking for!!!Sony repair reference number: E3317596</review_text>
After a few months use the camera got persnickety, often demanding upon startup that I restart it. Now that the camera has completely broken down, with the lens fully extended and stuck in place, I think this was a sign of a too-delicate lens mechanism that was beginning to deteriorate. Another durability issue concerns the finish: the plastic coating on the 4-way rocker switch on the back that controls image review, flash, etc., quickly wore off, and there are other small scratches all over the body of the camera. Not a big deal in itself, but annoying given the other problem.The lens is prone to strange flaring, especially indoors, where lights in the room often up as large white blotches at various points of the frame. Several photos were ruined, or have required tedious photoshopping. Otherwise, the lens is fine and reasonably sharp, although nothing to write home about.The camera seems to hunt for autofocus lock more than some comparable models, e.g., Canon A610. Many frames are motion-blurred, as well. There are ways to avoid this, but I didn't buy a point-n-shoot with fiddly controls and menus in order to mess around with aperture-priority exposure, thank you.There are a few things to recommend it: Not only is it relatively inexpensive, it has a lens significantly wider than the competition--31 or 32mm equivalent vs. 35mm. Those few mm's make a big difference when you can't move back far enough to get everything in the frame. It is also quick in its operations (except when hunting for focus, see above.) The jpegs it cranks out are extremely colorful--bright red so much so that details sometimes seems to be lost--but generally everything looks good. Skintones are good.Still, with the durability issue, this one's not worth it. Lucky for me, unlike the other user who seemingly experienced the same type of breakdown, I did keep the receipt. Anyone wanna buy a memory stick pro duo</review_text>
Half of my pictures are out of focus making it useless.  Should have sent it back</review_text>
I made the mistake of ordering this camera to substitute buying a pro camera. The color and noise was terrible. If you want a great point and shoot camera get the Canon powershot s50 while they are still available. The camera has pro features, it was so good they stopped making it because it should have been in the pro camera line at a much higher price tag. If you want to see s50 pictures go to [...] and search my gallery Cathreen Styles. All most all of the pictures in the gallery were taken with the s50. I am going to buy another just to have when mine breaks. By the way, I did end up buy a pro camera, mainly because of the look. I got the Canon 30d and love it</review_text>
I purchased this camera based on previous good experience with an older model Fujifilm camera, reviews here, price and functions. At the same time, I also purchased the larger xD card. Almost out of the box, this camera has given me nothing but grief. What others had said about the blurry photos I can certainly echo. A month or so after purchase, the lens would not open, or it would not open totally. I first thought the batteries were dead and that was the cause....after changing the batteries, the problems still existed - SOME OF THE TIME. Not always - just sporadically. Just enough to cause me to miss many unique and memorable photo opportunities.In addition to that, now that I'm looking at other brands of cameras I find the xD card I purchased is not transferable so I'm out the cost of that as well. Another malfunction of this camera is after "erasing" all photos on the xD card, taking more photos and uploading the new photos, I found that all the photos originally erased were still there and uploaded again with the new ones? I don't know if that was a camera or memory card malfunction but it just added to my dislike of this camera.I would NOT recommend this camera to anyone....it's a total dud. I'm very disappointed with Fujifilm and am now looking at Nikon and Cannons. Good luck Fujifulm...you need it</review_text>
I was super-excited to get this camera, and very disappointed with it once I did.  The pictures are blurry far more often than not, even when resting the camera on a table or solid object.  Additionally, it's so slow at taking them that ANY movement (eyes blinking, etc) likes like a massive blur.  And the video skips all the time.  It just misses entire parts.  I would highly recommend NOT getting this camera.</review_text>
El producto es de muy bajas caracteristicas.Material barato, zoon de baja calidad, en otras palabras es sumamente inferior a otros equipos que he probado los cuales se encuentran en el mismo rango de precios.Kodak tiene una linea de Camaras econmicas las cuales paracen ser desechables.No lo recomiedo</review_text>
I just got this camera a week ago and thought it was great.  But today I tried to turn it on and it's completely dead!  I even changed out the batteries and it's still completely dead.  This is the first digital camera I've had and I bought it because I'm going to Europe (two days after it died).  Now I have to scramble to get a replacement before I take off.Grrrrr!!</review_text>
I bought a 743 for the wife for Christmas. I had a 6330 that I was very happy with. So a 743 should be better Right? Every time that she went to use it the batteries were dead. We finally figured out that a new set would go dead in two days without ever turning it on! After several e mails they told me to call service. I got someone in India that could not understand me and I had a really hard time figuring out what he was saying. They made it very dificult to get it sent in. I sent it in today, but I do not expect much from the example that their service has done so far. I hope it comes back at least.</review_text>
I purchased this item two weeks ago.  My thought was that it seemed like a reasonably priced, perfect addition to the "tools" necessary for a budding amateur backyard astronomy hobby (its advertised contents, construction, and "glow-in-the-dark" planisphere).  After closely examining the item for the past ten days, I'm forced to conclude that I was in error, and that you really do get what you pay for.  As Celestron is one of the most reputable names in astronomy, I must confess that I assumed that quality would follow in all products that bear their name.  I have found that this does not hold true in the case of these sky maps.  The major problem with the package is that it is rife with misspellings, letter transpositions, apparent omitted words, and just plain (what we used to call in the old days) "typographical errors."  Additionally, when I compare some of the technical information on the maps (i.e., star magnitudes, astronomical distances, etc.)and accompanying descriptions with other authoritative astronomy sources I have in my possession, I also find numerous apparent errors and discrepances.  When using a product like this, it is essential that one be able to trust the data and information it contains.  Since I'm not able to do this, I must rate this item with one star.  When I purchased the item, it was marked down by twenty percent.  I note that in less that two weeks since my purchase, the price has been further reduced by another thirteen percent.  In this case, don't be fooled (as I was) by an attractive price.  AVOID THIS PRODUCT. (I don't have a substitute to recommend at this time.)</review_text>
After a week the cammera did not work. The shop has a return police, but they did not send a RA number needed to return the item. They asked me an adress in the USA, and whwn I sent it they did nor answered. In my country, Argentina, the local distributor said the garantee is not valid for them</review_text>
With this pup it is simple to record video or images and almost impossible to download them successfully!  In standard mode, the playback of video is anything but smooth.  Looks like an old time movie.The software could best be described as, "User Hostile".  I haven't been able to download any videos without getting an error message before the transfer is complete.The normal video isn't as good as my DV camcorders and downright sad indoors.  The photo portion is slightly better than my cell phone (a pocket pc).  Still pictures haven't downloaded successfully either (approximately 11 out of 185 have made it across the wire before error messages start interrupting the transfer).It's a handy size and easy to operate.  After you're done recording you'll likely spend a lot of time with the manual (I have) and then you start getting frustrated.If I could return it, I would</review_text>
I am fascinated with this machine.   It has incredible detail although it lacks a little lattitude and details are lost as soon as there are some shadows.The battery so far usually lasts me the whole day when I go touring.   If I take care to shut the display down as soon as I dont need it anymore I find that when I am on a cruise ship or visiting another country I can take all the movies I usually want - - and recharge when I get back to my room at night.The only problem is playback on a TV or PC.   The bundled software made by ULEAD is not user friendly and, whereas the previous Xacti I had played back images and video clips in the order I had taken, this one separates  them and plays back either clips or images.   Before I played back through my Panasonic Hard Disk DVD recorder and recorded a DVD directly.   Now I have to go into my PC and do a whole lot of editing and so far the "Movie FActory" program keeps crashing.I imagine somebody will eventually suggest a better software program, or I will learn to use Ulead, but for the time being the pictures and clips Ihave taken have very good detail, and the machine has operated flawlessly.</review_text>
Great features, right?I just returned it after very disappointing results.Here are just a few issues:1. If you use a tripod (and you WILL need to), you can't plug in the AC adapter to save on the short battery life, because mounting it on to a tripod covers the access to the AC connection.2. Battery life is very short.3. If you want to protect the lens, you will need to buy the lens adapter and then buy a protective lens.4. You can't take still photos with the flash if you are using the lens adapter BECAUSE the adapter casts a shadow from the flash onto your pictures.5. The automatic settings are horrible. The auto focus, auto white balance, auto anything will give you the worst results if shooting indoors.6. You cannot adjust the manual focus or anything else once you begin recording.7. Quality is very poor when recording indoors without an enormous amount light.Save your money. Buy a camera with better features. I am waiting for the Panasonic HDC-SD1 due in March</review_text>
Should have listened to the reviewer before me.  Unit arrived dead.  Neither AC power or car charger worked.  Tried replacing the 4 batteries that came with it with my other known batteries and unit still did not work</review_text>
I have been working with this camera for about a year now, for product shots online, and while sometimes it takes great pics, many times the flash pops and whites out, or it goes off and you get a black picture. I take pictures of jewelry, and if I try to shoot a piece with green and blue coloration, the color is not accurate. Purple is another color this camera does not accurately pic up. While you can fiddle with 4 different picture taking settings, in all different modes, you'll never get the same picture twice, even saving the setting. The light has to be just so, to get a good shot. When it shoots clearly, it can take fabulous pictures, but often, pics are blurred as many others have said, when they actually come out. My old camera, the DSC P71 3.2 Megapixel is MUCH better, colors are accurate always, shooting is flawless and foolproof every time, AND the greatest feature is re-sizing your picture and trimming right on the camera before uploading. This feature is completely MISSING from the DSC P200, which was the biggest disappointment, as I figured it would be a given I didn't have to ask about when purchasing. Why would Sony eliminate this great function? Had I know that when the salesman at the large New York City Photo store told me this was the camera I dreamed of, I would not have bought it. I prefer also to use the rechargable AA batteries instead of the Lithium battery, which is super hard to load, and charging this camera is a nightmare with the charger it comes with. It is like a puzzle trying to get the charger inserted at just the right angle. Every time it takes me several minutes, and finding a good little wall charger for it is also a problem.I recently took this camera on vacation to take pics and get footage for burning to DVD. Sound quality is good, but video quality can be choppy, and the monitor did not let me even see that my setting was overexposed, so all my footage is somewhat overexposed for the entire trips shootings I made. The monitor, while big, does not show you always what you are shooting, whether a still, or movie picture. Overall, I would not recommend this camera and I actually bought a USED second of my old camera, and got my original repaired, because this one doesn't compare. This camera is a bit too complicated and not very user friendly. Even after using all this time, I STILL am not sure what I am going to get when I use this camera. I'd say the worst features to be aware of are for someone who needs accurate color, this camera clearly has trouble showing blue/green shades, and purples accurately, you can never show these colors are they are in life with this camera, and the lack of the "trimming" resizing feature, what was Sony thinking? Next time, I am trying something other than Sony Cybershot unless I hear they have gone back to making a great straightforward, uncomplicated easy to point and shoot camera. This one is definitely NOT</review_text>
I am still giving this camera 2 Stars because... I may have used the wrong settings when taking photo's.But... I ended up with "a lot" of blurred and fuzzy photo's. "example... when we went bowling, almost every photo was blurred or had those acid trip looking streaks."My Biggest complaint is the battery door broke completely in half in less then 4 months of use.You might expect that out of a $30 Dollar Camera but "NOT" a $3 Hundred Dollar one.I paid $284.99 for the camera, $47.99 for the 1 GB SD Memory Card and $51.54 for the Docking Station and that didn't include S&H or Taxes, they were extra $$$!My husband replaced this one for me with the Kodak EasyShare C743 and G600 printer dock and it's a 7.1 MP and it takes better quality pictures that I can print @ home for less then this one. ($249.95 W/FREE Shipping & Handling and 1 GB SD Memory Card included) from K O D A K online</review_text>
This Canon camera has poor quality interlacing artifacts all though out, on a 1080p monitor.  I have used other HDV format cameras, and they were much better. The low light level recording was filled with fairly large digital grain.  If you use a 1080i tube then it will probably look ok in high light, but still plauged in low light</review_text>
NO eye piece cover - you put your eye on a hard surfacehard to focushard to find objectsI lost a pair similar to these that were much better</review_text>
I bought this camera in Oct 2005. I brought it everywhere. Loved it. In April 2006, the LCD screen blew. Canon replaced it with a refurbished camera. In March 2007, the exact same thing happened to the screen and now they will only repair for $97.00, as they have determined this is the result of impact damage. How they determine this is unclear to me, as it was not dropped or impacted...Apparently, you will spend 100.00/yr maintaining this camera. That, to me, is the hallmark of a faulty product. Unfortunate - as I really loved this camera</review_text>
I bought the sd300 to take with me touring by motorcycle. It is so small, I can just put it in a belt case and always have it. With the appropriate sd card I can take a huge number of pictures at a high quality setting. The pictures turn out great, BUT. Eight months after I bought it, the LCD screen suddenly went all crazed when turned on, tho there was no visible damage. I returned it for repair, no problem, no expense, had it back in two weeks. less than 3 months later, same thing. I know I did not drop or bump it, it went down in the 10 minutes between showing some pictures to one person, then to another, indoors. I called, was told it was stillunder warranty from the previous repair, and got a return label. Then I got an e-mail saying that I would have to pay $97 for repairs to the lcd screen caused by impact damage. I replied to the e-mail to protest, and was ignored. I finaly called, and was told that tho the warranty was still in force, this damage was not covered. Checking aroun the web, I found that this is a common problem, not damage. Unfortunately, I had already authorized the repair when I found this out, so I guess I am stuck. I have several canon products, will not buy any more</review_text>
I had this camera for about a month and the first time it broke, I don't know why it broke. I set it down and when I turned it back on, it had cracked. I then bought another LCD screen and repaired it myself, but two weeks later, I had a CASE for it, and put it in my purse. I carried my purse around and had not set my purse down. When I took it out, it had cracked again. I would not recommend getting this camera</review_text>
HP is selling this bag for $30 bucks, so when I found it here for $10 less I couldn't let this "Deal" pass me by... however when I received the bag, I wished I had... the color is less vibrant, it's cheap, poor quality, plus HP isn't embroidered on the bag... walk away from this bag and get the blue and black HP bag instead, it costs a little bit more but it's well worth it!!</review_text>
I purchased this camera case for my granddaughter for Christmas to go with the camera her parents had bought for her.  This is the first time I have ever been DISAPPOINTED with a product I purchased from Amazon.  It was, in my opinion, not worth the price I paid!  The picture looked much larger that it actually was.  I wil continue to purchase through Amazon but I will be much more careful and definitely return it if I'm not satisfied.  In this case I did not have time to find another camera case.Thanks for giving me the opportunity of expressing my opinion.Linda Sutto</review_text>
so i saw that this product got 5 stars, so i ordered it......when i got it, its like "um... is THAT it???" it's really cute, and really well made, but it has no where to hold my usb cord or memory cards...also, there is no HP embroidered in the front like the picture has it, also, the strap that I got is really cracked and does not look good at all...other than that, it's cute, but not the best out there.</review_text>
Probably would buy other camera if I could do over this one takes along time to gechage after flash. It is very touchy and you get alot of blurred pictures. You have to learn how to be very steady with it</review_text>
I owned this camera for almost two years before someone stole it from me, and I said "THANK YOU!" because I hated the thing.  I used to have a 4mp Samsung and it was better than this one.The worst problem: Slow.  Slow slow slow.  If you use the flash, be prepared to wait 4-8 seconds before being able to take the next picture.  It's worse at low battery strength, but even with fresh batteries it was tedious.The other thing that disappointed me was the color.  The light from the flash is glaring and unnatural, and without the flash everything is reddish, grainy, and blurry.  I never found a decent middle ground.  I take a lot of pictures indoors and at low light, and my Samsung wasn't great but it was better than this one.  When I look at the pictures I've uploaded on my computer, I can see the difference when my old camera died and I got the Nikon.The worst thing about owning this camera was occasionally borrowing someone else's camera and wishing I owned THAT one.Do some research before you make a mistake like I did. I've heard similar things from others who owned the same camera</review_text>
I purchased this camera right before we had our first child. Needless to say, I would have rather donated the money to charity! The flash recovery time is ridiculously slow, but that I can live with. The 4 out of every 5 pictures that come out blurry, I can not. Now I have a photo album of blurry baby pictures that we can reflect on. Needless to say I think we will try a different brand when we purchase our next camera</review_text>
Last year, I purchased the 5600 as an upgrade from my Nikon 2100. I am extremely upset over this purchase I have made, since it does not seem to take any good indoor pictures. The Nikon 2100 takes much better shots inside.  The indoor pics from this camera have an awkward yellow tint, and does not focus well. However, the outdoor shots are very clear and sharp. I tend to use this camera for all my outdoor pictures. The outdoor video works well on this camera too. I am giving this low one-star rating, since many events tend to be held indoors. This was definitely my final Nikon purchase ever</review_text>
I bought this camera for my wife and we find it unusable.  The problem is the flash recovery time which takes a good 5 seconds. During this time the camera's view finder goes black and you cannot use it.  Because the camera is so slow, we have missed many important pictures of our children; consequently, we found that for any important family events, this is not the camera we use.  I own Nikon 35mm SLR cameras and I am shocked that Nikon would sell this unusable product.  If it is your life your recording, I recommend that you buy a different camera</review_text>
Unless you take picture outside, no matter what you do, the picture comes out blurry.Flash doesn't help at all- it takes more than 5 seconds for it to take a picture, and you still get a blurry picture with horrible quality indoors.My sister had a camera from Olympus, with 5 megapixel and 3x zoom too, but I found it so much easier to take a picture(and a better one too) with that one.Unless you want to buy your 5th grader his/her toy camera, you shouldn't consider nikon 5600.</review_text>
I bought this camera a year ago, the camera is goog only for outdoor use with a lot of light, but for using indoor (with flash) is very, very bad. When you use flash the photo are not good, but if you go to beach this may be a regular choice, if you can bought another camera.</review_text>
I made sure I did my research and read all the reviews on various cameras before deciding to go with this one.I was highly disappointed when I got my camera home and put in the batteries, turned it on and immediately  the lens got stuck in the "out" position with an error reading that said:  lens error, restart camera.  I tried to restart it a zillion times, only for it to say the same thing.  I went on line and found that this is a problem with some canon cameras and now, instead of being excited about having this particular camera, I am completely disappointed.I'm glad others have had such good luck with their cameras.  Please research the error because, in some cases, it didn't happen until a year later</review_text>
I bought htis from Amazon, and have troubles in playing back the video clips. Almost evrytime, after a while, I do see "System error" on the screen, and then the firmware is hung. After a power-cycle, the last recorded clip is gone! Some issues with the basics...so I called Sanyo service, they said this is happening because I'm using a 4GB plain SD card. Acc to the support guy, max of 2GB of plain SD is supported , for more GB, a SDHC card is needed. I could not find this info on the manual or spec...so I'm not sure how true is this. If anyone of you know about this , please let me know.Video is okay for my need...still is too bad.Firmware is just about average..not too great. There is much scope of improvement to be more user friendly and more informative with lesser use of buttons.Battery did not perform as promised in the spec.Also, there are way too many components in the box for such a specialized product. I would expect those many in a robotics kit.</review_text>
I have to say I am very disappointed with this camera.  I had really high hopes for this one.  I waited for the hd2 to come out and when I saw a lot of positive reviews I bought one, I should have waited.  For Sanyo to call this an HD camera doesn't make sense.  The picture has more grain and noise then my old High 8 camera.  Outdoors in bright light the camera is ok. Low-light is horriblePros:- Nice form factor, love the look and feel and it's so tiny it fits in your pocket.  Very portable and something you can take anywhere.- Secure Digital cards are great, can transfer and edit on the computer quickly- Still pictures are pretty good.  Although still digital cameras are better.- HDMI output can plug directly into your HDTV (although if you are used to watching things in HD you will be disappointed)Cons:- Indoor and Low light situations very grainy, even with the high sensitivity button.- Don't attempt to take still shots while you are filming, it works but when you watch the film you hear loud noises and the shot pauses for 2 or 3 seconds and then continues.  Very cheesy.- You can hear the data being written to the secured digital card on the video which is annoying.  I thought SD was supposed to minimize noise.- Watching the playback of movement with this makes me dizzy, not even fast movement either.- Image stabilization is not that great either compared to other cameras I have used.- Audio sounds a bit tinnyIn my opinion this camera is geared for portability and being able to capture moments quickly as this is something you can always carry with you.  If you aren't too concerned with quality picture it's probably fine. I really think Sanyo has a great concept and one day this could be the end all be all device.  For now it should come with a warning of it's limitations.  I am not saying it's total garbage, but if you have high hopes like I did, you will be disappointed.</review_text>
As I watch the videos of my kids on my 50" plasma, 32" LCD and Mac, trying to convince myself that I like the quality, my wife walks by and says, "Fuzzy." I know most guys out there will know what I'm talking about - she just killed the deal. Regardless of the specs, the wives don't lie - the picture quality just doesn't cut it. It's unacceptably noisey in all but the brightest of light and is an incremental improvement over my 6 year old Sony DVR. The product design is cool, the price is good, the SD card recording idea is perfect, but the HD promise doesn't come close to paying off.If you're looking for sharp, crystal clear images - you're just not going to be happy with this camera unless the gathering of technology and low price are enough to cause you to settle.</review_text>
I got mine today, and it is being returned today.  I had high hopes, given the reviews so far and the supposed improvement in low light sensitivity.  I was hoping for an all-in-one device for stills and video.  Here's my results:1) Stills.  Pictures are not too bad, but do not compare with a similar 7MP Canon SD500 which I own.  The zoom works well, focusing is ok, but slow.  The pictures themselves have quite a bit of noticeable noise in them, flash or not, like they are all taken at a high ISO setting on a regular digital cam.  So slight disappointment here.2) Video.  If this is improved low light sensitivity, I would not have liked to see the results on the HD1!  Video does not even come close to comparing to my regular Sony DV camera.  Focusing is hit or miss, and shake is much more evident at high zoom than with my Sony.I really was hoping for the be all end all combo device, but the HD2 does neither very well.  Ergonomically it is beautiful and fits in one hand very well.  The finish is great and the buttons are well placed.  But it doesn't justify the price or quality misses on the photos and video themselves</review_text>
If you got here looking for a bag for an XACTI camera, keep looking. This bag is too small. It can be used for holding memoery cards and batteries, but not much more.</review_text>
Ok, I was hasty in this purchase.  At first glance it seemed a small price to pay for a camera case...about $14, shipping included.  Then I got the camera case and found the dimensions somewhat lacking in the space requirement for the camera I ordered.  You see, the dimensions listed under "more details" are for the outside of the case, not the inside (but it doesn't say interior nor exterior, just gives dimensions).  Turns out, not only do you have to click "more details," (fine print) you also have to click "more technical details." (finer print)  Wish I had now.  Just wasted $9 for shipping on a 6 oz camera case.  ElectroGalaxy will not refund shipping charges, and they charge a %20 restocking fee.  So, at most, after I pay return shipping, (the case is only $4) I might get back $2.  So, yeah I was hasty, but I was also robbed</review_text>
I purchased this along with a Sony DCRHC21.  This Carry case was listed as an accesory so I expected it to be appropriately sized (as other Sony cases I've purchased fit like a glove).  This  case is entirely too large to hold a miniDV camcorder.  The camcorder rattles around inside it.  If you have extra attachments and lenses maybe you might need this one.  Otherwise I suggest you look at the Product Specifications, note the dimensions and then look at your camcorder's size.</review_text>
The look and feel of this camcorder is very good. Unfortunately my camcorder use is limited to low light indoor activities. For example, evening party, indoor school activities, kid drama and orchestra. This camcorder is not at all suitable for these activities. Earlier I had a Sony DCR TRV140, which was way better than this camcorder.This camcorder has a very small sensor and hence such a low price. One easy guide to evaluate the sensor size is to look at the optical zoom. Most of the camcorders with more than 10x optical zoom has small sensors. These large optical zoom camcorders will perform poorly in low light.If you are planning to use this camcorder in low indoor light, I do not recommend it.</review_text>
After a week of using this I find the motor noise that others talk about is nothing.  Mine is a refurbished model from tigerdirect, so maybe the motor was already fixed :-)  My mother in law has a camcorder that sounds like a blender.  The ZR 500 is OK in low light, but you CAN adjust the exposure manually to correct if it isn't to your liking. You can also adjust the focus too!My friend who is a mini DV guru said that in this end of the consumer spectrum this camera is on par.I've made two practice DVD's (with firewire, no problem at all) with this camera and like what I see.For those of you that have bad motornoise: try your video software to edit the noise out.  Power Director has that feature.I am happy with this product, but I would rather have a higher end model now that I have a bit more in my budget for a camcorder.A great camcorder for beginners!</review_text>
Why do you need a water house for a camera that is 10m water proof</review_text>
I have owned the S410 camera for almost two years, when on New Years Eve I pulled out my handy camera, from the padded case it's always in, and to my horror, the E18 error message appeared! It hasn't worked since. I paid $400 for this camera and Canon would like $110 (plus taxes) to fix the problem - ridiculous. Especially since this seems to be a VERY common problem with their cameras. I've enjoyed the camera's picture quality and ease of use, but what a waste to spend that much money to take pictures with it for just under two years! Beware of this flaw that Canon doesn't seem to acknowledge</review_text>
Beware of this camera! The camera overall works great. We have had it for more than a year now and it takes clear, bright pictures and is very easy to use.  Very nice compact size.However, as others have pointed out, the battery is the fatal flaw in this camera and we will be looking for a non-Elph replacement for fear we will run into the same problem again.  There is NO battery meter until it needs to be recharged or replaced.  We were warned about this so I thought, no problem, I'd get two batteries and be ready to switch them when charging was needed.  But what we found out is that the batteries themselves quickly retain less and less charge so that now, they last only a few minutes each before another charge is needed. I had previously thought that this problem of retaining less charge over time was only for the much older battery designs and am dismayed to find myself looking for another camera so soon.</review_text>
When I got this camera for my birthday April 2005 I thought that it was a dream come true. The picture quality was brilliant, it was easy to use. The device was ment to be envied. It took marvelous pictures until within 3 months, July 2005- the LCD screen cracked. The camera had been in a case sitting on a bed with no possibility of misuse or accidental damage. I was never suspiscious of it until I took it to be fixed and reading countless reviews of similar problems. Something bad will happen to this camera. Either the sceen will break or the memory card thing. A friend of mine also owned the s410, and her screen broke before mine did.The camera still takes photos, but without the screen the device is near worthless as you have no options. It is not worth the price of repair. Tomorrow I am going to buy a new camera.</review_text>
this was the first digital camera i purchased. i am an adventurous person and  wanted something that would stand up to my lifestyle. this camera wasn't it.the good*it is compact, which is pretty convenient*it has several camera functions that have the potential to work well if you are techno-savvy.the bad*after snorkeling with it for 30 minutes, the camera leaked and broke. olympus replaced it, but only after my 2 month stay in costa rica was over.*the functions are unreliable and difficult to use. rarely if ever do i get them to work how i want. the pictures always need touched up afterwards, sometimes seriously.*the zoom sucks. don't expect to get those awesome close ups they advertise unless you have some serious patience.*the image stabilization is a joke. you need a tripod or surgeons hands to take pictures that aren't blurry.*the user manual left me with a lot of questions</review_text>
very cheap, you can tell it's an fake camera miles away. sure it has these features of motion detector which makes it move and has led lights; but not worth 6 dollars at all. stay awa</review_text>
It Was not all there the part to put the camera on did not come and i need that to put the camera on so please it for a c875 camera please think you w.b</review_text>
Not impressed at all with this product.  You are better off just to plug in your camera in the USB port and let Windows process it.  At least you will get a chance to indicate where you want your pictures saved.  I suggest you don't use Easyshare software.  Windows Pic and Fax Viewer is far superior to this software.  If you decide you will use it you will find that all your pics on the hard drive will be set to use Easyshare.  The solution to this is to uninstall Easyshare and all pics with revert to Windows</review_text>
I purchased this wide angle lens for my digital camera.  When I was experimenting with it taking photos inside my house, there was a dark shadow in the lower right hand portion of the photo.  When I took a photo outside, there was no shadow.  I went to my local camera shop to ask for help in this matter and he said I would need to adjust the white balance according to the light in the room, but he said, in reality, 'these digital cameras are really not meant for attachments'.  I did experiment with the light balance, but still had no luck in getting that dark area to disappear.The flash on the camera is not strong enough to compensate for the area the lens blocks.  I returned the product.</review_text>
I bought the converter since I wanted to use it for landscape photography.  I took some test shots and discovered that the converter has an unacceptable amount of barrel distorion.  If you are thinking about buying this product just be aware that you will have to correct your images through software after you take them</review_text>
bought the charger and an extra battery. When my camera battery started getting low I tried to charge the batteries and the device just sat there trying to charge but never charged the batteries. competely useless. have to go buy a different charger</review_text>
After three weeks the batteries fails.  I buy a knew one in Walmart, and less expensive</review_text>
Bought this as an XMAS present to myself - to bring along family photos while on business travel. I'm now on the 2nd unit (exchanged directly w/Phillips), and am still having the same issue with it not reliably working with external (in my case, Sony memory sticks).The internal memory is pitiful, and unless you want to resize all the photos you put in it, you are not going to be able to hold very many internally.I've yet to get the auto on/off feature to work, and while it is perhaps a PC friendly device, it's certainly not always Mac friendly - the controls are cumbersome to work with, and the directions meager.I wanted to be able to carry this in a backpack or carryon bag, the fact that the support stand can't be folded tight against the unit makes it difficult to do this - of course, no mention of this in the product description.Also no mention that it only supports older memory sticks - NO SUPPORT for the new, MS ProDuo sticks (and no mention of that in the product descriptions either)I thought I would get a quality product from Phillips, and this certainly looked like it had potential - unfortunately, it's turned out to be a piece of junk, one I've been screwing around with for so long that it's probably not returnable.Don't waste your time and dollars.......................</review_text>
but the stitching was irregular on the front. I thought the company produced good products, but I was mistaken when I bought this item. Next time I'll just go to BestBuy for a camera case</review_text>
Probably a very good case, but not a very operatable one in the field - you have to undo two closures to open the camera compartment, a strap and a velcro.  The shoulder strap is not detachable - looks kind of silly when you are trying to use the belt strap.  For the Olympus Stylus digital cameras, look to the Lowepro case - better case and value</review_text>
The product advertisement is misleading or incomplete (no picture of the actual contents).  The following quote is from Fuji Mall:"AC Adapter: Charge your batteries at home or around the world with the travel adapters."What it fails to mention is that the charger is an external charger only, and you cannot power the camera or charge batteries while in the camera. I was looking for an AC Adapter that I can power the Camera (and charge it's batteries inside the camera).The NiMH cells are not the 2500 ma/hr rating that comes with the E900 camera (they are 2000 ma/hr, but this was noted in the product specifications).I teach a photography class and needed an AC Adapter to power each camera used during the class while demonstrating.  This product does not meet this criteria.  It can however charge up to 4-AA Batteries at a time, and includes an Auto Adapter which is handy.Case is Bulky, not small enough to tote an E900 conveniently when not bringing the charger equipment</review_text>
I will keep this review simple.For the price this is an ok deal.However:The bag is a bit bulky and has no belt loop.The battery charger is finicky and has below average build qualityBatteries are generic rechargeables.You are better off finding a bag that fits your needs perfectly and picking up a separate charger/batteries. It will wind up costing you less in the long run</review_text>
If you can actually get the picture to turn out right, it does take pretty decent pictures.  Most of the time the photo is either over-exposed or too dark and grainy.  It also only holds about 5 pictures, so you will have to buy a memory card if you want to really use this alot.  I was a little disapointed with it due to the fact that it cost 40 dollars, and it doesn't really seem worth it</review_text>
Have had an Olympus 4.0M.for 4 years and been very happy with it. As a gift I got this Canon and was very diappointed in the color quality and sharpness. Shot about 600 pictures people were blurred,not crisp and dim even on a sunny day. Had to return it.Don't bu</review_text>
I purchased this camera after reading reviews and tech specs about the camera. It's either not enough, or it's too much ... I'm not sure which. I returned it and purchased a 10 megapixel Powershot A640 which has a swiveling view finder (which is great!) and will suit my needs just fine for about $200 less.</review_text>
I bought this camera after reading the reviews and wanted to get a camera that uses a different media type other than the SmartMedia (which only lasts for about a month). I would have to say that I am extremely disappointed, particularly with the grainy images and completely out of focus edges. Even with all the settings on the highest possible quality on the PowerShot SD1000, my old Olympus Camedia C-2020 takes much better photos.It's incredible how blurry the edges are and surprised why no one has mentioned it being so obvious, especially the other reviewer being a pro photographer. So blurry that I had to use Photoshop to crop out the left and right sides. The right side was worse than the left making 1/8th of the entire image unrecognizable.Maybe I simply got one with a bad lens. In any case, no thanks, I'll stick with my trusty old camera. I would rather pay for a new SmartMedia card each month.</review_text>
The Panasonic is very compact, very stylish SEXY as my wife called it, but the photos are very disappointing: they are way to noisy! Even if set on the lowest ASA setting at 80ASA it is just barely acceptable and they do get progressively worse anything above 100ASA.The colours are good, and it does take very good videos, but still photos are just plain bad when compared to other cameras in Photoshop CS2. Of course it is easy to understand why: the native resolution of the images. If one investigates such things, will notice that the Panasonic is only 72 dpi, same as Sony's, Canon improves this to 180, and Nikon is at 300 dpi. It is not just about megapixels folks, but how those megapixels are recorded and at what resolution. Obviously a camera with 72 dpi will have more noise than one at 180 or 300 dpi.So before you buy any digital camera or thinking about upgrading to a newer model, do yourself a favour. Try 4 or 5 cameras in the same megapixel range at a good camera store by taking photos of the same subject in the same light condition. Set the camera for the lowest ASA and the highest picture quality in JPG format, take the photos, pop the SD card  into the computer, compare the images in Photoshop. Enlarge to full pixel size (100%), and and look at the meta data at the same time and you will see for yourself. That is what I did, since I was not very happy with the images my Panasonic produced! I had this camera for 11 months and 20 days exactly, and today I traded it in on a Nikon P5000 after evaluating over a dozen models including the Leica D-lux3 10MP camera, and driving the sales persons crazy with all the testing and spending 4 hours at the store, but it was very educational for them too</review_text>
It wasn't obvious to me which battery to purchase for the Olympus Stylus 710.  This is not it.  I had to send it back and get the Li-40B</review_text>
When I was buying my husbands Olympus Camera this Rechargeable battery popped up as a suggested purchase to go with camera so I ordered it.  Not paying close enough attention and because the title does have stylus in it I assumed it was compatable with the camera I was purchasing at that time.  No it was not!!!  So I paid for and wraped (christmas present) something that did not only not work for the camera but made me look like a idiot shopper when my husband opened it and saw that it was not compatiable.  Now I have to figure out how to send it back for a refund which will cost me shipping charges yet again...NOT TO MENTION THE FRUSTRATION OF A RETURN!!!!NOT A HAPPY AMAZON SHOPPER!</review_text>
This battery does not fit the camera I purchased. The camera comes with a battery, so why did you try to sell me another one, one that does not fit, no less? I have returned the battery but have not heard back from you on the return. It has been two weeks</review_text>
When I tried to install the software, My antivirus said it was infected. I tried to install on a different machine with a different antivirus program and got the same result. I e-mailed Celestron over a week ago and no reply.</review_text>
i bought this toy a year ago and tried it on my ETX-90EC telescope all i got  is hazy moon video,the resolution is poorthe maximum pixels is 640*420 which is very pooooooor resolution it didnt reach even 1 mega pixels , hey we've got now 12 MegaPixels chips why dont provide it celstron ???tried to edit it with the included poor software but it was uselessi thought it might need bigger telescope so the aperture would be higher and  i might able to see some stars or galaxies as per advertisementi went to my cousin who has LX90 8" telescope, the result was bright dots seem to be starsi dont recommend this toy its a waste of moneyif you want really to take serious photograph try to attach your film or digital camera to your telescope by T-Adapte</review_text>
My title says it all - I was really disappointed with this camera, but before I get into the specifics as to why, I must mention a few things first.  This was my third camera in the Exilim line - prior to purchasing Z850 I have owned Z60, as well as Z600.  Both were great cameras.  I mean, what's not to like?  Clean, sexy look; easy to use; great picture quality.  But having to work for Kodak in the past, I decided that I want to get more involved with the world of digital photography and post processing, and in order to do that I needed something with a little more manual control, so I sold my Z600, and got a Z850 instead.  Big mistake!  I ordered it directly from Amazon, and it was a brand new camera.  Right of the bat I got a defective unit!  The problem - it was very inconsistent at taking sharp pictures, especially close-ups.  The shots were blurry for the most part, and the colors were a bit off as well.  How is that for quality and reliability?!  But I thought to myself, "it's okay, it happens", so I returned it back to Amazon (thanks to their great return policy), and got myself another one, this time from TechToysForLess (it was a lot cheaper comparing to Amazon).  One thing to be aware of - TechToysForLess sells what it's called "grey market" cameras.  I knew about it ahead of time, but someone might not, and then be unpleasantly surprised.  For those who don't know what it is - the "grey market" refers to the flow of new goods through distribution channels other than those authorized or intended by the manufacturer.  Only new products fall under the legal, accepted definition of grey market.  Grey market goods are being sold outside of normal distribution channels by companies which may have no relationship with the producer of the goods.  Frequently this form of parallel import occurs when the price of an item is significantly higher in one country than another. This situation commonly occurs with cigarettes and electronic equipment, such as cameras.   Entrepreneurs buy the product where it is available cheaply, often at retail but sometimes at wholesale, import it legally to the target market and sell it at a price which provides a profit but which is below the normal market price there.  So, the product is legal, it's new, and it's cheap.  BUT... In some instances, there could be minor differences between the "authorized" product, and the "grey market" one.  For example, a "grey" Z850 doesn't have an eBay mode, but offers an "Auction" mode instead.  It's a bit different with respect to settings.  Also, there is no full blown manual in the box, but rather a short "how to" instruction in various languages.  However, the full manual can be found on a CD-ROM.  Another difference, and that's actually a plus I think, is that it comes with a European power adapter, whereas American sold models don't have that.  The biggest concern with "grey market" products, however, is that in some cases manufacturer will refuse to honor the warranty, so you have to be aware of that, and check before buying.  I knew all of the above, but still took a chance, mainly because the price difference was significant, but also because TechToysForLess had a 10-day return policy, and I thought that it would be enough time for me to "explore" the camera and find out whether it's defective or not.  In any case, I placed an order, and three days later held a new Z850 in my hands.  I didn't waste any time, and when the battery was fully charged, I started taking shots left and right.  All of them were crisp, clear, and sharp, so I knew the unit was good, and the lens wasn't defective as it was with the previous one I had.  However, and I noticed it right away because I tend to take mostly pictures of people, the colors were a bit "warm".  What I mean is there was a slight cast of "pink" present in all pictures.  You wouldn't notice it in pictures of architecture, food, or nature, but people's skin tone looked somewhat unnatural, and it was very obvious.  Neither Z60, nor Z600 had that problem.  I still kept the camera though because I could take care of it by doing some minor editing/post processing.  What finally made me gave it up (I sold it on eBay), was the Casio's ignorance and unresponsiveness to the fact that it had a "broken" movie mode.  The original firmware, version 1.0, that the camera came with had a problem with "stair stepping" - the movies were "jerky", and "noisy".  After numerous complaints by the customers, Casio released two new firmware versions, 1.1, and 1.1B that supposedly "fixed" the movie issue.  But what they in fact did was just "cripple" it - the movie angle was cut by 40% in version 1.1B, and the picture quality actually got worse!  Version 1.1 didn't actually fix anything, but rather "improved" already decent picture quality, and added support for high capacity memory cards.  Also, I've heard from a lot of people that even if those cameras function properly in the beginning, there is a big chance that they will brake later due to poor quality.  I didn't want to wait to find out, so I got rid off it.I didn't do my usual Pros and Cons type of review in this case, and from above comments it might seem like there is nothing positive about this camera, but it actually does have a few good things.  For one, in addition to its big, super-bright display, it has a viewfinder!  A big plus in my opinion, especially when shooting outdoors in direct sunshine.  Also, on top of its numerous preprogrammed  Best Shots, it has some manual controls, giving you even more flexibility.  It's a nice little camera.  Unfortunately, it lacks in two important departments - quality and reliability.  I wish I could say that I enjoyed using it, but it was more of a hassle than fun.However, I still stand behind Casio products.  After I sold Z850, I got myself a P700 model, which has been discontinued for some time now, and is virtually impossible to find anywhere.  It's a semi-pro model, and offers even more manual controls than Z750/Z850 models.  Excellent camera!  A true performer!  Built like a tank, has a sharp Canon lens, and made in Japan for a change! (all other Exilim models are made in China, which could be the reason for poor quality)  I've used P700 for a couple of months, and... sold it :-)  Yep... Call me crazy, call me whatever you want - I just decided that I want even MORE manual control and flexibility, so I got myself Panasonic DMC-LX2.  One word - Wow!  What a camera!  Optical Image Stabilization, Wide Angle Leica Lens, RAW format are just to name a few of many features of this truly great little gem of a camera.  I've had it only for 2 days now, but I'm already in love with it.  Don't forget to check my review of it, which is coming shortly.  I didn't completely abandon Casio's though - my present to my wife for Valentine's Day this year - Casio EX-S770 in Red color.  I'm definitely going to get my hands on it also, so come back for another review soon.  Once again, I hope I've provided you with some help in your camera purchasing decisions.  Good luck</review_text>
This item DOES NOT charge your camera.  It does provide power to your camera WHILE PLUGGED IN, but it does not recharge your camera's battery</review_text>
pictures do not come out very good. poor quality! i would not recommend it</review_text>
I can't speak to how well the product performs because mine was DOA.  Customer Service was unable to do anything over the phone.  Since it was purchased as a gift and I had time before Christmas, I opted for a different brand.  Doesn't inspire confidence in their quality control when a unit fails to start up fresh out of the box</review_text>
I was very excited to see this frame, and thought that would be a perfect gift for a fellow geek. I was extremely disappointed to see poor the picture quality - it looked like the photos were taken using one of the first generation digital cameras that came on the market some 10 years ago. The resolution was similar to my first palm pilot (IIIx), just enlarged.I sent it back after trying to get it to display pictures where you could actually see peoples faces. I believe that the pictures of this device showing colorful and detailed images were doctored or transposed to make this product look better</review_text>
they arrived on time and after that everything went downhill. The batteries charged lasted atleast five hours, so no complaints there, but the charger would keep coming out from the wall. It only seemed to work if it was all the way in and it wouldn't stay all the way in, I tried several outlets, finally after a whole two months it no longer worked at all</review_text>
I bought this recharger kit specifically for a Sandisk m230 mp3 player.  When I first received the kit, I charged all of the batteries.  Upon first use I only got 7min. out of each battery, when I got 20 hrs. from the batter sent with the player.  I learned online that the batteries still have their charge, but due to the battery's "memory effect" or "voltage depression," my player thinks the batteries have lost their charge after only 7min.If you are buying batteries for an electronic device that detects how much "juice" is left in a battery, do not buy this kit</review_text>
POOR quality unit.  Worked sometimes, sometimes not.  Gave up and returned it after a couple of weeks of trying it out</review_text>
I wish that I could review how well this charger works, but unfortunately I can't.  The reason is because it was dead on arrival.  I essentially bought a $20.00 (with eek technology's outrageous shipping) brick.  It never worked, ever, and shipping it back to exchange would cost more than a new unit!  At least I have the 4 batteries it came with, so it isn't a total loss.  Don't make the same mistake.  Steer clear of this piece of junk</review_text>
This is a 1.2 volt battery charger.  Useless for anything that requires AAA 1.5 volt batteries</review_text>
My primary use for this camera was to take pictures indoors with very bright lighting, without the use of a flash. The camera couldn't handle taking pictures without the flash at all, despite it being extremely bright in the room (5 different lights on plus 3 overhead halogen track lights). The camera's shutter speed was so slow that it was nearly impossible to get a picture that wasn't blurry. Maybe 1 in every 4 pictures came out clear. I believe the fact that its a 10 megapixel camera is what did it.I used to have a Cannon PowerShot SD450 that was awesome, but it was stolen and so I needed a replacement. I had no complaints about the 450 and it took the same type of pictures in bright indoor lighting just fine without a flash, unlike the 900. I am sure the camera would be fine for people who always use the flash or take their pictures in bright sunlight but for my purpose, this camera was horrible and it has since been returned. Instead, I just got a Fuji Finepix F30, which is supposed to be better without the flash. We'll see</review_text>
"lens error, restart camera" message appears today (mar 26) after buying production on amazon on feb 20, 07. When I searched google for this error message saw thousands of canon users having similar error / e18 error with older and newer version of the canon. I have tried panasonic and sonys before and never had an issue. I dread that canon customer service is going to waste my hours in getting a replacement and ultimately may end up charging me over a 100 for repairs like they have done to other users(after reading user feedback on web)</review_text>
I have been searching reviews of the Nikon coolpix s7c to make sure that it wasnt just me - and I am finding that indeed countless other reviewers are having the same problem, and many have taken it up with Nikon only to be told 'sorry'.In a nutshell, I am a professional photographer and have owned about a dozen digital cameras ranging from the early elph to nice new SLR models.  I purchased the Nikon coolpix s7c for my wife, and it is by far the worst one I have owned for many reasons, but the chief problem is they have simply screwed up the way this camera does things automatically and the result is HORRIBLE PICTURES.The 'electronic VR' is simply digital image sharpening, the ISO adjustments in low light are terrible, and what I simply cannot believe is how terrible the autofocus is.  Couple that with the design of this camera that makes it difficult to shoot steadily, and you literally end up getting more than 50% blurry pictures</review_text>
The wifi is a great idea!  The idea on paper sounds amazing, but the way you had to do it was horrible.  it gave you no control over what pictures or anything.  plus it was slow.The Picture quality was HORRILBE!!!  M y two Megapixel cell phone takes better pictures than this camera.  They look AMAZING on the LCD screen, but once you get them on the computer, they are fuzzy, grainy, etc.I would not recomend this camera to anybody.  yes, it has some nice features, but the pictures are anything but acceptable</review_text>
The camera feels slick.  The software that comes with it gets a 4 star for efficiency, though the intuitiveness is not its strength.  While the large LCD display is terrific (the main reason I got it), It is worthless in a high glare situation.  You can't see what you are shooting.  It's worthless!  And since Nikon did not give you a viewing lense for such situations, there are times whey you have no idea what you are shooting.While the viewing wheel, to rapidly cycle through the shots you've taken, is quite handy, the rest of the navigation is less than intuitive, and often takes so long to figure out that you give up.  Pictures are generally good, though the conditions have to be perfect, or you get grain or blur.There is one lovely feature, but it is only useful on a tri-pod.  It is a function which allows you to take a flash photo and have the aperture remain open for a little while after to fill in the background.  It creates flash shots without the black void background typical of such pix.  I use that feature a lot, but its worthless without "legs" for the camera.I bought this on a whim, counting on the Nikon reputation.  Had I known, I would have stuck with the Canon</review_text>
I lost the weights the second day of use. Bottom line the motion of the water as you swim unscrews the weights from the camera body. Save your money on this one.</review_text>
I really don't know how to write a "helpful" review for this camera, I'm not a photographer; all I can say is that I was NOT satisfied with my purchase, so...***If you're having trouble deciding which digital camera to get (like I was a few months ago), save your time and effort and start looking at other cameras.***Here are my complaints:Flash is too strong (blinding, in fact). Please do NOT take this complaint lightly, the flash is brighter than you think (it actually HURTS, I'm talking physical pain here). I actually fear it might have some long term effects, this alone is a deal-breaker for me! It's beyond me how this got past the testing stages at Nikon.Sure, you can turn the flash off. But that only brings me to my other major complaint! The lighting must be almost PERFECT if you want to take a semi-decent picture without the flash.The lens do not respond well to artificial lighting, AT ALL, pictures either come out all grainy (if it's slightly dark) or with huge white patches all over if there's a lot of light in the background.Even when the lighting is almost perfect, you lose a LOT of quality (even when using the highest settings, 6MP).The scene modes didn't help much, I tried everything, all the different modes offer so little difference, very gimicky in my opinion.Even if you want to endure the pain and suffering of the mighty flash, there's a chance the pictures will come out somewhat unclear, why? I have NO clue what so ever. I might take the same exact picture at the same exact conditions and settings a minute apart and a SLIGHTLY different pose (but still stable), and one would be blurry while the other is crystal clear!Must admit though, the swivel design is VERY practical and makes things so much easier. The video mode is great as well.If you don't mind inflicting serious pain onto yourself and others via the blinding flash, then I must admit, the pictures do come out nicely. (most of the time</review_text>
I'm a diehard Nikon fan.  My first Nikon was a gift from my father when I was 13.  Since then, photography has been a serious hobby, having had a few photos published and even spent time working in a photo lab while in college.  Having said that, and after reading several reviews about people having trouble focusing this camera, I absolutely agree with them.  Someone responded by saying those reviewers haven't read the manual.  Baloney.  I bought the Coolpix L1 to replace a 4 year old Coolpix 850.  The L1's camera's focus feature works fine in the daylight and works for s**t indoors, especially with the macro settings.  I've been patient and have given it three months.  I am fed up.  This camera is going back to amazon in the morning</review_text>
VERY slow storage even with a fast card....small but too thick for comfortable handling. I ended up selling it on ebay and buying a Canon SD600 which is a great camera, thin enough to fit in your shirt pocket, fast storage of images and the battery lasts a very long time. I've charged it once and have taken many many holiday pictures. Don't buy the Nikon without first checking out the Canon SD600.</review_text>
I agree with the people complaining about the poor CS policy at JVC. They let me down as well, when it was obvious the camera was poorly designed and built.I am now using a different brand and will definitely avoid JVC in the future. I just hate it when companies do not care about their customers but just about profit. This will come back and bite them in the behind</review_text>
This camera was great at first and very easy to use, however, the condensation error many others seem to have came true for us as well.  When we first got the error it had not been anywhere near any water or moisture, so we put it in our cedar chest (we keep our house very dry and don't live in a humid area - Nebraska).  This worked for a few months, but the error is now on permanently and the camera is useless.  I wish it was different, but bottom line, this is a disposable video camera - a nice one, but still disposable</review_text>
I agree with the many other users who have experienced the "Condensation, Operation Paused" defect on their JVC GR-xxxx. Despite numerous others reporting this problem, JVC says its not a recognized problem. I would disagree - it is a recognized problem, but its your problem, not theirs.</review_text>
It is hardly one month old and the pockets on the sides have already started coming off.  It is not the stuff that I expected froma brand name like Panasonic</review_text>
Not worth the $10 I paid especially when I had to spend $7 to ship it !!</review_text>
I've had this camera for 2 years and I am glad that it broke so I can (in good conscious) buy a new camera. It is so slow that it is impossible to catch anything but the back of my kids heads as they run away because they got tired of saying "Cheese". I always thought the battery life was sufficient, and that the quality of the images was fine, but I hardly got good shots because of how slow the camera was. I'd put the shoot button and it would take about 2 seconds before the camera would click. I actually sent it back to the manufacturer thinking there was something wrong with it, but they said it was functioning normally.It was probably the most disappointing $200 purchase I've made</review_text>
I bought the 4600 for my parents in 2005. A seal in the lens housing broke in November and we sent it to Nikon.  When Nikon recieved the camera they said it had "liquid" damage to the lens shutter area. My parents didn't send the camera in that condition, yet Nikon claims that it is "impossible" for that kind of "accident" to occur at their facility. Two months later I am still arguing with them over this. One of their service represatives, Rob Mustard, told me (paraphrasing) "I have 70 service orders in front of me and our facility gets hundreds of repairs each week; I've heard every excuse imaginable for why it isn't the customer's fault." Besides being rude, doesn't that scare you about his facility getting in hundreds of repairs each week???? Don't buy Nikon is my recommendation.</review_text>
this is an alright camera. if you're an average teen looking to post some hot pictures on myspace, or just someone looking to capture a few choice family moments, this camera should serve you fine.what i liked about it:1. it's compact, lightweight and easy enough to use2. pictures taken in daylight turn out pretty nice3. the battery life on this camera is much better than on other cameras i've usedwhat i disliked about it:1. it's a bit flimsy to be honest2. attempting to take a picture in the afternoon, evening or early morning is near impossible without it looking completely washed out or too dark. even though it has a night landscape option, it doesn't really work.3. the flash causes a horrible delay (but that's been mentioned like 9,000 times before)this is definitely not a camera for glamour shots. i'd also strongly discourage buying it if you're thinking of using it to take pictures at music events</review_text>
I am a Nikon fan I have Nikon 6T and Nikon D50. But about Coolpix 4600:All picutures are always blurred or atleast fuzzy. It somehow take decent photos of face and buildings(if they have strong straight edges/stripes)</review_text>
I have had both the S5000 and the S5100 I was disapointed when my S5000 power switch stopped working after 18 months, but I was happy with the picture quality. I replaced it with the S5100, it has a slightly better feature set over the S5000 (in particular shutter speed choices) while on a trip to Niagara Falls, I was unfortunate to give my camera a slight jolt (and I mean slight) after that it wouldn't power up. I am now looking for something a liitle more robust and reliable.</review_text>
I had an S5000 but it dropped it and broke. So I decided to buy this model since I loved the S5000 so much. They took away so many of the great options and quality that the S5000 had...so now I just use a small Fuji pocket digital camera and this one sits on the shelf. It is very blurry in low light and has very little shake control. I would suggest going with the S5000 even with lower Megapixels it is much better quality</review_text>
This frame looks great until you turn it on. The picture quality is less than stellar, but that isn't what annoyed me about this frame. When you buy this frame don't expect to view your photos at the 16:9 ratio without some work in a photo manipulation program. What does that mean you ask? That means that your photos won't fill the entire screen in the 4:3 mode. You will have 2 black bars on either side of your images; This will not take advantage of the entire frame. If you switch to the 16:9 mode your images will stretch to the width of the frame, making peoples faces distorted. I have a workaround for those who are familiar with image manipulation. See below.The build quality of the frame is pretty good. If Mustek would fix the 16:9 problem and get a better quality screen, this would be a nice little frame.A little work is evolved setting up the pictures for the 16:9 ratio, but I figured it out. 16:9 stretches the image, making it look distorted. These steps compensate for the stretch and make your images appear normal. I set up a macro in Photoshop allowing me to do a batch in one click of the mouse. You will just need to keep an eye out on how it crops the image. Some of your images might be better served one at a time.Start with an image that is 1024x768 in your image editing program.1. Go to the image size menu and change the width of the image to 77% (or 788 pixels)This will make the image look distorted. That is ok.2. Then go to the canvas size menu and crop the height of the image to 77% (or 591 pixels)The image is ready to save. You might want to save as in to another folder so youcan go back to your original if needed.3. Copy your edited images on to the flash card and insert into the frame</review_text>
This frame is just ok you have to resize all your pictures and the quality is not good at all you are just better off paying the extra $75 and getting the phillip</review_text>
They say 100% compatible but is not, because is not an info Ion-Litio, so is not a Eqivalent battery, dosn't work. Don't expend your money on this stupid batter</review_text>
Doesnt work even though the LENMAR website says it does. I thought it was a pretty good deal for $26. I wouldnt even give it one star coz it plain doesnt work</review_text>
Attention! I got this lenmar from Amazon. However, it is not compatible with my latest model of sony's dcr-hc96 camcorder! The camcorder warns you to use infolithium battery, and then shuts down. That's it</review_text>
I purchased this item because of a recommendation from a friend.  I will start out by saying that when I first purchased this frame, I loved it.  The display, contrast and brightness were great.However, after 5 short months, the display's pixels started acting funny.  They get out of sync and display a solid color rather than the imgage.  Turning the frame off and back on resolves the issue for about 60 seconds and then it's back to bad pixels.Myself and two of my friends each purchased this frame and are all experiencing the same issue.  In conclusion - it would have been a great frame if it had worked long enough to display pictures from all four seasons.</review_text>
I bought three of these -- one for myself and one for each pair of grandparents.  Two of them stopped working.  One of the two had tons of bad pixels and the other one just stopped.  Unfortunately, out of the warranty period!  And inquiry to the manufacturer has been ignored.I'm out a lot of money for this garbage.  DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS GARBAGE!!!!</review_text>
Received as a Christmas present, dead by February 24.  Well, actually, that's two months.  Now all it does is flash an error message, and nothing I do gets it out of that mode.I liked it before it died on me</review_text>
Although easy to load a smart card, this viewer was disappointing in quality.  My pictures look fine on my computer, but the pictures were dark and there was no instruction on how to change the contrast etc. (although I found that it the picture could be adjusted, it was never mentioned in the manual).  The manual is, because of the comment above, disgustingly incomplete. If not going through the bother of returning it through Amazon because I purchased it on line, I would not have kept it.  I actually bought another digital frame that was smaller and cheaper and it was worse, otherwise I would have given it only one star.  I could have purchased a unit a Circuit City or BestBuy and been better off</review_text>
I purchased this product about 2 months ago, the resolution is not the best but it's acceptable. After a month,it turned off by itself and wouldn't turn on again!! I sent it to repair and had to pay $50.00 !!!somenthing to do with the power button. I have it on a UPS with battery, also freezes for no reason. I don't recomend it</review_text>
I purchased this for my 10 yr old son. I was surprised at how, well, cheap it appeared. We took it out of the box and turned it on and it would not work at first, then it worked for about 10 minutes, then it never worked again and we had to return it. Amazon was great during the return process and refunded our money quickly. We ended up buying the DGX 5.1 MP from a local store i it's place. It has worked well for my son and is holding up to the rigors of youth. Not a professional photography instrument, but a pretty decent unit for him</review_text>
I got it on sale for $88.00 thinking it would be a great bargain at that price. I feel I was ripped off. The video quality is ghastly when given enough light, and absolutely unusable without. The same goes for the pictures. Even at highest quality - and a lot of image enhancements, the results are mediocre. The audio portion of the video had a very noticeable hum, which I was able to remove with my audio editing software. Otherwise, the audio recording and playback were "acceptable," at best. This device is useful only as an audio recorder/MP3 player, and is not really a bargain</review_text>
We have had this camera for about a year.  We wanted an inexpensive camera but buying this was a big mistake.  The picture quality is terrible and now it is not even working. We have a Canon Powershot A60 as well and have been very happy with the performance.  I would not recommend this Polaroid camera to anyone</review_text>
this camera is a piece of junk. you have to be standing outside in bright sunlight to get a decent picture. and then when you try to use the flash it is so bright that everything in the foreground of the picture is washed out. not to mention the battery life is horrible. i got a 1 GB memory card so i could take lots of pictures, but the battery runs out after i took about 10. so all in all, if you're considering buying this thing, save the money and frustration and just don't</review_text>
The picture quality is okay, but the battery life is HORRIBLE</review_text>
Do not buy this camera, I repeat do not buy this camera! Just read the reviews and you'll know exactly what I mean. Lucky I got this piece of junk for Christmas, so I didn't spend a dime on it. I opened the package BEFORE reading any reviews. Now I wish I've read the reviews before opening the box. I don't care what setting you use, I tried them all and I have yet to take a picture any better than my cell phones camera. The lighting sucks, you either end up with dark pictures or super bright ones. I really wanted this camera to work, it looks sweet but sadly it can't take pictures.</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my 6 yr old daughter. It isn't even good enough for a child's toy camera!She had asked for a camera with a flash and screen for viewing what she had taken photos of. This camera looked like it would fit the bill. It was small and "cool" looking, had a dock (great idea), Li-ion battery (great idea) and a skin (great idea.) Unfortunately it lacks the ability to take decent photos in varied environments (We are not always outside in the sun!) If they would put a better camera in the same package it would become very desirable.Save yourself the grief and buy something else. I'm getting a 5MP HP (for less money even!</review_text>
The Battery looked like a second hand battery signs of leakBattery poles discoloured.  Out of country on holiday will return item on retur</review_text>
Loved the concept of this camera...small, 10x zoom and sleek looking, BUT the first one lasted 3 days, had it replaced and the second one lasted 1 week.   Both stopped operating completely.  So given that kind of problem I do not recommend this camera</review_text>
Broke the day after I got it. But when it worked I loved it</review_text>
I bought this harness because of the connecting straps from the harness to the binoculars.  I have compact binoculars and wanted the extention straps for a better fit.  The set I received did not have the extention straps included.  The harness was the same as all the other harnesses I could buy locally for much less money with the only difference being the name on the back.  If you are buying these because of the extention straps, you should email the seller first to make sure the straps are included before spending the extra dollars.  They were well made, just not the same item as shown in the picture</review_text>
This item was offered as a suggested accessory to the Nikon Monarch ATB 8X42 Waterproof Binoculars that I purchased.  I later also purchased the 12X42 Binoculars.  This harness CAN NOT be attached to either pair of binoculars!  The hook part of the snap is too thick to go through the strap eyelet on the binoculars.Other than that the harness is a well made quality product</review_text>
I have had several people take my pictures.At first,everything is fine.The pictures are ok.THE NEXT DAY,my face looks like a pile of baby vomit.It is soooo blury.Then it got 2 the point where every picture I took was blury.I tried fixing it online(like on the program for the camera)and it would not work.I HATE THIS CAMERA!!! Not to mention the battery sucks.It lasts maybe 3 1/2 hours.This camera should be $99.00.TRUST ME PEOPLE......IF I COULD RATE THIS THING AT A ZERO I WOULD.IT IS NOT WORTH IT.HOWEVER,a camera i absolutely love is the Sony Cybershot DSCT5.An awesome little camera</review_text>
It's not an item to write home about.  Final picture quality is usually OK but not spectacular.  The wi-fi works some days, mostly not.  If I'd known then what I know now it would still be on the shelf or in the hands of some other poor purchaser.</review_text>
I've owned this camera a little over a year. It was my 2nd digital camera. It always had focus issues in low-light. I thought it was me, but after working extensively with the manual, after I finally had some time, I discovered that it was the camera. You really need a tripod for those low-light shots. I wasn't able to return it, so I've taken hundreds of pictures with it. It takes beautiful pictures with good light and has a really nice size screen. However, the lens will no longer contract and I get an error message that is unresolvable unless I pay at least $170. I'm just going to get a better quality camera. I will not buy Sony again</review_text>
This tripod seemed to be very nice...  Until we tried to extend the legs all of the way.  Two and a half of the legs worked well, the third had a section that would not stay extended.  The locking devices are pretty poor.  They are made of a cheap plastic and I believe that even the ones that do work well now, will not last very long with even moderate use.  Next time I will try to find a tripod with a set screw type of leg extension lock</review_text>
It's a great concept, but my unit wasn't recognized by any of my 3 PC's, despite hours of work with tech support and even trying a second unit. One of my PCs runs XP (they had no idea why this computer didn't recognize the Magpix) and the others run Win98 (which they said sometimes has problems with the Magpix, although they don't say that in their marketing literature). They gave me my money back, but refused to refund the shipping charge as promised, and in addition I wasted several hours and the cost of mailing two units back to them. I suggest waiting for the next version, or even better, for a better company to introduce a similar product</review_text>
I purchased the WP-DC700 underwater case for my A70 and followed the directions exactly, oiling the gasket and cleaning it after each use. It leaked and ruined my month old camera. Customer service was rude, blamed me and then tried to bargain with me to fix it for $190 instead of the $280 that they initially requested. The underwater case has a 7 DAY WARANTY and the camera is not covered for water damage. My father had a similar problem with his $1000 Nikon digital which just stopped working for no aparent reason, they claimed it was water damage and tried to bargain with him to buy a rebuilt one for $500. So beware of bad customer service. Canon's customer service has all bad unreasolved reviews at the Better business Burea</review_text>
Very disappointed in this product and Amazon's response to the problem.Item clearly shows that a metal neck strap is included and until I complained that it was not included,  this was still written up as being part of the accessary back at time of complaint but since been changed.They have told me they can't supply the missing part  (the metal neck strap showing in the photo) as item comes from a freight forwarder.    I did not get what I paid for and unable to return  because item has been forward shipped out of the country</review_text>
The Adorama Silica Gel came without any instructions on how to use and reuse it. I emailed customer service at Adorama to ask how to use it and how to recharge it once it has absorbed enough moisture but they did not respond. I can't tell when it needs recharging and when it is ready. What color should it be and what color should indicate recharging. How to I recharge it? Nothing tells me how to recharge it. So far, money wasted. Unresponsive to my emails</review_text>
It got to me and upon my sons birthday and opening it (a month or so later) it worked for about an hour and since has not registered speed correctly. A huge disappointment and waste of my money</review_text>
The main reason for buying this camera is to be able to take good pictures from far away. The quality is very poor. The unit is very bulky to carry around your neck. The SD card slot has some block in it. I was not able to even insert an SD card. All in all, not satisfied at all</review_text>
The camera is just plain cheap. Takes nothing but fuzzy, low resolution pictures. The thing weighs a ton and even for all that the binoculars are only mediocre. A great idea, maybe someday someone will actually do it right</review_text>
This is a terrible product:  1.  The binoculars are very heavy and awkward to use.  2.  The pictures are extremely poor.  3. The company offers poor service and packaged instructions are very brief and insufficient.  W</review_text>
I bought the Meade CaptureView 8X42 1.3MP Digital Camera Binocular. The first one had software / hardware that hung up after 3 pictures, the second one had so many pixels missing from the screen it was unreadable, the third one wouldnt turn on and the black side flashing fell off on removal from the box.A truely tatty product</review_text>
I read all the reviews and comments on this Kodak printer I could find. Many gave glowing reviews. I'd just purchased a new Kodak digital camera, and thought this printer dock would make a perfect setup.I was never able to get the printer to perform as Kodak says it should. It caused some odd conflict, and my computer would not boot into Windows XP with the printer attached to the computer. I ended up having to disconnect the printer, turn on my computer, and then reconnect the printer in order to use it. Windows then had to always reinstall the printer drivers. It was made even more frustrating by Kodak's tech support. I called and emailed multiple times for assistance. In one conversation I was literally told "I don't know what's wrong and can't help you." Now that's tech support!Finally the printer refused to print telling me that it was out of paper. I tried all Kodak's remedies, none worked. No matter how much or how little paper was in the machine, it said there was no paper. I even opened a fresh pack to find it still fussy and not let me print.I can't recommend this printer. I could give a better recommendation had Kodak itself, through its tech support, at least have provided my with some competent assistance. I got about 2 dozen prints, quite a large cost for printer and supplies for a few prints before the machine just failed to work at all.About the only positive I can give is that the prints I did get looked good, the color was nice. I gave it an extra star for print quality alone.Kodak was a name that had some strength behind the name once upon a time. It was synonymous with home photography once upon a time. They've lost something over the years, and that is quality</review_text>
I will start off by saying, I loved my Sony Cybershot.  When the Alpha came out I couldn't wait to get one.It died after 200 pictures on day three of a three week once in a life time trip through South America.Amazon said it was out of their hands because it must be returned within 30 days.I've spent 3 hours so far dealing with Sony.  Most people I spoke to or on-line live chat support were unfamiliar with the product and transferred me around to Business Support, Computers, Video.  They also contradicted one another.When I did get to someone who knew the product I was told firmly that despite the camera being a lemon and malfunctioning after only taking 200 pictures they the would only 'repair it' not replace it.Now I am stuck with a lemon, and I fear I have a history of further disappointment and frustration with this camera.I highly recommend you read all the customer reviews.  Other people have had problems with the camera, I ignored them because I had faith in Sony and thought the other Alpha owners' dud cameras were unusual.If you decide to purchase anyway, I highly recommend you do not buy through Amazon, but through a real store with a good and fair return policy, that stands behine their products.  Places like Microcenter will exhange, no questions ask.  I am kicking myself because Amazon was $100 cheaper then Microcenter.  Penny wise pound foolish.I love Amazon, but, I will never buy anything other than books and DVDs from them.  Lesson learned on electronics.</review_text>
This battery only gives me about an hour of playing time on my Philips PET724 7" Portable DVD/DivX Player.After that it claims to have 75% charge left but can't even get the player to turn on and doesn't charge it if it's turned off</review_text>
The battery lasts for about 10 minutes even with a full charge. I made the mistake of buying two of them for my husband's dvd player and they were useless.  What a waste of my money</review_text>
I only got about 2 hours of run time per charge out of this battery so I returned it for my money back and picked up a batterygeek universal dvd battery which is now giving me 7+ hours of run time per charge.</review_text>
Fuji fails to honor warrantee - Don't buy from themDo NOT buy the Fuji digital camera. They charged me $[...] for a fix within the warrantee period. Their support manager told my wife the cameras are not being built well and dust gets inside destroying the gears. Rather than fixing them they replace them and then they charged me for the replacement even though it still had months left on the warrantee.[...</review_text>
The title says it all: one month the warranty expired, the zoom feature on the camera broke, making a horrible grinding noise if you attempted to turn it on.  The camera is all but useless.  The Fuji shop said they need to replace the lens assembly, at a cost of at least US$120; for that price, I'm buying a new camera, but not another F10.</review_text>
The first day I took them out to hunt with them they fogged over.  I brought them home and there is fog INSIDE.  Also inside is some dark crap that you cannot get to...and it is on the lens.  I called Bushnell's help line and they told me..."Well, it isn't internally fog proof, just externally"  When asked about the stuff on the inside.  "That is probably fungus, that sometimes happens"  I JUST BOUGHT THE BINOCULARS!!!  He stated I could send them in and miss my entire hunting season and they would take the fungus out.AVOID THESE AT ALL COSTS!!!  They are a shoddy product with an even worse strap that is plastic and cuts into your neck</review_text>
I read other review, and decided to give it a try. As soon as I recieve it in the mail, and opened the box, I realized this was a mistake. CHEAP quality Binocular with "high power" being a selling point. It came in already broken with two eye ruber pieces falling apart. you can see how the cheap glue was being used to put it in place! It is extremly heavy to hold in hands for more than one minute for nature observation. You will be CONSTANTLY ajdusting the focus. Your fingers bumps with focus bar while you are holding it. Indeed Strap, Case, Lense protectors are all cheap crap, and annoying to have it all ON~! I am taking this back, and buying MADE IN JAPAN "NIKON EAGLE VIEW" 100 times BETTER. YOU GET WHAT YOU PAY FOR~!!!!!</review_text>
In my experience, this camera takes great pictures, but the zoom lens is so delicate that it breaks easily.  It stops extending and just makes a clicking noise.  This happened to me when the camera accidentally turned on while in my pants pocket rendering the camera unusable.  My brother and two of my friends experienced a similar problem with their EX-S500 after they accidentally dropped the camera while the lens was extended.  I would recommend looking into another camera that is not so delicate</review_text>
I'm going to be completely honest with you. I hated the HP camera's because 1. does not take great pictures at night 2. digital zoom is not great either 3. blur's out if you do not stand still taking the picture. I've had an old HP camera and I have had this newer HP camera and they are all the same. It doesnt seem like it really matters what MP they are. Still bur's out and it is disappointing. I guess it really depends on the person about this camera but I'd rather have a Sony, Samsung, or some other company's item. =</review_text>
I bought this camera after owning an Olympus digital camera for years. I was extremely happy with my Olympus, but wanted something smaller that would fit in my purse or diaper bag since I'm expecting. This camera was SUCH A DISAPPOINTMENT. Just about every single picture I took had huge white blobs all over it. (This only happened when using the flash. I must admit the camera takes great pictures in broad daylight without the flash.) Plus, if you used the zoom at all, the pictures came out fuzzy. The first digital camera I ever owned (7 years ago) took better pictures! The store I bought the camera from wouldn't take it back because I waited two days past the 14-day return policy. So, I sold the camera and took a $100 loss. I'd much rather lose $[...] than keep this camera</review_text>
There is a serious design flaw with this camera and it is even acknowledged on the FAQ section of the Sony website.  "If there are dust particles floating in the air, they can be illuminated by the strong light of the flash and sometimes appear in a recorded image as white, round glare spots.  This symptom tends to occur in low-light environments when using a compact digital camera due to the close proximity of the flash to the lens assembly.  However, this is not a malfunction."  READ:  your low-light pictures will have spots all over them!  Sony does not think this is a problem.  It is a design flaw.If you are only going to use this camera in full sun, then it is fantastic but seriously, there are many other cameras out there that do a much better job!</review_text>
I bought a Sony ICD-MX20 Digital Voice Recorder a week ago.  I was surprised that Sony does not provide downloads of the associated software named "Digital Voice Editor".  Sony Customer Service staff told me that if you lost the CD that came with the box, you had to buy a new one.  Only patches of the software are available to download.The Customer Service personnel told me that it was corporate policy despite the fact that the software is bound to the digital device.This immoral policy violating the norm of digital appliance industries and should not be encouraged.  Sony is demoting its brand name by offering poor post-sales services.  Think twice before making your buying decision.</review_text>
This is an awesome little camera.  Except that you can't use it at night!  There are horrible white spots in nighttime photos when the flash is used.  Apparently these appear because the flash is SO close to the lens in this camera, and so dust reflects badly.  It's a known problem [...]Also, it's totally annoying that Sony uses all their proprietary technology.  As a result, the cable for connecting this camera to the computer is unwieldly (uhh, have you heard of USB??!!), and you have to buy a sony Memory Stick, which probably won't work with anything else you have.  On the flipside, you can take movies that aren't limited to 30 seconds with this guy - i think that might be a result of the memory stick technology.But other than that, the design and operation of this little guy seems pretty slick.  The lens is not one of those that pops out, so not sure if that affects image quality at all, but as far as I could tell, quality was good.In the end, what good is a camera that can't take usable pictures with its flash??</review_text>
I was not satisfied with the quality of the digital pictures on this Ziga Digital Frame. I returned it</review_text>
This is tough because this camera takes beautiful pictures.  And it takes wonderful video. The downloading is easy and in general it's a "fine" camera.  However....the flash on it is nothing short of a nightmare.  It's constantly over exposing every subject.  I find it practically un-usable.  The only way I can get the image I'm looking for in a lower light setting is to set the ISO to 800.  If it had a 1600 ISO I wouldn't need the flash at all practically but it doesn't offer that.The other thing I don't like that I didn't realize I wouldn't like is that it doesn't have it's own cradle in which to charge the batteries.  The batteries have to be removed and charged seperately.  Doesn't sound like a big deal but it is a pain when you think about it.  The batteries lose their charge even when the camera isn't on which results in picking up the camera after 2 days and realizing it has no juice.  Intensely dissatisfying.This camera also has a REALLY LONG DELAY from pushing the button to taking the picture.  This results in lots of closed eyes and stupid faces.  I know that most digitals have a delay but this one is EPIC.I am getting ready to sell this camera and buy a Canon.  I am a wedding photographer and shoot mostly with my Canon 5D.  But since this was rated Camera of the Year by American Photo (a publication I trust implicitly), I decided to stray from my Canon.  bad idea.  I'm going right to a PowerShot.  Do not pass go.  Do not collect $200.  I reccommend you do the same.</review_text>
This camera/Mp3/camcorder/webcam/voice recorder is way to good to be true! I brought one because it was cute and looked perfect for mini movies. But I was sadly mistaken... This camera just takes cheap pictures and videos. The only thing that actully worked properly was the voice recorder that I had no need for. After about 3 days of trying to make it work a little better I gave up and sold it on eBay for the same price as I brought it for. It's a great idea... but it just isn't a good camera but if you want a voice recorder this is pretty nice. The Mp3 player isn't all that wonderful either. It doesn't work with iTunes. Or easy work with Windows. Hope this helps... I wish I would have read this before I brought this camera</review_text>
I no longer own my previous and much finer camcorder, so I finally found myself in the market for purchasing some kind of camcorder until I could get back on my feet to get another good one. I thought this one may do, good price, looks sharp, purchased on impulse . . .big NO-NO.I will say the camera takes decent pictures (as the previous reviews state, almost exclusively outside in broad daylight or indoors withvery good lighting). Other than that, don't bother. The MP3 is a cutefunction (and quite possibly the most practical). The video, UHH, let'snot even go there. The voice recorder, also not bad - records in WAV format and can be transferred to PC.Jack of all trades, master of none . . .I guess that would be the bestway to finally describe this item. I will say that I'll be saving up nowfor much better camcorder and no more "I just gotta have this right now"Save your $, find a quality product - even if you have to pay a little more for it. Trust me, it will be overall better in the long run . .</review_text>
This camera has an attractive look and price but it does not take good pictures.  I bought this camera for my 12 year old daughter and although she was happy with it (she's happy with anything pink) I was very disappointed at the quality and functionality</review_text>
I bought this camera because I'm going to Jamaica and I needed a camera, the video camera was a bonus. When I first tested it, it was during the night time, however in a well lit room, but I couldn't see anything. I figured I could deal with that as long as it took good pictures during the day. When I stepped outside ,which was very bright and sunny, all I could see on the screen was white. I tried all the settings and still encountered a white screen. The only time I actually saw anything on my screen was when I was inside during the day.I brought it back right away, thankfully I had bought it at Wal-Mart and they were happy to refund my money.I hope anyone reading this review will take my advice and not buy this video camera. I would have loved to give it zero stars if amazon gave that option</review_text>
I was extremely disappointed with this product; I felt very let down by Sony, because for years I bought Sony items with confidence, knowing that anything produced by them would be good and reliable.  This item only goes to prove that Sony's standards have dropped and, as such I will use considerable caution when buying anthing else of theirs.What lets this product down is the lack of distance one can be before the sound breaks up; 2 metres (not 45 metres as stated on the wrapping) was the best I could do, and that was in a straight line.  No, all this item is fit for is the rubbish bin</review_text>
Crap.  Doesn't work.  Wanted to return it but had to go out of town and lost the time period.  Plastic junk, never did get a good signal.  The worst Sony item I've ever purchased -- and I'm a Sony fan.  Will still attempt to return somehow.  Don't even bother</review_text>
I have an R717 camera.  I bought the dock too.  Each one comes with a battery and the batteries look identical.  HP labels both as an R07 battery but the L1812A has squared edges running logitudinally and this feature makes it very difficult to remove from the camera.  The other battery is the L1812B and is identical in every way except its edges are rounded and that makes enough difference to allow it to easily slide out of the camera. I bought a "clone" battery (not HP) and its edges are rounded too.  Maybe HP could explain the difference.  Just thought you would like to know</review_text>
The article that receipt is difrente to that of the photo that appears. The conector to the camera is not USB/Fire Wire, but it is a type nini Stereo</review_text>
Bought this as an XMAS present to myself - to bring along family photos while on business travel. I'm now on the 2nd unit (exchanged directly w/Phillips), and am still having the same issue with it not reliably working with external (in my case, Sony memory sticks).The internal memory is pitiful, and unless you want to resize all the photos you put in it, you are not going to be able to hold very many internally.I've yet to get the auto on/off feature to work, and while it is perhaps a PC friendly device, it's certainly not always Mac friendly - the controls are cumbersome to work with, and the directions meager.I wanted to be able to carry this in a backpack or carryon bag, the fact that the support stand can't be folded tight against the unit makes it difficult to do this - of course, no mention of this in the product description.Also no mention that it only supports older memory sticks - NO SUPPORT for the new, MS ProDuo sticks (and no mention of that in the product descriptions either)I thought I would get a quality product from Phillips, and this certainly looked like it had potential - unfortunately, it's turned out to be a piece of junk, one I've been screwing around with for so long that it's probably not returnable.Don't waste your time and dollars.......................</review_text>
This camera/Mp3/camcorder/webcam/voice recorder is way to good to be true! I brought one because it was cute and looked perfect for mini movies. But I was sadly mistaken... This camera just takes cheap pictures and videos. The only thing that actully worked properly was the voice recorder that I had no need for. After about 3 days of trying to make it work a little better I gave up and sold it on eBay for the same price as I brought it for. It's a great idea... but it just isn't a good camera but if you want a voice recorder this is pretty nice. The Mp3 player isn't all that wonderful either. It doesn't work with iTunes. Or easy work with Windows. Hope this helps... I wish I would have read this before I brought this camera</review_text>
I no longer own my previous and much finer camcorder, so I finally found myself in the market for purchasing some kind of camcorder until I could get back on my feet to get another good one. I thought this one may do, good price, looks sharp, purchased on impulse . . .big NO-NO.I will say the camera takes decent pictures (as the previous reviews state, almost exclusively outside in broad daylight or indoors withvery good lighting). Other than that, don't bother. The MP3 is a cutefunction (and quite possibly the most practical). The video, UHH, let'snot even go there. The voice recorder, also not bad - records in WAV format and can be transferred to PC.Jack of all trades, master of none . . .I guess that would be the bestway to finally describe this item. I will say that I'll be saving up nowfor much better camcorder and no more "I just gotta have this right now"Save your $, find a quality product - even if you have to pay a little more for it. Trust me, it will be overall better in the long run . .</review_text>
This camera has an attractive look and price but it does not take good pictures.  I bought this camera for my 12 year old daughter and although she was happy with it (she's happy with anything pink) I was very disappointed at the quality and functionality</review_text>
I bought this camera because I'm going to Jamaica and I needed a camera, the video camera was a bonus. When I first tested it, it was during the night time, however in a well lit room, but I couldn't see anything. I figured I could deal with that as long as it took good pictures during the day. When I stepped outside ,which was very bright and sunny, all I could see on the screen was white. I tried all the settings and still encountered a white screen. The only time I actually saw anything on my screen was when I was inside during the day.I brought it back right away, thankfully I had bought it at Wal-Mart and they were happy to refund my money.I hope anyone reading this review will take my advice and not buy this video camera. I would have loved to give it zero stars if amazon gave that option</review_text>
My hunting buddy purchased a Nikon 800. My intent was to put him in the shade. That Nikon kicks the crap out of my Bushnell Yardage Pro 1000. Tried new batteries, tried bluffing, even tried to lie but nothing helped this product past 500/600 yards.My opinion is this product is not worth the postage.Anyone with similar opinion or someone that has had a good experience with this product. [...</review_text>
I purchase this instrument twice.  The first time there were black specks in the lense, so it was returned.  The second time was worst, i.e. same black specs but the thing didn't work at all.  I have also checked this manufacturer's other models out and most come with the disturbing black specks in the lense.  This isn't a quality optical product</review_text>
have had it for a few weeks and glad I brought it great procuc</review_text>
These glasses should not have the Bushnell name on them, which misleads one to think they are good quality. I bought them for my son, and by the time I got around to sending them, I discovered that the plastic housing was cracked where the front lens screws in, so the lens was misaligned. It was past the 30-day return date, so I glued the crack and kept them for my own use. They are still not right, but I keep them in my car for occasional use. My advice -- spend some extra money and get a good pair.</review_text>
Nice look, good feel, turns on fast, takes great pictures.  Really great, with ridiculous depth of field and resolution, you can in no way appreciate how good the pictures will look on the LCD back, which is huge.  So, what's my beef?  Slow pictures, double flash, slow slow follow on shot, slow.  Okay say cheese, one second, two seconds.... i only got thiis camera because I thought that problem was solved.  Yes my battery is charged, no I do not see how to stop the problem other than no flash at all... where is one flash and let me worry about the red eye? slow- i hate it!!!!!!  Still, its awsome, slick, and a fair price</review_text>
I bought this camera for my 13-year old son to take with him on a soccer trip to Bermuda.  It was ok.  Felt sort of cheap, but seemed like it would do what it was supposed to.  BIG DRAWBACK....there is no lens cover that slips into place when a picture isn't being shot, so the danger of scratching the lens is immense.  My son was so afraid of scratching the lens, that he barely used it.  Some of the few pictures that he did take were ok, but others were not of the best quality.  I think this camera is a bit too costly for what you get, and I'm surprised, because I usually love Samsung products</review_text>
I bought this camera about a month ago and I am highly disappointed with it.  The quality of the pictures is very poor, showing large grain, even at SHQ and low ISO settings.  No combination of settings seems to improve quality</review_text>
I was very disappointed with the images produced by this camera. I had hoped the ultra-wide photos (which was my main reason for going with this camera) also would be ultra sharp, but instead they tended to be soft. The camera has a lag time of about 1/10th of a second, so it's more of a point, shoot and wait camera.The V705 may be okay for posting internet images or enlarging to small prints, but don't expect the sharpness typical of better quality cameras. In my opinion, the camera squeezes too much out of a JPEG photo by way of compression and shooting TIF files just isn't practical.I demand better image quality from my cameras and, when zooming in, I like to see detail. I certainly don't like everything going soft.</review_text>
We bought this camera thinking that it would be our do-all "EuroCam" for an upcoming trip to Europe. It promised a sufficient range of performance and features to easily meet our needs on such a trip.Sadly, the camera is not up to filling this role. We will need to take another camera along with it. However, we will take the V705 for its wide-angle lens, the reason that we picked this model in the first place. It is this disparity between the advertised and actual capabilities of the camera which prompts me to contribute this review.The need for a true wide-angle lens is both a sufficient and a necessary condition for buying this camera. If you do not need a 23mm lens, or if you do not know if you need a 23mm lens, then you do not need this otherwise mediocre P&S (Point and Shoot) camera.Good: Fairly decent 23mm wide-angle lens; The 23mm is the default lens; Rapid start-up time; Internal focus and zoom; Chromatic aberration well controlled; Can use 4GB cards; Freeze-frame and extract any video frame.Mediocre: Soft images; Perceptible shutter lag; Slow shot-to-shot times; Exposure compensation is easy, but steps are too small for digital, and is reset when camera turned off; Flash does not come close to covering the 23mm; Image numbering basically limited to 4 digits; Flimsy construction; No manual controls; No RAW format; No optical viewfinder; Histogram on display, but too small to be useful.Bad: The Absolute Worst menu system to be found on a camera; Excessive and unadjustable JPEG compression; Poor battery life with very expensive external charger and spare battery; Unacceptable visual noise starting at ASA-400; Forced in-camera stitching of panoramic images, with inability to save the individual panoramic shots; Panoramic component images forced to 5MP; Overlays for panoramic and delete modes are so dark they obscure the underlying image (even with display on `bright'); MPEG-4 video compression gives very poor results.Synopsis:If you need a 23mm lens in a point and shoot, this, and the older V570, are the only choices.If most of your images are in bright light, the 7MP V705 gives better images. If most images will be in low light, the older, cheaper, 5MP V570 is the better choice.The camera seems very fragile. Treat it gently and you will likely be happy with the wide-angle performance. If you chose this as your sole camera, you will likely be unhappy with your choice.The ONLY reason to buy this camera is for the wide-angle lens.= = = = =  Some Expanded Comments  = = = = =Twenty-three mm wide-angle fixed-focus lens. This lens has almost decent optical quality; though the camera's processing still produces overly-compressed and soft images from it. On power-up the 23mm is the initially active lens, which is ideal for us. However, considering that this is truly a specialty lens, it would make more sense that the `normal' lens should be the default. Best would be a menu setting to allow selection of the boot-up lens. Better yet would be a camera with only the 23mm lens.The camera does have firmware wide-angle distortion correction. This works fairly well, at the cost of even more image softness, but even-so, barrel distortion is noticeable to a degree that is not present in actual 35mm-film camera wide-angle lenses of similar focal length. This in-camera correction can be turned off. Doing so allows one to see the marginal native lens performance.However, being able to turn off distortion correction exemplifies for me how poorly thought out this camera is. The only people who would wish to do this are those who are exploring the artistic limits of the camera - and they would seem better served by the camera having such basics as:  manual settings, a physically larger sensor chip, RAW image files, or, at least, a choice of degree of JPEG compression.At the other end of the camera's focal length the 114/117mm performance shows slightly below average image softness with average pincushion distortion. There are very few circumstances where one would want to use `digital zoom', so, as with all digicams, the claimed maximum telephoto length is completely bogus. After reaching optical zoom limits, one is much better off doing any further 'zooming' in an editing program.Kodak's advertised "5X Optical Zoom" is, at best, misleading. Actually, it is just flat out untrue. The camera has two lenses. The only lens that can be optically zoomed is the 39-114mm lens, which is not quite 3:1. The wide angle lens has a fixed focal length. (Note, in some places Kodak claims 39-114, in others 39-117 optical zoom.)Also misleading is the claimed "Anti-blur technology." As best I can tell from looking at the images, and at the EXIF metadata, all this actually means is that at some given shutter speed the camera boosts the ASA. Certainly there is no optical image stabilization technology in this camera.Speaking of ASA. This is an opportune time to address the camera's incredibly poor menu system. It is Byzantine: being both awkward and time consuming to use. To adduce, `Auto' ASA ranges from 50-200, to set a faster (or to lock in at a slower) sensitivity rating requires going through multiple menu levels. To change from `auto' to the next fastest (400) requires 11 manipulations of 2 controls! On either of the other two P&Ss which we will be taking along it requires 4 pushes on 1 control. The menu system is next to unusable in the field.Still on ASA settings, the camera does have sensitivities up to ASA/ISO 1000 (though the manual only documents ASAs up to 800, 1000 is available on the camera). Unless your shot is of a once-in-a-lifetime, will never-happen-again moment, then 200 is the max ASA tolerable before noise in the shadows becomes annoying. At 400 the entire image suffers from noise and is not really useable for any print larger than 4x5".The previous version of this camera, V570, had only 5MP, but the same sensor size. By increasing the pixel count, but not the physical size of the sensor, the new V705 camera actually has more low-light digital noise than its predecessor. This has happened with many of the current P&S cameras, as the makers advertise pixel count as a measure of image quality.  My initial experience with low-light high ASA use of this camera is that you might as well set the capture size to 3 MP, as the larger files have only marginally better printing capability because of the severe noise artifact.Another approach to dealing with the sensor noise is to use one of the commercially available products which, when calibrated to the sensor in the camera, allows the subtraction of much of the internally generated noise. Doing so does allow for semi-adequate 8x10" prints at ASA 800. If one really wants to get carried away, combining the preceding with any of the image stacking programs designed for astrophotography (where dozens/hundreds/thousands of images are averaged together) makes 8x10's at ASA 1000 doable. People willing to undertake these manipulations likely do not fit Kodak's target market.Back to earth.The V705's still-image quality is below average for this generation of 7MP P&S cameras. Mostly I believe this is because of the overly aggressive JPEG compression, which is not adjustable (e.g. `best', `good', etc). My guess is that a compression setting of 30-40 is being used. This results in small files, with a lot of compression artifact. The 7MP JPEGs from this camera are about 1.2-1.5MB in size, those from another 7MP P&S I have are 5-6MB. My 6MP prosumer digital SLR JPEGs are 8-10MB. The more the compression, the worse the image. Most cameras allow the user to pick the trade-off point. Kodak picks it for you, and picks poorly.The V705's video performance is very disappointing. It uses MPEG-4 compression, and at very aggressive compression settings. Unless it is a video of your baby's first steps, or aliens landing in the backyard, you will likely find it hard to watch. The total output datastream is about 0.5 MBS. Compare this with a miniDV tape video datastream of 25 MBS (total, adding sound, error correction, and time codes, is 36 MBS). Better to have stuck with MPEG-2 which would give less compression, but decent enough (TV quality) videos. That is the choice that most manufactures have made. As a result, the videos from my other P&Ss have about a 2 MBS datastream, and so are of much better quality.The battery. Kodak's claim is 150 still images per charge. I am getting 100-120, with minimal use of flash and the LCD on `energy saver'. Even 150 would be poor, compared with my other digital P&Ss, where I expect at least 200, and often get 250+ if I am at all careful with power-management. This camera has a proprietary (and hard to remove) 720 mAh battery. My (several) other, P&Ss have 790-1120 mAh batteries, and, I suspect, more efficient processors.Since we are only going to be using this camera for wide-angle, the battery will likely last most of a day. We have not bought an external charger and backup battery because the cost is about 25% the cost of the camera.Though the body is of aluminum, the camera itself is overall fragile and I doubt will hold up more than a year or two. The battery and media doors do not appear to have been designed for actual repeated use; there is no cover for the charge socket. The media door often dislodges open.Truly, my belief is that Kodak designed this camera with the thought that these doors would never be used: that the camera would spend its life simply being taken in and out of the (not included in this model) "EasyShare" dock system. This would also explain the relatively large amount of built in memory, and the overly aggressive JPEG compression.Shutter lag, the bte noire of digital cameras, is very evident with this model. I do not have any method of actually measuring the time between pressing the shutter, and the image being recorded. However, based on over 50 years of tripping shutters, it clearly varies, and I estimate is, at best 1/4  second, up to a bit over 1/2 second. In addition to the shutter lag, there is a perceptible lag in the LCD viewfinder screen showing what is in front of the lens. Together this makes the capture of a fleeting moment, an active child at a particular instant, or a wary animal almost impossible. The shutter lag is much more evident than in same-generation/price P&S cameras from other makers.The accompanying `manual' is poorly organized, childishly written. "Finish reading this book, so you can take and share your best pictures!"  At best, it was written for 8 year olds.The manual does make reference to a web-address where one can download the `full manual', however the address given is incorrect. When eventually found, the manual is better than the one enclosed with the camera - in that it contains some information that one could not figure out oneself - but it also is written at no more than a fourth grade level.Panoramics, one of the advertising points of the camera, are another disappointment. Basically the way it works is that 2 or 3 images can be taken in `panoramic mode', each subsequent shot is overlain by a thin strip of the preceding image, in order to allow alignment. As with most `panoramic modes' focus and exposure is locked on the first image. So far, this is all OK; however, it rapidly goes downhill.First, the max image size of the individual shots is limited to 5 (not 7) MP. Next, the image overlay is so dark that, even with the LCD set at max brightness, it is difficult to see through the mask to align the elements.However, it gets worse.The images MUST be joined in-camera! The individual images cannot be stored! In-camera processing is very slow and very battery hungry. Aligning the overlaps on a grainy 1.5x2" LCD in the field gives, in spite of the camera's best efforts, much poorer results than aligning them on a much bigger, and higher quality, computer display in the comfort and controlled lighting of your home.The best way to take panoramas with this camera is to use a lightmeter to determine exposure for each segment, and then simply take the appropriate series of images as 7MP single-stills, making exposure compensation adjustments based on your light-meter readings. Of course, my smallest lightmeter is almost as large as this camera, so we will not be dragging it along. You can eyeball the needed EC close enough that should be able to match the exposures up in production. Much better if the V705 allowed the individual images to be saved.Reading back through this review, I see that it is mostly negative. This makes sense, for, as I disclosed at the beginning, it was my disappointment in this camera's actual vs advertised capability which led me to write the review in the first place. Likely I have said all that needs to be said.So I will just close by mentioning that the only reason we did not send the camera back is because of the wide-angle lens.  Except for this unique lens, the camera's performance and ease of use is below that of similarly priced P&S cameras currently on the market.If you need a true wide-angle P&S, you need this camera. Otherwise forget it</review_text>
I love everything about this camera BUT....The display is very touchy. I only owned the camera for 2 months and my display broke. I had it in a case and must have bumped it just right. My display shattered. Mind you there is not a view finder so you can only guess what you are taking pictures of. This is NOT covered under your warranty. My camer has been in the repair shop for 3 weeks now and since the camera is so new there is no parts available yet. So I am sitting here with no camera, which is really bothersome since I Love taking pictures. I figured I would spend more for a nice quality camera and have no worries but who knew this would happen! So I highly recommend this camera but you MUST be VERY VERY careful with it!</review_text>
I ordered a case for my Kodak DX6490 digital camera from ANTONLINE thru AMAZON but received a case that is inches too small for my camera.  If the numbers referenced above show in the review, you can see that my model of camera does not appear.  In spite of this ANTOLINE has refused to issue an RMA for its return and replacement with the correct case and has stated they will refuse it if I return without their RMA. They tell me it cannot be sold as new since it was opened.  The only packaging was a brown padded envelope.  Is there another way of seeing inside the envelope without opening it? I guess I could go to the airport and put it through the screener.There is a little tag on the case that reads DX6490 but it obviously is not since the size is incorrect in height, depth and width and my number does not appear on their invoice. When I checked Kodak online, the dimensions for my camera case were larger in all three dimensions.Amazon is attempting to resolve the matter but as yet have no feed back from them either. At this point I would never patronize ANTOLINE again</review_text>
The magnetic clasp is weak very weak - making it vulnerable to thieves with sticky fingers or opening up on it's own.  I keep this camera case INSIDE of my purse.i wouldn't recommend this productthere has to be something better</review_text>
This was a TERRIBLE purchase on my part.  It doesn't even deserve 1 star.  I just wanted a small bag to wear over the shoulder for quick access to my z7590 without holding other equipment or being too bulky.  The bag was too small for my z7590, and I paid $8 shipping PLUS return shipping.  I only hope they don't charge me a re-stocking fee. I went to WalMart, found a cute little bag in the electronics dept. that the camera fits great in, with room for the strap AND extra memory cards or battery if necessary.  They have cute ones for ladies too, with pink polka dots or stripes inside!  For only $12.  Next time, I'll be smarter!</review_text>
I purchased this for my daughter since I had already had purchased one for myself.  The pictures are clear and crisp.  If I had to buy another I would purchase the same</review_text>
Loved this camera the first month or so that I owned it.  Two years later my feelings are very different.  Batteries need to be recharged constantly.  Camera rarely turns on after being off it's dock for more than an hour.  All I can get is a flashing red light signifying that the batteries are dying.  Zoom is worthless, pictures turn out very blurry and pixelated.  Flash is also way too bright, half of my pictures are annoyingly "white" looking because of this.  Definitely going with Canon on my next purchase</review_text>
I too, loved the camera, despite the small LCD screen size, until it got the infamous White Screen of Death that this particular camera is known for, which usually occurs AFTER the warranty expires (1 year).  Photos outside are great, poor low-light photos though, but I paid $100 for it (and with $20 coupon it was $80).  Small LCD screen means that it takes less battery power, so the rechargeable AA batteries lasted a long time.White screen of death temporary solution:  Turn the camera off, and do a quick rap with your knuckles to the "Cybershot" logo on the front of the camera.  Then turn it back on.  Repeat if necessary.  It'll probably happen again, but it beats buying a brand new camera if you're on vacation and don't have time to bargain shop</review_text>
Like others, mine will review pictures but shuts off almost immediately when in I turn it on in still mode. Bought in December 2005, it is now not working.  It is scandalous that so many of us have the same issue and Sony is not addressing it. Sony should be forced to recall these cameras.</review_text>
The Cybershot DSCS40 was bought as a Christmas gift for my daughter in 2005.  A few days after Christmas 2006, the camera ceased functioning.  Because the camera was shipped in November 2005, Sony refused to honor the one year warrantee and the repair price was given as $111.  Needless to say, we will not be purchasing another Sony product in the future</review_text>
I loved my 4.1mp Sony Cypershot I got for Christmas in 2005. Then a few days after Christmas in 2006 the screen was getting these fuzzy lines in it. If I would tap the camera they would go away. But then a few days later I was taking pictures and the camera just stopped working. It would turn on but then shut off. I had this problem before with low batteries but I changed them and it still didn't work. It would let me review pictures but not take them and now it wont turn on at all and the lens is stuck out. So many other people have had this exact problem after just one year of use. SO SAD CAMERA DEA</review_text>
Ok, this camera was inexpensive so I bought it for my kid for Christmas (2005).  It actually took better pictures than my other camera (other model Sony Cyber-Shot), so I didn't give it to my kid, I kept it.  I bought it a few weeks before Christmas, it was opened and used on Christmas day. I just used it days ago, and it just did the thing where it starts turning on, then immediately shuts off.  It has been less than 1 year of use, but a week over 1 year from purchase.  Sony wants to charge me $111 and change, to fix it (The camera was less than that when I bought it).  I was just using the camera and it just shut off!  I searched inet to find MANY other people experience same issue.  THIS CAMERA IS DISPOSABLE!!!!  I took my extra 256mb chip out of it to put in my other Sony camera, and my wife said you can't see the screen (lcd screen) and you couldn't for a long time.  The other camera has the same issue MANY other people complain of as well.  I also have 2 different model Sony DVD writers for computer which are malfunctioning, and a Sony Vega 36" TV which isn't worth the money. I WILL NEVER BUY ANOTHER SONY PRODUCT AGAIN!</review_text>
As the previous reviewer pointed out, this is NOT the KLIC-5001 1700 mAh battery as described in the Product Details, it is the lower capacity (1050 mAh) KLIC-5000.At least it is the Kodak battery, if that matters to you. (I have a new Kodak camera and want to protect the warranty.)  If not, plenty of places sell the generic KLIC-5001 for less than Amazon sells the Kodak KLIC-5000</review_text>
the battery is half the side of the battery came with the camera an last half the time, an number or not the same ,an it,s not the same battery. do not buy any thing from them because lying about what they are selling</review_text>
I ended up not purchasing this rechargeable battery and charger kit from Amazon because I had waited for it for about 5 weeks and gave up.  Then I discovered that I could buy a similar product at Staples, and cheaper too!  I don't think Amazon is the place to go for electronic products</review_text>
I purchased this frame as a gift for a friend of mine. When I saw it on her desk and noticed the terrible quality of the images, I was embarassed that I had given such an inferior item as a gift.  Perhaps the images she had loaded were quite low resolution, but the pictures looked terrible with huge pixels.I would not recommend this item at all</review_text>
Ordered two frames from the third party source.  Neither on of them worked at all.  It has been a nightmare trying to return them for a refund</review_text>
It's only redeemingly quality is the price (if you get a good deal). Photo quality is poor, and screen is quite small (3x5). Navigation is not overly complicated, but buttons must be pushed hard to work. It did work perfectly fine - took SD card, even connected to my Mac and drag and drop photos onto the SD card I inserted into the frame. But, because of the poor quality of the photos, I don't suggest buying</review_text>
i got to get it off my chest.  this camera takes great photos and they print out wonderful.  BUT, the camera has several down sides:   1. as all have said, it eats batteries big time.  this is a pain.  2. it recharges slow between flash and between non flash.  forget about catching a great spontaneous moment.   3. not durable.  i dropped mine out of the case from below waist hight and it does nto work at ALL.  i am sure by the time i send it in and pay for shipping and repair i can buy a new one that is cheaper and more reliable.  any suggestions???</review_text>
if you lose this cord just get a flash card reader. It's cheaper and more practical</review_text>
I'm sure that if the camera worked properly, it would have been fantastic; however, I received a camera on my birthday this year, only to have difficulty with the focussing mechanism.  I took 4 blurry shots of my son's birthday party, and the next time I turned the camera on, the LCD screen was broken.  We purchased the extended warranty from Best Buy, so when I brought the camera (10 days old, mind you) in for repair, they insisted that I'd dropped it and broken it (which I hadn't), even though there were no signs of external damage...no scratches, dents or anything.  After sending it in, Best Buy informed me that it would cost us $180 to fix, and that they wouldn't fix the focussing mechanism until I'd paid for the LCD screen to be fixed.  Disgusted, I retrieved my camera from customer service unfixed.  I contacted Sony, who appologized and told me to send in my camera for free repair.  I ended up receiving a call from their repair center, informing me that it would cost me $180 to repair and that LCD screens are not covered, whether I received it broken or not.  I tried a third time for repair, only to be told that I would have to pay.  My mother tried to use her Buyer's Protection Plan from her Visa (it was a birthday gift from her to me), only to have her money refunded, then re-charged months later when Best Buy's legal department wouldn't pay her Visa bill.Based upon our experiences (among other bad experiences with Best Buy), we stopped shopping at Best Buy, and now own a lovely Olympus camera.  Don't buy the Sony Cybershot DSC-T9</review_text>
Just bought a SONY T9 in Tokyo last April 10,2006 (7 months ago).And suddenly 2 weeks ago, the screen went dim practically can not see anything.The power on / off also not working. All happened at the same time.Try to repair at SONY service station in Shanghai as I am residing there for the moment.Very indifferent customer service staff refuse to repair, despite that I do have a world wide guarantee card and the receipt from the Tokyo shop as well as the complete boxes.The SONY people there are really not helpful at all.Most probably we suspect, they don't want to shoulder the cost for repairing under guarantee from SONY worldwide.It is shameful for such a big name like SONY.Definitely, I will not buy again from SONY. Change to Olympus for the replacement and also cancel my BRAVIA LCD purchase.I do not recommend buying goods from SONY as you  might have the same experiences (poor hardware quality and services)</review_text>
I was completely prepared to give this tripod a five-star review. It's lightweight but sturdy, easy to assemble and disassemble, and very adjustable. I used it to tape a church service and sat it next to me in the pew with its legs retracted, like a short tripod, and it was wonderful. It's also nicely finished, and when you collapse the tripod and tighten its knobs, it stays together and doesn't flop around while you're toting it.Unfortunately, that evening I had trouble docking our new Sony camcorder, and when I looked at the bottom of the camcorder, I saw that the stabilizing pin from the tripod quick release had broken off in the camera! To my great relief, I was able to pull out the pin with no trouble, but the angst factor was pretty high there for a couple of minutes. I was very careful attaching and removing the camera from the tripod, so this is not "consumer error." (I can't keep the quick-release plate permanently attached because then I can't dock the camcorder... bad on Sony there...but still.)Your mileage may vary, but this tripod is going back to Amazon, and I'll be shopping for another brand.</review_text>
I bought this camcorder 3 months ago and, after using it a grand total of 6 times, it is broken.  It constantly loses track of timestamp on the tape doing things like rewinding 2 minutes (two minutes on the counter in the display), refusing to rewind anymore and telling me the tape is full.  It's a 60 minute tape and it can only record 2 minutes???  I figured that was a problem with the tape so I tried another one, which seemed to work fine until I got home and tried to watch the footage.  The camera counter once again became confused and the whole camera just locked up.  I had to power off and on several times before finally getting the camera to rewind the tape to where I needed it to be.  Lastly, the mechanism for ejecting the tape broke after only one month.One last note, the support for Panasonic is horrible too.  You can't talk to a "real" person and instead have to go through an annoying robotic voice recognization "person".  I'll never buy another Panasonic product again...give me Sony</review_text>
The case is very big.  Why buy a small camera and end up with a big case.  The case looks nothing like the picture.  The picture is of another case.</review_text>
These glasses should not have the Bushnell name on them, which misleads one to think they are good quality. I bought them for my son, and by the time I got around to sending them, I discovered that the plastic housing was cracked where the front lens screws in, so the lens was misaligned. It was past the 30-day return date, so I glued the crack and kept them for my own use. They are still not right, but I keep them in my car for occasional use. My advice -- spend some extra money and get a good pair.</review_text>
Very easy to set up, but no matter what I did, I got several horizontal interference bars.  One very nice feature is a built in video modulator that allows you to connect to older TVs using a coax cable instead of RCA.  I am returning this product</review_text>
I would love to really rate this camera case but I have NOT received it yet.  We have been waiting for almost two months and still no case</review_text>
Nice looking. Good quality.But the case has two large flaps on the sides which make it difficult to put the camera in and out.</review_text>
The case fits like a tight glove. I don't like that. The camera was hard to get in and out and didn't have any pockets for straps or batteries</review_text>
Nothing special and probably over-priced for what it is. The leather is nigh on invisible.It's more of a skin to protect the camera from scratches, "case" would be stretching the definition somewhat</review_text>
Cheaply made and ill-fitting, this "deluxe" case isn't worth half the price.  There is no handle or wrist strap provided; your camera's strap becomes the carry handle.  A small, snap-strap is provided, but I can't figure out what it's for... the snap is easily unfastened with light pressure, and I wouldn't trust it to hold the weight of the empty case, much less with the heft of a camera inside.  Don't buy this item:  Amazon will not reimburse you for the return postage, because it's not their fault you don't like it... and you WILL be returning it.  Save yourself the trouble.</review_text>
This product is worthless. You'd be better off keeping your money and buying a good case at a store. Overpriced, cheap, plastic-y rip-off. No "deluxe" here</review_text>
The default supplier for this item is Adorama.  They have sku numbers mixed up on the back end, so they will ship you the HP 6221 dock instead.  Will not work with the R series.They do not even carry the actual HP 8887 dock.Huge hassles, so click on the new and used link and buy directly from Amazon.  It's a few dollars more, but at least you get the right item</review_text>
I purchased this and spent 3 days on the phone with Hewlett Packard trying to get the correct adapter so it would fit my R818 camera (the dock has a thin port, roughly 10 connectors) while the R818 has a mini USB plug).HP was less than helpful when it came to trying to get the correct adapter, getting a different answer each time I spoke to a different rep (even being told at one point that no supervisors were working).  I was finally able to get someone willing to send me one, but said it was going to be 10+ business days to get it, which by then I'll be on vacation (and I purchased it well in advance giving myself time to get the adapter, thinking it was not hard to get).  I was looking forwared to using the dock on my vacation.I would definately *not* recommend this if you have the Photosmart R818 digital camera, unless you like the stress of spending hours on the phone with Hewlett Packard trying to get a correct part, and waiting 10+ business days to get it</review_text>
This dock does NOT fit the R817 Camera.  Just bought this and the HP R817 and I am very disappointed.  The input for the camera is to big for the 817.  So do not buy this if you get the 817 **update** This review was written, when the dock was stated to fit the R817, which has been changed because it does not fit</review_text>
my boyfriend bought this for me not realizing that my camera came with a case (i have the SD200).  this case isn't a good fit for the camera and i've never used it because of that</review_text>
I ordered the camera case for the Canon Digital Elph 450. And I was given a completely different one. Prices sound great, but they do not deliver what you buy. Had a bad experience with them.</review_text>
Dont bother upgrading your Power Shot Camera...Just buy a better one.  The zoom lens ads a whole 5 ft to the view before the pixels become a big issue</review_text>
This is first Canon product that has disappointed me with its quality. They must acquire them from their Chinese supplier for about 98 cents. This plastic device wobbles even when fully rotated to the detente position. I bought it to use with the Canon 250D close-up lens and it's barely adequate for that function. Canon should refund anyone who mistakenly bought one of these hockey pucks.</review_text>
I had JVC product and some of my friends too. These are good at the begining and after an year the motors will have problem and also the tape heads will have problem. Even the cable pins will wearout easaly and will not work properly. Price may be less buy its not worth for long run. I feel Sony and Canon are better than JVC. Even Hitachi is good</review_text>
I purchased this camera from Amazon recently.  The FIRST time around, the camera tape door wouldn't shut the very first time I opened it.  I returned the camera and Amazon was great about replcing it promptly.  The SECOND time around, the DV port worked once, and ONLY once.  There's a short in it.  There is a REASON this camera is so cheap.  It's J U N K!!  I will add that a friend of mine is on her second JVC as well.  A fact I did not know until all of this came about.For two stars, I'll say the video quality is good.  The camera battery does hold a full 60 min. charge.  I had NO sound issues what so ever.  Background noise?? none here.As for still pictures, if you don't know what you're doing as far as shutter speeds, back light, etc. FORGET IT.  The still pictures are very grainy.  If you want professional looking stills, do NOT buy a camcorder for this purpose.JVC tech support is USELESS.Camcorder comes with a USB wire to upload still only.  As on ANY digital camcorders, you cannot upload video in real time on a usb port.  You need a firewire.  This does not come with one.  Also, you need to check if you HAVE a firewire port on your computer.I paid app. $25 dollars here on Amazon including shipping, for a port and firewire.  It took only a few minutes to insert the port into my tower.  It's no big deal.Amazon has just informed me via email that they will not replace my camera a third time, only refund my money.  This camera is now listed as $30 cheaper than when I bought it last month.Overall, AMAZON was great about service and return, however, this particular JVC item is JUNK</review_text>
I've had other digital cameras but this is the first one I've had problems with. I started getting a Zoom lens error shortly after I bought it but it would clear if I turned it off then back on. It is now unusable as the lens can not be retracted at all. It lasted 18 months</review_text>
I was not satisfied with the quality of the digital pictures on this Ziga Digital Frame. I returned it</review_text>
Another lense jam problem. The lense cover accidentally slide open in my pocket, and the lense extended and jammed. This happened frequently with my old Powershot S30 but never caused a problem.Canon said the warranty is void because there's a tiny dent on the front and back. They said ANY physical damage voids the warranty. I complained that the camera has an all metal body which dings easily. They gave me 20% off the repair</review_text>
It's unfortunate that with a name like Canon, you expect a quality camera.  That's why you shell out the money for an item that you think Canon will stand behind.  Unfortunately, this is not the case.I bought this camera to use in graduate school (industrial design).  I needed it to do research for my thesis.  I figured between that, all the product photographs, and the need good portfolio pieces, spending the 500.00 on an 8mp camera would be well worth the investment.  I was wrong.About a month after I bought the camera, it started to malfunction.  The lens got stuck and would not come out.  Neither would it go all the way back in, so the lens cover would not close (not only putting the lens in danger, but draining the battery as well.)  It was still under warranty, so I sent it to the Canon Service Center in Elk Grove Village, Illinois.  It was received, and I was informed that my camera would be returned in 7-10 business days.  That was almost a month and a half ago.I have put my thesis research on hold because I do not have the proper camera for it.  Every time I call the service center, I am told that the "parts are on back order".  Evidently they don't know when these shipments are due in their center, so they don't know when I will have my camera back.  The best part is, when I called two weeks ago, they offered me a "brand new" S215.  The told me it was a great deal and that I should accept the offer because "they NEVER do THAT" (meaning they never offer a new camera for one in repair.)  I pointed out that the S215 was only 5mp, had a smaller screen, and cost nearly 300.00 less than MY camera.  I also reminded her that MY camera was brand new when it broke and I had to send it in.Today I was told that there was no information on my camera, the backordered parts, or when they could send my camera back.  The woman on the phone asked me why I didn't accept the S215 that was offered, and when I explained and asked for a camera the same model as mine, she said they were not authorized to do that.  I told her that I was going to spend the time originally set aside for my thesis research to write letters to both the service center and Canon Corporate Headquarters, and she suddenly had a technician she could consult, and my camera would be back to me by the end of the week.  I won't hold my breath, but a copy of this review will be sent to Canon.</review_text>
This S80 used to be the only WIDE ANGLE compact point and shoot digital camera on the market. It has now been discontinued I'm told. But, we're in luck! There are THREE other digital point and shoot cameras with a real 28mm WIDE ANGLE lens! These are: 1) The Panasonic DMC-FX01 for $250, and the 2) Canon Powershot SD800 IS for $400. and, 3) The Kodak EasyShare V570 for about $350.So, you ask, "who needs a 28mm lens?" You do! Most people concern themselves with how LONG is their telephoto lens. But, most people who "know" know that it is the WIDE ANGLE lens that is most important---most of the "best shots" are made with a WIDE ANGLE lens. For example, you're in Europe and you are trying to "get a shot" of that Cathedral of Notre Dame over there. You NEED a WIDE ANGLE lens. You are in the California Poppy Fields and you want to get the expanse of the golden-yellow poppy flowers with the huge blue sky filled with white clouds above---you need a WIDE ANGLE lens. You are sitting at thanksgiving dinner and you want to take a photo from the foot of the table with everyone sitting on the left and right---you NEED a WIDE ANGLE lens. You are in the garden of the California Mission and you want to take a photo of the ENTIRE garden surrounded by the mission walls---you NEED a WIDE ANGLE lens. It's Christmas day and you want a photo of the ENTIRE GROUP of visitors in front of the Christmas Tree---you NEED a WIDE ANGLE lens. This is where the 28mm lens on THIS camera comes in! So, you NEED THIS CAMERA! Otherwise you'll be cutting off heads and leaving Aunt Sylvia out of the "Christmas Group Photo" this year---and she'll disinherit you and as a result of not having a wide angle lens you'll live a life of poverty and misery everafter! :o) If you agree or disagree or know of ANY other digital point and shoot camera that has a WIDE ANGLE lens please write, Email:boland7214@aol.Here's one more wide angle candidate: Kodak EasyShare V705 7.1MP Digital Camera with 5x Ultra-Wide-Angle Dual-Lens Optical Zoom</review_text>
I received this camera as a gift and after 15 magical minutes recording with it, I ran into an error message: "Unit in safeguard mode - remove & reattach battery."  I did what I was told.  Several times.  Same message.  Argh!  (to my husband's chagrin, I read the user's manual completely before using it to avoid such a problem...why is this happening to me?!)  I searched the web looking for a solution, but all I found were perhaps hundreds of people with the SAME message on similar JVC model camcorders, rendering their cameras unuseable with little help from JVC once their warranty ran out.  Luckily I ran into the problem soon enough that we were able to return the product.Sure, you might not believe me when I suggest to stay clear of this model.  I'm constantly disregarding Amazon reviews that preach "do not buy this product!", etc.  That's why I'm suggesting that you please take a minute to search the web for this error message before you buy this product and see if you're still convinced you want it.  Suggested search on Google: "jvc camcorder safeguard mode error".</review_text>
Bought this about a year ago and now it has a lens cap error (appears like the shutter never opens) and will not record video.  Spoke with JVC and they seemed to know that this is a problem and are having me send it in.  Will update my rating after I see what is wrong, if they can fix it, if they will stand behind their product.  Watch for more details.  Before it failed only complaint I had was it was a little flakey with lighting but otherwise worked okay for the price</review_text>
I bought a JVC mini DV just over a year ago. It now does not work. Of course, the warranty has now expired and I am out of luck. Spent $400 on this model. I do not recommend JVC.</review_text>
I bought this for my husband for Valentine's Day, so he could have photos of our new baby boy handy.  Unfortunately, the images appeared for one day, and then the unit stopped working.  We had to send the unit back.  I was very disappointed as there were many good ratings on the item.</review_text>
This is a good example of the kind of scope astronomers warn beginners away from.The first red flag is the ridiculously high advertised magnification of "600x." Do you know what you will see at 600x in this scope? Nothing but a dim blur. Note that the objective (main) lens is 60mm. All telescope optics have inherent limitations; maximum useful magnification per millimeter of aperture is about 2x. Therefore, with any attempt to use this scope at magnification of over 120-140x, the increase in image size will be more than offset by breakdown, and that's even assuming the quality of the objective lens is any good.The finder is useless; a 6x30 is barely adequate, and this is not even that big.  Finding any object other than the moon will be an exercise in frustration.  the 1 1/4" size of the eyepiece is creditable, but too high a mignification for this scope.  And the field of view is in doubt, and don't even think of using the barlow.  Buy this scope, and after a few outings, it will most likely sit in the attic.  The review immediately before mine is correct. This is no way to get started in astronomy.In a way, it is hard to fault Celestron for making and marketing this scope. Their upper-tier instruments are quite good, but the big money appears to be made on mass market toys like this. In one sense the sale of these scopes subsidizes their good models. Just make sure, gentle reader, to stay away from the toys.Using an astronomical telescope is not like playing an MP3 file and but rather like playing a guitar. It is a learned skill. And you must do a lot of homework before you buy a telescope. Buying without prior experience is like buying a car without knowing anything about driving. If you want to see the wonders of the sky, contact your local astronomy club and attend one of their star parties. The members love sharing their hobby and can set you straight as to how to get started. The best way is to learn the sky with the unaided eye and 10x50 binoculars (decent ones are available on this website), then graduate to something along the lines of a 150-200mm (6-8") Dobsonian; Celestron's own 6" Starhopper can be found on Amazon for under $290.For more information on buying telescopes, see my encyclopedic guide on Amazon: "So you want to buy a telescope.</review_text>
This scope is not a good starter scope for anyone interested in astronomy.  Here's why:1.  The objective is too small, only 60 mm, 2.36 inches, so it is too small to bring in the light necessary for even a beginning look at the universe.  I suppose it is adequate for the moon, but that is it.  The planets will appear as very small disks.  One will be able to see Saturn's rings, but the image will be very small.  Forget it for deep sky objects, clusters, galaxies, etc.2.  The mount is an altazimuth, which will not follow the celestial object in the sky.  The earth is rotating, and anyone focusing on a star or moon will quickly find the object drifting out of the field of vision.  A better mount is an equatorial mount which makes it much easier to track objects.3.  The 4mm eyepiece is too powerful for this scope.  The observer will find it hard to look through (very small eye opening), and will in most cases cause blurred images.  The 20 mm eyepiece is the only functional eyepiece.  The barlow is a 3x, which again is too poweerful for this scope.4.  The mount will vibrate when touched, which will cause the image in the eyepiece to "shiver", which is very frustrating.Even for the low price, don't be enticed by this scope; it has too many flaws. Save your money for a larger scope with a better mount.Jim "Konedog" Koenig, astronomy buf</review_text>
My wife purchased this for me as a Christmas present.  It started displaying pixels on the screen after about 2 months.  I've called Digital Spectrum, sent faxes and emailed them.  This has been going on for nearly a month.  A real waste of money & my time</review_text>
Far better models for similair price range - dissapointed with the quality of the finish etc etc. works fine though.</review_text>
The plastic stand that holds the frame upright broke immediately. Also, be sure to note that there is no memory card. Spend the extra money and buy something better. I wish I had</review_text>
I bought this for my wife and she loved it. But it broke after the Amazon return policy was up. I contacted the company by Email twice and have not heard from them.</review_text>
I purchased this to display MPEG movies (which it says it can). I was told by tech support that I had to use a DIVX encoder and that they must be AVI (which is also incorrect). The SANYO Xacti video camera I was using was MPEG-4 (The iPod accepts the files without issue), I tried converting them in Quicktime to several different types of MPEG4 and none worked. There are better frames out there and I intend on finding out which one is the best. I have ordered another brand and will see if it works. This was by FIRST product return on Amazon.</review_text>
Have never before provided a negative review but this is a product to avoid.  Instructions worthless -- only learned by reading reviews here that it is possible to change some display settings then went to much trial and  error.  After getting best possible settings, main problem is still picture quality: using high quality jpg files as input, photos display with about the visual sharpness of the Sunday funnies -- individual dots very noticeable even at some distance.  Not at all like what I have seen in other digital picture frames.  Just arrived from Amazon and intended as a V-Day gift (tomorrow) for my wife, big disappointment, guess I better make a dash to the florist.</review_text>
This frame was purchased as a gift by a group of us for our babysitter. The idea was great but the frame wasn't. It was difficult to operate and the instructions were difficult to understand. She sent it back and bought one she loves from Sam's Warehouse.</review_text>
The manufacturer apparently states this case is compatible with the Panasonic FZ1 (and by extension the FZ3 which has an identical body).  I bought it and can report that it is not compatible with the FZ1.  With just the lens cap on you have to jam it into the bag sideways and then wrestle with the camera to get it back out.  If you prefer to use the camera with the lens hood adapter on the camera can't fit in the bag at all.  There's also no padding to speak of with this case.  By comparison my Lowe case for my Canon EOS Elan provides a secure, padded repository and you can put the camera in lens down with the strap on top so the camera can easily be withdrawn again.Targus makes decent laptop cases, but they have a great deal to learn about camera cases apparently.Apparently it does fit some cameras, just not the Panasonic FZs.Considering the product is made in China one should be able to expect a bit more at this price</review_text>
You have this camera case listed under accessories for the Panasonic DMC FA20PP Lumix Camera. The camera does not come close to fitting in this case. The camera is 1 1/2 inches wider than the case.</review_text>
Even though Amazon specifically recommended this bag for the Panasonic Lumix (DMC-FZ20PP) camera, and even though I had to return it because it was too small, and even though my camera does not appear on the compatibility list shown in another customer's review, Amazon annoyingly CONTINUES to recommend this bag for my camera. To add insult to injury, Amazon tried to deduct shipping from my refund by claiming that the error was not their fault. (It took two emails to get the full refund, and that was even after I put a LARGE message in my return box not to deduct shipping -- aargh!)Regarding the bag itself, construction seemed sound and this might be a good bag for a small point-and-click camera that requires no accesories</review_text>
I owned this Sony for a single day before I returned it to Amazon.  First off, it records in MPEG2 format which is fairly compressed, and looks it once you upload to your computer.  It is also not natively supported on the Mac without a 20$ additional Quicktime MPEG2 plugin.  Which has to be converted before editing. Which makes it a slow, tedious affair.  Also, the included software is, surprise, PC only.Other problems, not computer related - the Chroma shift in "night mode" is intense, making the healthiest of complexions appear sickly.  I'm not expectant of miracles in night modes, but it seems like a simple solution on the production side(Sony).  The auto white balance could also use the same attention.Like the previous reviewer pointed out, not a bad camera for the money if you're not serious about editing and you're using a PC.  The LCD touch screen is a nice addition and easy to use.  All in all, I would go for a Canon</review_text>
I bought this camera in about February 2005 but didn't know enought about digital to know what I can actually get.  Goes through batteries pretty fast.  The recharge time between pictures sometimes causes me to miss another good shot.  Takes way too much time between pressing shutter button and taking the picture.  I just thought this was normal for digital cameras till I began reading later reviews.  Then I accidentally dropped the camera onto a soft surface (loose dirt and sawdust)and now the lens is stuck most of the way out and will not retract and camera will not come on.  Contacted HP to get it fix but will cost close to $100 and they will just send a reconditioned one.  So I am in the market for another digital camera-maybe a Canon or Sony or something besides an HP</review_text>
I lost my HP R607 while on vacation and needed to replace it quickly. I couldn't fine another R607 (which I really liked), so I purchased the HP M407. I thought it would be the next best thing to my misplaced camera...NOT!! I don't like anything about this camera...It's terrible!  You can take about 4 pictures with regular batteries, about 10 with rechargeable ones (even with screen off). It says "auto focus", but I don't think it has any focus at all....not far away, not close up, nothing! It takes a really looooooooong time to actually Take the picture after you press the button.  I really hate it!  Keep Looking...Don't buy this camera</review_text>
We bought one of these in the spring of '05. We took it on vacation in July of '05 and the LCD screen blacked out a few days into our vacation. I called HP and was informed that a RECONDITIONED (used) camera was all that I could get. The camera was still under the manufacturers' warranty, but their policy was to replace it with a used camera, not a new one. I had to settle for the "reconditioned" camera.  It has been OK since then.HP's customer service is at best mediocre. There are the usual annoying and seemingly endless voice prompts in order to get to an actual service rep, and since HP has out-sourced all of its tech support to the third world, I had a hard time understanding the reps I spoke to.This camera also eats a ton of batteries and takes a few seconds to engage after depressing the button, which is annoying if you're trying to photograph anything other than a posed shot.All in all, disappointing. I will never buy another HP camera</review_text>
Normally I wouldnt write a review, but I have had numerous experiences with this camera that I thought I would share.My sister first bought the camera, and I was amazed with how user friendly it was and I thought the pictures turned out pretty well.  Shortly afterward, her screen blacked out, without any great impact or weather damage.Naturally, I assumed it mustve gotten bumped in the wrong way, tough luck.  I then proceeded to buy one for myself, and a couple of months after I had it, my screen also inexplicably failed to work.And then for Christmas, my sister received a replacement camera for her broken one, and yet again, shortly after purchase, the screen was broken.I do accept some responsibility for the damage, I imagine that if it was in a purse in a bookbag, perhaps it got rattled around a bit.  But three times? I dont find this to be a coincidence, and I do not reccomend that you risk your money, because you too may have to replace it after 3 months</review_text>
I have owned this joke of a camera for over a year now, so as someone with alot of experience with it, I advise you NOT TO BUY ONE.  I wouldn't reccomend this camera if it was only $19.95 and came with a free sledgehammer to take your anger out on it when you realize you just wasted twenty bucks...- Without buying a memory card, this camera holds a pathetic number of pictures at any setting above VGA.- Non HP memory cards are incompatible.- It EATS UP batteries, seriously.- It shuts off without warning for no reason whatsoever.- It will often not recognize rechargable batteries as being rechargable.At this point, I am shopping for a new camera because my M407 claims that brand new batteries are "depleted" and shuts off, lovely</review_text>
THIS CAMERA IS THE WORST!!!I BOUGHT THIS ON BLACK FRIDAY THERE ARE MANY REASONS WHY I AM RETURNING THIS PIECE OF JUNK:1.FIRST OF ALL, IT RUNS ON DOUBLE A BATTERIES2.WHEN I CAME HOME I STARTED TAKING PICTURES.AFTER I TOOK MY FIRST PICTURE, IT SAID ERROR SAVING IMAGE!3.THEN IT WORKED AND IT DIDNT WORK.I TRIED DOWNLOADING SOME OF THE PICTURES THAT WERE ACTUALLY SAVED ON THE CAMERA ONTO  THE COMPUTER.WHEN I FINISHED DOWNLOADING THEM, I LOOKED FOR THE PICS ON THE COMPUTER.I F0UND THEM BUT THE PICS WERE ALL BLURRY.I WAS SO FED UP THAT I LEFT IT SITTING ON MY COMPUTER DESK FOR THE NEXT 2 MONTHS.DO NOT BUY THIS CAMERA,IT WILL BE A WASTE OF YOUR MONEY AND TIME!I ACTUALLY THOUGHT HP MADE GOOD CAMERAS.....-_-</review_text>
I ordered the Sony DCR-DVD108 on April 9.  I still haven't received the camera.  What I have received are 2 e-mails stating that the product is late without any sort explanation why.  As far as I'm concerned it is too late!  The first stated that the shipment would leave on April 16.  When I purchase the camera, I did so because the add stated that if I wanted the camera by April 12, I needed to order it in the next 11 hours and 23 minutes.  This I did.  The next e-mail that arrived just this morning and I've been informed that it will arrive between April 26 and May 3.   I have already missed recording one of my seven year old daughter's gymnastics competitions and now if stick with their delivery dates, I'll be missing 2 more.  Well, I'm not missing 2 more and Amazon is getting the camera back. The best part of this is that I don't even have the option of canceling the order because Amazon is and I quote, "... preparing these items for shipment and this portion of your order cannot be canceled or changed."  If you can't get the order out on time, you should respect your customer enough to offer cancellation of the shipment or better yet, try some real customer service and have the product shipped from a competitor at your cost.  I can tell you with certainty that sort of customer service would bring your customers for life.</review_text>
bought this to get short vid clips of my daughter to post on her page, so i didnt think i would need anything with uber high quality.  but didnt realize just how poor the quality was on this one.  in low light conditions it is horrendous even with the night shot on, and in good lighting it is barely adequate.  wish i hadnt spent the money on this and memory card...should have put out the dough to get something a bit nicer.  you get what you pay for</review_text>
I only had it for a few hours and after that I knew I would be returning it. Its video quality is quite horrible, just better than a videophone and average of a webcam. I should have expected it from something this small and this inexpensive. But honestly, I prepared myself for something at least better than what this camera is. It's quality will not be any better unless your outside, and if you like me and spend the majority of the time hosting parties and wanted something small to capture the fun, this would not do. You basically need spotlights in the room if you want to capture something on film instead of a shadow. This also is a pain for Mac users. It says it's able to import files, and yes it can, but in ASF format. Now you can play it in VLC, but think you'll be able to convert it, think again. It converts just fine, except without audio. I've tried converting the video into several different formats and all of them come out without audio. So, Mac users, pick something else. It is being returned, for certain</review_text>
Don't let the product description fool you into thinking it will work with a ZR85mc camcorder. It didn't work with mine. It didn't even fit</review_text>
I ordered the original item, used it for about a week, then sent it to my son in New Hampshire.  He used it less than fifteen minutes and it locked up, never to function properly again.  I ordered a replacement, checked it out and sent it on to him, with the same result -- less than 15 minutes of use, it quit working.I thought the unit was nice, compact and fairly easy to use, but with two malfunctions in two cameras, I don't think I would recommend this Aiptek model to anyone</review_text>
so i get my camera and first off they basically lie because they act like you have a lot of memory on it to start off but you dont.Then after a week it just stops working.dont get it, theres no flash whatsoeve</review_text>
Hi, I bought this camera and installed the driver from both the CD and then the web.  It caused my computer (a good, modern, fast computer) to crash both times.  The camera worked without interfacing with the computer, but, then, what's the point?  Also, the pictures and movies were VERY grainy and low quality.  The tech support when I had these problems was HORRIBLE.  They really didn't stand behind the product AT ALL and to me that's the most important thing!  Maybe I could have gotten it to work, but not without SOME input from Aiptek.I've never written one of these reviews before, but this really got to me.  Don't buy this camera is my advice.</review_text>
I bought this item as a gift, and it ended up becoming mine. I have to say, I am greatly dissatisfied. Here are some main issues I am having with the camera:1. It is very poorly designed. The look and the feel of the camera are not elegant. Buttons are really ugly, and operating the camera is awkward, and for some functions requires both hands to   operate..2. The camera has been having issues with turning on and off occasionally.3. The worst, by far, is the picture quality. Colors are just plain terrible. Automatic settings are a disaster of photography. I have used a Canon (2MP) before getting this one (5MP). The Canon was far superior in quality, colors, lighting.. I don't need large files of trash, I am perfectly fine with smaller files with great pictures.As a result, I am strongly recommending getting a different camera. I have had great experiences with Canon; and seems like Sony and Nikon are doind a good job too. But HP must stop making cameras, and indeed many other devices.</review_text>
It seems as if every time I want to use the camera, the battery is dead. I find that if I charge it and try to use it the next day, I should expect very much. I'm going to purchase a new battery and see how that goes, but I shouldn't have to do so</review_text>
This camera took some great pictures, and I enjoyed it's size and functionality for several months.  I was sitting in a lawn chair at a barbecue last weekend when I was passing it to a friend who was also seated.  The camera fell about 2 feet onto soft grass.  THE END.  The lens assembly is shot, according to my local camera store, not economical to fix.  This was about the softest fall a camera could take, and not work, it was like landing on a pillow.  I will not buy HP cameras again</review_text>
I loved the camera, absolutely loved it.  I was using it one night and it died.  I went home and put in on the charger and nothing happened.  The light on the charger didn't flash or the camera didn't even go in after dying.  The second time I used it, I just got back from vacation and put it on the charger.  I was able to turn it on to look at the pictures.  As I was looking at the pictures, it just shut off.  I was unable to find a way to turn it back on or even shut the nose.  I would not recommend it for this reason unless the charger you get is different than mine.</review_text>
Thought I'd died and gone to heaven; this lens was everything I wanted and more.  Three weeks after receiving it we went to the Grand Canyon, and on the way home it suddenly quit doing the focus - now it does a focus dance, clunking and whirring and never coming to rest anywhere close to focus.  It's not my D70, which still works wth other lenses.  This one's going back to it's maker!  If they fix it, I'll revise this review</review_text>
Not only is the physical appearance of this model ugly, it is a complete downgrade. Panasonic takes off one of the most important features on the PV GS320 model,a MICROPHONE JACK! I currently own a 300 model and needed another camera to shoot different angels at the same time, since the 300 is discontinued I purchased the so called upgraded model. Now the only available model with MIC jack is the VDR 310, and I have heard DVD is quality on Camcorders is not what it should be. If you do any video prodcution and need to hook up your camera to a MIC, this camera is not for you</review_text>
I've purchased seven items from Amazon in 2005, so I'm not a complete rookie. This item's ad title includes the word "Battery" in big, bold letters . I purchased this kit advertised with a "Used Price", but "Condition: New". The ad picture clearly shows a battery. I had looked at several ads and did not read the individual Seller's comment "BATTERY MISSING" in uppercase, though in regular font. To me, a missing part warrants more of a warning than a "comment". That's my "lesson learned", but I still find it confusing to advertise both complete and incomplete kits together under identical ad titles without a prominently displayed warning in big, bold text indicating that the most valuable part is missing. LESSON LEARNED: READ THE WHOLE AD FOR THE SPECIFIC SELLER, ESPECIALLY THE "Seller's comments"</review_text>
This product link needs to be corrected, as the battery contained in the kit is NOT the same battery which is used in the DCR-DVD7.  Do not purchase this accesory kit if you intend to use it for the DCR-DVD7 camera.</review_text>
The only reason I am giving this 1 start is becuase of Amazon's poor service, otherwise I would give 5 stars for the product.  I placed this order more than 30 days ago.  Amazon still has not shipped the item so I cancelled my order and placed it with J&R.  If Amazon did not have the item in stock, they should have stated on their web site or at least communicated with me that there will be a delay in Shipping</review_text>
This camera looks cool. But it's so, so not cool.The people responsible for this device should be ashamed of themselves. This is by far one of the worst products I have ever purchased. EVER.By the second day the lens cap no longer stayed in place. It "clips" on... but not for long. The camera's internal memory is rubbish and the camera totally destroyed my memory card somehow. It's complelety unreadable. Even with a 150mb card I could only take a few short quality videos. You can shoot more video if you use the low quality settings. And I'm talkin' LOW quality. Worse than any video you've seen online.More problems include the battery cover falling off without hardly even touching it. The controls and interface are not intuitive. You'll probably end up accidentally deleting files you meant to keep. Oh, and the earbuds that come with the camera/mp3 player/hunk-o-junk are HUUUUGE. They aren't comfortable in the least and the cord is too short. I had the camera in my pocket and when I stood erect, the earphones were violently yanked from my ears. They're obviously intended for Oompa-Loompas.I'm sure I could have found more problems with this thing, but it eventually died on me for no reason.Don't waste your time with this. You will be sorely disappointed. In fact, if I could give this product a rating of-10 stars I would do so. I'm so extremely disappointed with this camera</review_text>
I paid 99.00 for this little camcorder, thought it would be ideal for my action sports heros in the house, but we couldn't get the videos to transfer to the pc. The menu button would not bring anything up, so overall we just couldn't get this thing to work. A bummer of a christmas present</review_text>
Received the DXG-506V yesterday and was surprised to find out that it had no tripod mount. Many sites showed a light and tripod as optional accessories for this unit but there is no way to mount these accessories to the cam. This is kind of like false advertising. This is a no deal for me because the cam is so dark in normal indoor lighting situations as compared to other cams at similar prices (like the optimus that radio shack sells) and there is also no image stabilization. Geez, how hard would it have been to put a simple  inch plastic mount on the bottom. As for sound, the built in microphone produces too much hiss and is located in a place that does not allow it to pick up the voices and sounds of what you are shooting. You can hear yourself talking great but not the person you are shooting. That is pretty bad. The resulting audio with the hiss sounds like a cheap 1970's cassette tape recorder.The best thing this cam has going for it is that it can save movies in AVI, MOV or ASX format at different resolutions which is why I got it in the first place. It is also pretty easy to learn and its buttons and functions seem fairly logical. It also has a lens cap.My advice to DXG is this.1.	Add a tripod mount.2.	Move the microphone forward and do something about that hiss and tinny sound or perhaps add a mic jack so that I can use an external microphone. That would be sweet.3.	Improve the cam so that it will do a better job in normal indoor lighting situations. The optional settings do nothing to improve this. I tried them all.Bottom line is that I would have kept this cam if it had a tripod mount. There are just too many situations that this comes in handy and it would have allowed me to add a light to the cam for indoor use.</review_text>
They have made several changes - some good, most bad -  since I bought my last Sony handicam in 8/2003.  First of all, there is no carrying strap.  This is very inconvenient if you plan to use your hand for anything else except for holding your camera.  I managed to jury rig one but it is a royal pain. The docking station is just one more thing to have to carry and when you want to upload your mini cassettes to your computer, you have to take the camera off the docking station to change cassettes. This messes up my editing program.  Fortunately I still have my old camera.  The ability to take still shots is better - more megapixels - but not good enough to zoom in or enlarge.While I was told most people prefer to use the LED screen (I don't knoiw why as it eats up more power and you can't see clearly in bright sun) I like to use the viewfinder.  It no longer has a tilt up feature so I end up mashing the battery into my cheek.This last complaint is about the batteries. Sony LIED about the amount of time that a battery will hold.  The 5 hour battery only charges to 194 minutes on my camera. That's slightly more than 3 hours; It is nowhere near 5 hours.  The 7 hour battery does not get anywhere near 7 hours either. Their packages should be accurate.   All in all, It is not as good as the older product.  There also should be a setting to stop it from running if the rec. button is not being pushed.   THIS WILL BE MY LAST SONY UNLESS THEY MAKE MAJOR IMPROVEMENTS</review_text>
For quite sometime lured by media publicity I thought Sony a good brand. But this was not at all true for digital cameras. I bought this P73 for myself and an HP 4 MP camera for my cousin much cheaper than Sony. Both 3x Optical zoom. The HP one was far better in image quality. Main problem is that photo quality is not so good. It lacks sharpness and in most of the natural occassions becomes a bit hazy. This fact becomes annoying because your friend who has a Cannon or an HP camera will take sharper pictures better than you in any light conditions. Also, in the same price you might look for something higher than 3x optical zoom, say 5x or so in other brands. Also during video, every option of adjusting to light conditions etc will be shut off, another irritating fact.Not recommended</review_text>
I had a Kodak camera for years that I absolutely loved.  We took it ice skating and ended up falling on it.  Therefore, my family bought me this Sony for my b-day and I have to say this is the worst camera I have ever owned.  If you have any movement (such as action shots or small children) the picture always comes out blurry.  What a pain!  Also, the picture quality is horrible.  I will not purchase a sony again and am going back to a Kodak</review_text>
This is the worst camera I have ever owned in my life. I had a fuji 1.3 mega pixle camera that took better pictures than this one! I have taken this camera on 2 vacations now, and both times I brought along my Olympus SLR film camera, and both times, the Olympus pictures are clearer, brighter and all but maybe 1 will work, with this stupid Sony Cybershot, I end up deleting 3/4 of the pictures because they are blury or have all kinds of funny things happening, the only pictures that do work with this camera is during the day time, or in bright lighting. On the first vacation I went on with this camera, my friend brought along her kodak 1 megapixel camera she got free and it turned out better pictures, as did my Olympus, on the second vacation I returned from today as I write this, I just downloaded my pictures, and deleted 2/3's of them because they are so bad, the ones that came off my film camera are perfect! My sister also has the exact same camera which she brought with her, and as I went through her pictures, same thing over 2/3's of them didn't work, I would have just assumed I'd gotten a defective camera if it was only my Sony that did not work, however hers didn't either, I would also assume perhaps it was myself that was the problem, however, I took a number of the exact same picture on this Sony as well as my Olympus (as a back up and thank god I did) and the pictures from the Olympus, as well as every other camera I have ever used, have come out fantastic, on this camera though, they come out horrible, so bad in fact that I'm embarrassed to show people! Believe me, if I hadn't gotten it free as a present I'd be writing a nasty letter to Sony, as it is though my next camera I'm saving up for and buying from a brand that does nothing but photography equiptment, therefore knows what they're doing. Sony makes great TV's and home entertainment systems, anything else I've bought from them, or known someone who has, has been junk, their camera, their car stereos, their computers! Sony should stick to TV's and Home Theater, it's what they're good at, camera's not so much, unless you're looking for something cheap that you'd only use in the day, even then I'd recommend a disposable, they even work better than this camera</review_text>
we had this camera for about a year until on Thanksgiving Day while out of town it broke.  The lense just froze while in the middle of taking a picture and wouldnt ever go back into the camera.  We ran out to Best Buy and purchased it again because it was just a simple to use basic camera for me and my dad.  (2 years later the old cameras lense still wont go back into the camera yet the camera still will turn on..weird.)  At first we liked the camera and it took good pictures.  They look great when we got them developed (costco.com is the best place to upload them and 1 hour later you pick them up, super cheap too) and the quality was good.  Within the last year the camera has turned into a piece of crap.  Evvvvvery picture comes out blurry it seems.  Inside or outside.  I am constantly telling people who take pics for me to take 2 or 3 pictures because i KNOW one or two will be blurry and that is a great shot i will miss because of it.  Also the flash quality is horrible.  It takes okay pictures of people in the dark but if it's of an object (anything really, just not a person) it comes out pitch black.  Inside the lighting is bad too. The camera can never focus and it's just annoying. I also went through 2 or 3 memory sticks made by Sony that for no reason just broke.  One of them broke while in a store getting them developed (in the little machine) and erased all of my pictures which was very dissapointing.  The people said there was no way it was their machine, that it had to be a default in the memory stick.  Also the camera is pretty big and clunky.  At the time it was actually a smaller camera on the market, now it is huge!  I am looking into now buying the Canon powershot 6.</review_text>
I have owned several digital cameras, and this is my current digital camera in hands. I would write a short review as a critical person with concentration ONLY on important things to watch for.Pros- Uses only 2 AA batteries.- Battery life is very good.- Small camera size. Easily fits into a pocket.- Can set '+' flash level, which forces camera to make a stronger flash. I use it almost every time.Cons- Resolution. The images are not sharp in terms of that you can't distinguish individual pixels when looking at the real size picture. I would say, there is no much difference in quality between 4 MP and 50% (1 MP) scaled down version. The same problem exists in Sony DSC W1 camera.- I had many problems with "ON" button. Sometimes camera refuses to turn on. It can be fixed by shaking camera and trying again. (It could be a defect in my camera only).- Some camera parts are painted plastic, which can be scratched.- Camera can lose all settings and preferences if left with discharged batteries (~several hours) or without them at all (10 minutes).- Video quality 640x480 is pretty good in high quality mode, but eats flash space very quickly. Windows 2000 didn't have the right codec to view the file. I had to install it by myself.- Camera is performing slightly below the average in low lighting condition with auto settings</review_text>
Bought the Samsung 363 from Amazon and it developed mechanical fault while I was test running. Making strange noise after loading the tape making it unuseable.About 2 weeks later, i decided to show it to a friend in case it was something unserious and then i realised again that it was not even coming up again. Problem with the power system. paralysing it completely (all in less than 3 wks from purchase. Left it Plugged to charge for 2 days without differenceIt's indeed a sad story. That would be my last time of buying a tape camcorder.</review_text>
I bought this for my 9 year old son to take movies and edit on the PC.  It worked for about 2 days before there was no image from the lens to either the LCD or the viewfinder.  I could see other information on the LCD, such as the date, time, menu, but no image from the screen.  I called Samsung and that is where it is now for repairs.  A check of the web indicated that this problem is well documented.  I did try to install the software that came with the camera, but that did not go to well either.  I will retry when I get a working camera again.</review_text>
This needs A LOT of light. I returned this do due the lighting/picture quality. The one nice thing about it is you can record decent video quality on a memory card-mpeg 4</review_text>
The thing is that it is not a very stable camera, hence it does not give you very stable shots, so many of your pics will be blured. Even those taken with a tripod. I am a pro photographer, and I would not recommend this camera. Yes, it's very thin, but is not worth the pics it takes...Seek for other model not so tiny if you're expecting better images</review_text>
I bought this camera like 7 months ago since it was so small and i liked the design....but the pictures it takes suck, specially in the night time or with flash, you can barely see what you are photographing.THe video feature its ok even though you cant change the zoom while making the video, but the design doesnt suit well this feature since the audio-in is in the exact same place where you are suppossed to hold the camera...so most of my videos dont have audio since i was blocking the audio entrace...Its small and portable, and i could fit it in any pocket, so thats good, but its so small that the battery lasts only aorund 90 min...that's what it says, but it keep going down like 5times faster than a regular min, so it only does last like 30 min</review_text>
We bought this camera two years ago.  We have loved using it, until last week.  The camera showed an "E18" error in the middle of a special event.  We researched the error online and found that almost anything can cause this error, from turning the camera off while it has a low battery to having something in front of the lens while turning it on.  We're not sure how ours developed the E18 (never dropped or damaged.) Our camera has been rendered useless and Canon's only response it to have us mail it in for $100 repair</review_text>
Please buy a different camera.  I have owned 5 different pocket digital cameras.  Under normal wear and tear, the Cannon SD400's LCD screen broke where other cameras I've owned have not.  I just purchased the Nikon S7c with a bigger screen that is so well protected that I can hit it with no adverse affect.  If you do buy the SD400, set aside the $150 you'll likely need to replace the LCD</review_text>
I got this sd400 to replace my s400 which after a year started giving me a memory card error message. I now find out that was a design flaw. Anyway, i spent hundreds of dollars on this one, and now, just over a year after I got it, it won't hold a battery charge. I loved both cameras while they worked, but I can't afford a $400 camera plus the related accessories every year or so. I've written to Canon tech support. Unless they are willing to repair or replace this one free of charge, I'm moving on to another brand camera</review_text>
I bought this camera to mainly use the Digital macro mode, it worked great for several months, now it will not lock focus, this camera is very frustrating, every picture that I take I have to edit to lighten the picture, I tried just about every setting to get the pictures to come out, to no avail, I am a commercial real estate appraiser, so I have taken close to 2000 pictures with this camera, and just about every one I had to lighten, now the Macro mode wont work, I will not buy another cannon product ever again!!</review_text>
I bought this almost exactly 2 years ago, and I turned it on the other day and went to take a picture indoors that required a flash, and the flash would not work. It was set to automatic flash.  Using the auto setting, I thought there used to be 3 flash settings (auto, forced flash and no flash), but now there were only 2.  I took it outside on a sunny day and used the auto flash, and the flash went off outside!  Something is messed up and it has the light and dark confused.Thinking I hit something and changed a setting, I reset it to the factory defaults and it still doesn't work.  It will probably be too expensive to get it fixed, and it's weird but I just upgraded to a Nikon D50.  I must have known this camera was about to die.Even when it worked, half the time pictures came out blurry. I either got fantastic crystal clear shots or blurry ones as if the auto focus missed.  Maybe the camera was defective the entire time I had it. No more Canons for me</review_text>
Add another E18 error code complaint to the list!  I purchased the camera about a year ago, and have had the E18 error for about the last 2 months.  The camera will intermitently freeze up and not work at all, just beep at you and give you an error code E18.  I've tried all the recommended fixes from the compressed air to the alignment twist.  Nothing seems to keep it functioning for more than a few shots.  Canon wants nothing to do with the fix, and estimates repairs between $150 and $200.  Save the headaches, and buy another camera from a different manufacturer!</review_text>
Here's one more A95 to add to the ever increasing list of E18 failures.Thanks to the horror stories from the other posters I'm not even going to waste my time trying to get this repaired. The camera is only about 2 years old... guess I'll put it back in the box and wait to see the outcome from the class action suits!The camera really performed nicely when it was working... thus the 2 stars. Hope you have better luck than me if you get one</review_text>
I got the dreaded "E18" error after owning this (naturally) for just over a year.  Repairs will be at least $100, and REPAIRS ARE ONLY GUARANTEED FOR 90 DAYS...even if the exact same problem occurs again!  This is clearly a design flaw (just read how many users had the same problem).  My first PhotoShot broke after about a year and a half, and since I liked the ease of use and basic design, I chalked it up to bad luck and bought another.  Big mistake</review_text>
I bought my Canon A95 in November 2004.  A little after 1 year just after the manufacturer's warranty expired, the infamous E18 error struck.  I called the factory repair center to get a repair estimate, and they quoted $89 plus $8 shipping & handling.  I bought the camera for $300 online, now it's going to cost me roughly 1/3 of its purchase cost to repair it.  For all I know, it might break down again after the repair! The repair comes with 90-Day warranty period, but it COULD break again after 90 days.And then...There is an upgrade option.  Canon offers a program where you can upgrade A95 for A610 for $125 plus $10 shipping and handling.  This comes with only 6-month warranty.  Again, it COULD be flawed with the same e18 error that could struck after warranty expires.I would really do extensive research before buying another CANON.</review_text>
I've had this camera just over a year (figures) and it has gone completely bonkers on me.  Sometimes it works and other times it puts black lines across the screen making it useless.  You never know when you turn it on whether it will work or not -- making it completely unreliable.  Keep in mind that this camera was used almost entirely inside for my business, so it wasn't abused, dropped, thrown in the bottom of a purse, etc.  It was treated very carefully and probably only shot about 2,000 pictures total.Frankly, I'm kind of glad it broke so that I have an excuse to replace it.  Here's why:1.  Takes beautiful still shots, but forget about any kind of action.  It takes too long between shots to get good action.  It also blurs nearly all the action shots I've ever taken, regardless of what mode it's in.2.  The red-eye is aweful.  It should do better.I doubt that I'll ever buy another Canon</review_text>
This is the Worst camera I've ever owned. I'm not exaggerating. I'm so upset for wasting money on it. The only pictures that turn out, are outside in bright daylight. It takes horrible pictures in low light, there's a high level of noise in the photos. The video mode moves in and out on its own, ruining the video. I sometimes get colored lines down the right side of the videos. My friend's $88 dollar digital camera takes way better pictures than this thing. It just plain sucks.</review_text>
Junk.  You will get a lens cap error in about a year or so, where it will tell you lens cap is on and you will not be able to record anymore</review_text>
I thought my JVC Digital Camera was handy, easy to use and worked pretty well for what it was... then one day at my daughter's ballet show, I turned it on (I made sure I charged it all night) and it wouldn't record.  It kept saying that the lens cap was on.  I am so frustrated and sad.  I spent a good chunk of money on this item and don't know what happened... still don't have a way of recording my daughter's milestones....Don't buy it, if you have other options.</review_text>
The main reason I ordered this kit was for the battery.  When I received it ....NO BATTERY included.  I contacted Amazon and all they could do was give me a number for Sony customer service.  Thanks Amazon!!</review_text>
Bought the Camera, Charger and the kit as part of the deal. Every thing looks good except the missing NPF-50 Battery. Requested for a replacement.In the replacement kit also battery was missing. Returned both the items.59.99 for a Carry bag and 3 DVD sis not worth buying this item</review_text>
I will start off by saying, I loved my Sony Cybershot.  When the Alpha came out I couldn't wait to get one.It died after 200 pictures on day three of a three week once in a life time trip through South America.Amazon said it was out of their hands because it must be returned within 30 days.I've spent 3 hours so far dealing with Sony.  Most people I spoke to or on-line live chat support were unfamiliar with the product and transferred me around to Business Support, Computers, Video.  They also contradicted one another.When I did get to someone who knew the product I was told firmly that despite the camera being a lemon and malfunctioning after only taking 200 pictures they the would only 'repair it' not replace it.Now I am stuck with a lemon, and I fear I have a history of further disappointment and frustration with this camera.I highly recommend you read all the customer reviews.  Other people have had problems with the camera, I ignored them because I had faith in Sony and thought the other Alpha owners' dud cameras were unusual.If you decide to purchase anyway, I highly recommend you do not buy through Amazon, but through a real store with a good and fair return policy, that stands behine their products.  Places like Microcenter will exhange, no questions ask.  I am kicking myself because Amazon was $100 cheaper then Microcenter.  Penny wise pound foolish.I love Amazon, but, I will never buy anything other than books and DVDs from them.  Lesson learned on electronics.</review_text>
I've just returned this camera for poor facial image quality after using it extensively for months.  My regular camera is a Fuji Finepix S602z which is large and bulky, but, takes superb facial shots.  I tried the Casio due to needing something small to carry in my purse for special events and I'm heartbroken at the incredible photo opps I've had that resulted in poor facial quality.  Don't buy this camera if you care about what everyone looks like.I've just ordered the PowerShot SD1000 because of the facial detection feature on it.  Hopefully, it is better since I don't want to have to carry my bulky Fuji to get great facial photos.  I'll review the Cannon  once I've had it for a few months</review_text>
This camera takes blurry pictures straight out of the box.  One mistake I made was to not take my own SD card to the camera shop and look at the output.  I thought the blurry image I was seeing at the camera store was because of the low resolution screen but it really is the camera.  I've missed too many pictures of my kids and am in the process of buying a new camera a short 2 months after buying this.Casio support was responsive and tried to help but nothing appears to work.  And point and shoot is definately not an option.  I thought it would be nice to take quick pictures of the kids but none of them are worth keeping.  I've taken over 200 pictures and I will not print any of them.</review_text>
I own several great digital cameras. It seems like I get one for each use - one with good zoom, another camera for its good flash use in lowlight and others. This one I wanted for the high MP in a small compact size that I can put into my pocket. The first few photos were great, taken outdoors in my sunny patio. Then every picture I took after that (same settings - fine, HQ, poster 10m etc... and vertical lines started showing on the LCD screen and the pictures were all washed out. When I download them on the computer, they look exactly that way too - with the lines and almost all white. I've played around with the settings (and I do know how to work them) but still it does the same.So time to return to find a better one. That's too bad since I read some good reviews and wanted to have it</review_text>
return? ha ha!!! you must email them for permission. they don't provide the email address. i have spent untold hours trying to get them to respond. they will do everything to avoid returns. and amazon just looks the other way.don't do it!</review_text>
After about 2 months of light use, the camera stopped working. Also, the output format was very difficult to work with. Absolutely will not work on a Mac. The price is coming down greatly...I saw it for $88 at Target</review_text>
The IS-DV only records videos in the 'ASF' format, not MPEG-4.  I bought one from 'egghead.com'.  After 30 days, I contacted Aiptek to tell them the problem, they acknowledged that the IS-DV only records videos in the 'ASF' format.  They said there is nothing they will do about it.  Do not buy this product.  Aiptek advertises that the IS-DV records video in MPEG-4 format, but it doesn't.  'Egghead.com' won't deal with me because they say I should deal with the manufacture after 30 days from the purchase date</review_text>
Unfortunately I had to return the unit because it was not designed to be used on a Mac 10.4 program( the tech at the company said he was not aware it was meant to be used by a Mac.</review_text>
I tried the trick of resizing, but honestly, the image quality is still abyssmal. The images are so low-resolution that only the vaguest of detail comes out. Please, if you're thinking of buying this for someone for Christmas this year, choose something else. It might be okay for someone with low standards or poor eyesight, but for anyone who can see well and knows what a good digital image looks like, this will be a huge disappointment.The good news is that in a few years these digital keychains will have advanced and will offer much better performance - that's almost guaranteed. So put this one on the "must buy for mom" list for the 2008 Christmas season.I very seldom write a review, and only wrote this one to keep people from making the same mistake I did</review_text>
I bought this from another retailer on "black Friday" for half of what Amazon is selling it for and I'm still bringing it back.  I think it's horrible.  I was so excited to get a mini-dv camcorder because I heard how great the picture was, but this takes horrible video. It comes out so dark that you can hardly see anything, even using the light.  Even in a fairly well-lit room it came out dark.  It looked Ok on the lcd screen, but when I hooked it up to the TV, horrible!  And it's not my TV either because I hooked up my old camcorder and it looked fine.  I love that it's so small, but if I can't see the video, it's no use to me.  Back to by big old Sony</review_text>
the camera takes a long time between pictures to regenerate for the next picture. Compared to other digital camera's this has presented a problem for the two users I purchased these camera's for.Also the flash does not adjust for the correct exposure at protraits within 3 to 5 feet. the pictures are too hot, over exposed and no adjustment works properly.</review_text>
I have one word for the Argus Quick Clix, Horrible. I bought two of these cameras to give to my daughters for Christmas. The camera lists numerous features and that is what enticed me to buy them. I was looking for an inexpensive camera for general use. This camera takes horrible pictures. All of the photos had a blue tinge to them and were fuzzy. When the flash was used it was so strong that there was nothing but white out of the subject. One very irritating feature is that the camera comes on with the flash off. There is no way to change a setting to let it come on with the flash. You have to go through a series of menus to turn it on and then it takes almost 20 seconds for the flash to get ready to use. As stated when it finally does come on and you take a picture, it is so bright that the picture is useless. I would not recommend this camera to anyone</review_text>
What a pile of junk.  Three full seconds pass between pushing the shutter button and when the camera actually takes the picture.  If you move at all during that three seconds, the picture is a blurred mess.  Even if you don't move, the pictures turn out blurry and dark.  And if you use the flash, you get a lovely white picture of nothing.  I can't believe they sell this thing.</review_text>
I got for Christmas, it was easy to use but only lasted 1 day then the screen does not turn on,,,stay away from this one!</review_text>
I was happy at first when I got this memory card but when my phone crashed the memory card was completely wiped out.  I was ok with the memory card getting wiped out but when I tried re-formatting the card my phone, computer and laptop couldnt even read the card so I ended up throwing it away.  I guess You really get what you pay for</review_text>
SD card worked fine for a week.Problems arise then worsens over time for one more week then it just doesn't work anymore.Problem is not the PDA, nor software on it.  Tried to use the card on a separate flash reader/writer.  Tried formatting it to FAT32, create test directory, data stays on for less than one hour.I would refrain from buying this product.</review_text>
I've never ordered anything and been this disappointed.  I ordered two of these and both didn't work.  I contacted the company's tech support and they told me to send it back and they will replace it.  I tried contacting Ritz Camera where I purchased the item and they refused to give me a refund.  I am now stuck dealing with this company that has horrible customer support.  I will never buy another product from this company again.</review_text>
My wife got this for me for Christmas.  I was thrilled and thought it was a great idea.  I charged the device and transferred pictures to it.  I work in technology, so I agree with many of the other reviewers that the software is terrible -- to delete any photos, you have to delete them from the device, not the software.  Image quality is OK, but not good enough to be "sharing" with people.  And after a few days of sorting through pictures and transferring and deleting them, it got a bit old.Other than looking at it "straight-on", nobody on either side of you can see the image.  It's back-lit, which is fine...but it doesn't help much.Unfortunately, the battery didn't last all that long.  The device refused to charge after about two months, and eventually it died altogether.  The only way to make the unit work was to plug in the USB cable; the battery would not charge. So I contacted "support" and got a basic run-around, telling me that you "shouldn't charge the battery for more than 2-3 hours" at a time, and that I could request an RMA to return it for replacement.  Warranty is no good, and it can't be returned.I'm holding onto it because I'll probably take it apart and use the internal parts to build a desktop "photocube", so it can run off the USB cable.But I agree with others that -- even if this worked longer than 2 months -- it's just a novelty that gets tedious quickly</review_text>
This keychain photo viewer sold by a company called "Smartparts" is identical to one sold by "Argus."  Neither company manufactures the device nor do they offer a shred of tech support.  You buy this, you're on your own.  You seem to be able to find the Argus one a little cheaper... though they do mar the front of it with a big, black imprint of their logo.In any case, this thing is maybe worth $20 as a novelty.  Don't pay more.  Image quality is mediocre and the software, while functional, is stunningly primitive.  If you can pick it up cheap and approach it with low expectations, it's a kind of cute gizmo.  But don't give yourself agita by overpaying for an obsolete little toy.  Check the bargain bins for this thing, or just wait for the next generation device.-- m</review_text>
The battery does not hold up. After 10 months it would not work at all. I thought it was the battery. Emailed support and was told the battery is not replaceable. I found one and changed it out myself. The unit was just dead. Warranty is 60 days.Will not buy another one</review_text>
The idea is wonderful but the window is too small to be useful. I have it, have pictures on it, but never show it to anyone. Trying to find the right light to illuminate a tiny picture was ridiculous. Easier to show a few pictures in my wallet</review_text>
I purchased this for my wife for Valentine's Day. The installation went fine but I have two problems with the device. First, the software to do the picture transfers is awful. You can only select pictures on your computer to download - you can't see what photos are on the device in the software. In order to delete photos you have to do it manually from the device itself. I checked the webpage for updated software - no joy. The crop feature is nice (and well used) but otherwise I feel like I am looking at a Windows 3.1 application. Second, the image quality on the device is very poor. I didn't have very high expectations, but this was lower than I expected. Reminds me of the picture/screen quality in the very first color cell phone screens, maybe a bit worse. You can make out the picture, but not much detail at all. The advice of cropping the photos to only show headshots is an excellent idea, it's the only way to get a decent picture.Overall, I'm a little disapointed. But then, you get what you pay for..</review_text>
I was really disappointed in this product.  It worked great when I first got it.  But before the first charge on the batteries wore out it stopped working.  It was more expensive to return it or have it repaired than it was to buy a new camera.  Like I said, disappointed</review_text>
DOWNSIDE:1. I'll have to add my complaint to several others who had the same problem. The camera suddenly stopped working after nearly 18 months of having no problems. I switched batteries...let it set for some time without batteries or memory card in it...nothing is getting it to work. On top of that I now have a memory card with photos on it that I can't transfer to my computer without a working camera to do that.2. Not good with indoors pictures ESPECIALLY if you try the "night" mode. If you use that mode, even with a tripod, keep your subjects to still-lifes, only...if you photograph people and they happen to move even the slightest, they will at best be blurry, at worst they will look like double exposures.3. Indoors pictures set at normal mode, with or without flash, are no better and may even be worse than your standard cheap 35mm camera.UPSIDE:1. Through its USB cable, it booted right into Apple's iPhoto software making the organizing and editing of photos that I took a breeze.2. Outdoors, with plenty of sunlight, gave me near-perfect pictures that got a lot of praise. Kodak did well with this aspect of the camera's ability, given the price.3. We won this camera (free) so for me it's almost all upside...except now I have to shell out $$$ for a good camera (that will hopefully read my current memory card</review_text>
I would spend a little more money and buy a better quality camera. The picture quality was not good at all. I previously owned another Kodak camera with the same Megapixels and the picture quality on that camera was much better. Just after a year of using the Kodak C300 camera, it stopped working and I did not use it that much. I now own the Sony Cybershot DSC-W50 that takes great pictures, I haven't had any problems with it and I have been using it on an almost daily basis since May 2006</review_text>
Camera worked great for us for 6 months. Easy to use, decent pictures and good software. The battery life was fine for our use. It quit working at six months and would no longer focus and is now useless. For a six month disposable camera its a little expensive.</review_text>
This is a complete waste of money. (1) It's clunky and hard to carry around. (2) Not really a good value for money based on the MP's it offers. I would recommend you spend the add'l $50 and get a nicer camera! This one is crap</review_text>
I gave it two stars because it was great... when it worked.I got it sometime in January, and it lasted until about June.I take good care of my things, so I know its not me.It just suddenly *stopped* working.I'm more than just a little miffed.I've tried getting all different types of batteries-I've tried letting it sit for a while.I've taken it to my friend who works with cameras for a living and had him take it apart and clean it and all sorts of stuff.Its dead. I just threw it away</review_text>
Horrible camera. Barely had it 2 months before it went on the fritz.Drained the batteries within a few pictures.So not worth more then the cost of a disposable!! Sorry Kodak...but I'll stick with the good ol' reliable Sony</review_text>
I have had this camera for about a year and a half.  I got so fed up with it that I just bought a new one.  I admit, this camera takes decent pictures in good lighting when the zoom isn't used.  However, this camera takes horrible pictures if the zoom is used.  I would only recomomend this camera to someone who just wants to take pictures of of thier surroundings or to a younger person who is getting their first digital camera</review_text>
I'm not a good photographer but use my cameras for vacation/backpacking pictures.  The P3 was the fourth point and shoot Nikon camera my family has owned.  One of the previous cameras had the lens quit woking probably because it got some dirt in it.  On the P3 the lens extends out pretty far when the camera is turned on.  I accidently dropped it from about 30" off the ground when it was only a few days old.  It landed on the back but flipped over on to the lens.  The outer ring of the lens ended up crooked and would not retract or focus. I sent it back to Nikon and as I expected they said the repair would not be covered by warranty.  They charged $162.50 to fix it.  MasterCard has a program called "Purchase Assurance" that will hopefully cover the repair cost!The other night I saw a commercial on TV for an Olympus camera that could be dropped from 5 feet, get wet, or even frozen down to 14 degrees F and still take pictures.  I wish I had seen that ad first.The Nikon takes great pictures but is way too fragile for a small point and shoot camera.  Not buying Nikon anymore.</review_text>
Amazon replaced the original Coolpix P3 because of technical defects but the new one has worst problems. This one does not even focuses at all.I dont know what to do now because there is no technical service for nikon in my country Venezuela or Latin America. I basicly lost my 300 dollarsPlease answe</review_text>
this was the first digital camera i purchased. i am an adventurous person and  wanted something that would stand up to my lifestyle. this camera wasn't it.the good*it is compact, which is pretty convenient*it has several camera functions that have the potential to work well if you are techno-savvy.the bad*after snorkeling with it for 30 minutes, the camera leaked and broke. olympus replaced it, but only after my 2 month stay in costa rica was over.*the functions are unreliable and difficult to use. rarely if ever do i get them to work how i want. the pictures always need touched up afterwards, sometimes seriously.*the zoom sucks. don't expect to get those awesome close ups they advertise unless you have some serious patience.*the image stabilization is a joke. you need a tripod or surgeons hands to take pictures that aren't blurry.*the user manual left me with a lot of questions</review_text>
Here is the short version.Oct05I bought a Fujifilm Finepix F460 digital camera for $299.99.Nov06Camera stopped working correctly - snapshots have alternatingbright/dark horizonal strips across them.Jan07I sent the camera in to Fujifilm's service center for repair stating that the camera was always handled with care and that a ~$300 camera should work for more than just 1 month after its warranty expires.Jan07The service center sent me a repair estimate for $70.00 + tax and shipping totaling $85.95 (I spent $16.52 to send it to them so my total expense would have been $102.47 for the repair if I accepted).Feb07I contacted the service center and stated that I think they should stand behind their product and fix the camera once they verify the malfunction was not caused by user abuse. And that I don't think that it makes sense for me to pay $100 to repair a $300 camera that stopped working only 1 month after the warranty expired. The service rep, named Christina, asked me to fax her a copy of the original reciept and she would see what she could do. I complied.Mar07Fujifilm returned the camera to me unrepaired with a note saying that I did not reply to the estimate.NowI will now send them the camera and its memory card and a printout of this review asking them to refund the cost of the camera, its memory card, and the shipping I paid.</review_text>
The worst thing for this is, you have to bring a bench of disc with you and replace disc every 20 min if you are capturing HD video. I think most of buyers would take HD video if you buy a HD camcorder. But a small disc can only hold 20 min HD video, have to change disc time by time. The CMOS sensor is worse than CCD but it is the best sensor among CMOS in this price today. A lot of noise will come in low light condition! I bought it for $800 and return it. I think you'd better buy SR1 with a 30G hard drive. That would be a much better one!</review_text>
This product didn't appear to add any appreciable sound benefit; the sound from the ECM-HGZ1 appears to be the same as that recorded with the native audio of the camera itself. I wish I had not bought it</review_text>
We use our videocameras to tape preschool classrooms for observations.  The hope was to use the microphone to isolate conversations.To test the microphone.  I went to a Noisy Starbucks, huge lines, moderate music and tons of conversations.  I recorded on the video cameras mics, then used the zoom mic then used the gun feature.  I aimed the microphone at the barista yelling out the coffee orders.  In all instances, there was no difference in sound quality.I then went to the Sony Style Store in the Mall and had her open a different Microphone and allowed her to install it. She read the package from a distance and then we listened to it in all three settings.  We could not find any difference.I checked the camera instructions and there was no setting for the external mic.  Once the mic is attached and turned on, the external mic is suppose to override the on board mic.I am still insearch for a gun mic for a digital camera.  Many of the new camcorders with hard drives and DVD drives do not have a MIC input or Active Interface Shoe.  I would rather want a MIC input so that I can use a more powerful mic rather than being at the mercy of Sony to create one for their shoe.Overall, I am stuck.  If I record something interesting I will probably have to try to enhance the audio portion while editing.  (The camera shots great video</review_text>
I agree with the previous reviewer. Buying, attaching, and using this microphone is a waste of time and effort. Save your money and get a good microphone, unless you want your sound track to sound like someone mumbling into a tin can</review_text>
I realize this is not a true gunshot mic though I had hope. The product presents itself as cheap and I hate to say the results are not good quality.  At this time, I'm the only reviewing customer and I can see I must have been the only guy to buy one of these.Product attaches well and there is a noticable change in the audio.  Three settings, zoom (syncs with camcorder's zoom), gun (which maxs the zoom of the mic regardless of video zoom), and off.I purchased this to make recordings of presentations better.  I know now that I should have just bought a wireless mic for the speaker.  I thought I'd get more use this route</review_text>
Hi,I have had the VDR-D300 for about 6 months now.  I have never gotten a recording session to last more than about 20 min.  The camcorder constantly locks up, usually after about 10 min.  This is on a full battery - the unit never gets even to a battery alarm.  Several times the reset button nor the reset proceedure per the manual works.  I must have a faulty unit.  I'm investigating repair.  The unit has a great lens, camera, and video image, but my unit is not stable at all</review_text>
Amazon picture shows an original Japanese-produced NP-40 with 3.7V and 710mAh (just like the one I got with my F810). What I got was a Fujifilm-branded Chinese-produced NP-40 with 3.6V and 750 mAh. YES, IT WORKS, but it's just obviously cheaper. Skepticism is a virtue</review_text>
This product will only display 142 photos no matter how many you may be able to squeeze onto a media card.  This little fact isn't mentioned at all on the packaging or in the manual (hidden from consumer). I initially loaded 1,400 photos onto a 128MB card and was shocked to only see 142 displayed. A firmware upgrade is offered from the manufacturer on their website to increase this number to 250, but I could never get the file to load into the frame. Another annoying aspect was that the slideshow plays the photos in the same order everytime you start it along with the same music.  It would have been nice to hear a RANDOM music track start each time the frame is turned on and see some of the later photos instead of having to watch the same photos play in the same order each time you turn the frame back on. Definitely NOT worth the price. Shell out a couple more bucks for something that supports unlimited photos and allows random playback</review_text>
I bought this because it was 50% off. I can't see how anybody can get much enjoyment from trying to look at photos on this viewer. I guess for background noise, it would be good but as a photo viewer, it's not. Small screen + low resolution = poor viewer</review_text>
-- Update 4/23/2007 - The vendor indicates a new firmware release is due in the 5/2007 - 6/2007 time frame, and it may fix the issue of the limited number of pictures mentioned below. --Picture quality is fair and adjusting brightness and contrast in the setup yields good results. Appearance of the unit is good and the black and cherry frames are nicely finished, but the red rectangular sensor for the remote below the LCD display mars the effect somewhat.At 5.6 inches, this size frame is only useful where it can be viewed up close. The images are smaller than a 4x6 print that you would typically view in a book or hold in your hand. I found putting it on a book shelf to be too far away. On an end table next to the chair you would view it from is better. The size of the LCD also should tell you that resolution is not spectacular, true of any frame in this category.My biggest problem with this particular unit is that even after updating to the latest firmware (~3/2007), it will only display up to about 250 pictures. I expected that what ever was on the memory card I inserted would be displayed.Overall this is still a good buy if you do not want to display a large number of photos.  I am very disappointed that the number of displayable pictures is not listed in the manufacturer's product description so you know of the limit before you purchase it</review_text>
The product features are ok, but the screen is very small. Also, the resolution needs to be better. The photos were very grainy. An impressive looking product with not so impressive output</review_text>
I love my Nikon Coolpix 5900 however, the lens failed in less than one year. Service took 6 weeks to repair. The lens failed again after less than 10 days after repair. Why is the lens failing to open again? I absolutely hate the inconvenience of returning this item again for service although I do have a paid plan for it. Why can't warranty be fast, local and competent</review_text>
I bought this camera just under 12 months ago and recently the battery cover door would not stay closed.  I sent it into Nikon along with my proof of purchase and about a week later got a letter saying it would not be covered under warranty. The repair charge with shipping and tax would be $115.22.I am the only person that uses this camera and it was never dropped or abused.  Battery was only taken in and out maybe 4 or 6 times over the time I had it.For this reason I would never buy another Nikon product again.  Next digital camera will charge without removing battery.Camera takes GREAT pictures, but can't do business with a firm that is very difficult to get ahold of and does not honor their warranty.Bye Bye Nikon</review_text>
I was very disappointed in Nikon's service.  This camera has a 2in LCD display that apparently is very fragile.  When I returned for service, Nikon claimed I dropped it... which I didn't!  I was very careful in handling this camera, but the fragile LCD still broke.  To be blamed by the manufacturer was really disappointing.  They offered to repair it for $210, nearly the price of a new camera.I will NEVER by a Nikon product again.  If they are going to sell such a fragile product, they should at least include a hard case for it.</review_text>
I bought this for my husband for Valentine's Day, so he could have photos of our new baby boy handy.  Unfortunately, the images appeared for one day, and then the unit stopped working.  We had to send the unit back.  I was very disappointed as there were many good ratings on the item.</review_text>
I won this camera in a contest and now I'm kinda wishing I never had.  Practically everything I've shot with this thing has turned out bad in some way or another.  From the autofocus that can never decide what it wants to focus on, to the very poor image quality in slightly low lighting situations, to the camera recording glitches in the audio when I capture onto my computer.  I know you may look at this thing and feel like the price is right, but I really suggest you just hold out a little while longer to save up a bit more and buy a Canon camera that's not gonna cause you these problems</review_text>
this is the worst camcorder i've ever owned.the picture quality is the worst.i can't get a clear picture unless i focus at one distance.if i move a little,or something moves in the picture it goes out of focus.i haven't got one decent video with this piece of garbage yet. i recommend panasonic,it was the last camera i owned and every picture was crystal clear.it's my fault i didn't do my research before i bought this</review_text>
The manufacturer apparently states this case is compatible with the Panasonic FZ1 (and by extension the FZ3 which has an identical body).  I bought it and can report that it is not compatible with the FZ1.  With just the lens cap on you have to jam it into the bag sideways and then wrestle with the camera to get it back out.  If you prefer to use the camera with the lens hood adapter on the camera can't fit in the bag at all.  There's also no padding to speak of with this case.  By comparison my Lowe case for my Canon EOS Elan provides a secure, padded repository and you can put the camera in lens down with the strap on top so the camera can easily be withdrawn again.Targus makes decent laptop cases, but they have a great deal to learn about camera cases apparently.Apparently it does fit some cameras, just not the Panasonic FZs.Considering the product is made in China one should be able to expect a bit more at this price</review_text>
You have this camera case listed under accessories for the Panasonic DMC FA20PP Lumix Camera. The camera does not come close to fitting in this case. The camera is 1 1/2 inches wider than the case.</review_text>
Even though Amazon specifically recommended this bag for the Panasonic Lumix (DMC-FZ20PP) camera, and even though I had to return it because it was too small, and even though my camera does not appear on the compatibility list shown in another customer's review, Amazon annoyingly CONTINUES to recommend this bag for my camera. To add insult to injury, Amazon tried to deduct shipping from my refund by claiming that the error was not their fault. (It took two emails to get the full refund, and that was even after I put a LARGE message in my return box not to deduct shipping -- aargh!)Regarding the bag itself, construction seemed sound and this might be a good bag for a small point-and-click camera that requires no accesories</review_text>
I spent a couple hours, trying to get transfer DV from my camcorder to my mac powerbook. After hours and hours I had to realize that the USB cable delivered with the sony camcorder was absolutely worthless. If you don't own a sony VAIO (which in my opinion just a overdesigned peace of fancy 007 gear with an i.Link connection, which no other PC/MAC has)your getting frustrated pretty quick. I would have given the cable a 5 star rating, but the way I had to get the cable, by having to buy it seperately, is a big rip off. However I found the exact same cable in an apple store called "Thin Fire Wire". The exact same cable (1.8 Meter 4 to 6 pin to be exact) for only $29 and it works just fine. So check out an apple store near you and save some money.Shame on you Sony</review_text>
Instead of this pick up a Plextor convertor box.  It takes the output of the camcorder (composite/RCA or S-Video) and compresses that to mpeg-2 (DVD) or mpeg-4 (or DivX) and includes software which easily burns that to DVD or CD (mpeg-1 or mini DVD).  Look for Plextor's M402U box.  Unless you really want to deal with 3.125 MB of data per second (25 Mbps), or about 180 MB per minute, or about 11 GB per hour through the firewire link, get the M402U.  Your options will be greatly expanded, and you won't tell the difference by looking</review_text>
I recently ordered a Kodak camera from Amazon.com. With that I also ordered this battery & the camera bag. Everything was delivered as expected, EXCEPT the camera. Over 2 weeks later I was notified the camera is not available. Now I'm stuck with a battery & camera bag that I can't return because they came from another seller. The camera I bought from a different seller came with the bag & uses a different battery. Now I'm out the cost of the battery, the bag & the shipping charges! Thanks a lot</review_text>
I bought my Kodak V570 less than a year ago. At first the only annoyance I had was the fact that I had to use an attachment to transfer the pictures and that the video was in MOV format that made it diffcult to edit. But a few months ago, the focus refused to work properly. In wide angle, it was fine but when I zoomed in, the image was unacceptably blur. I tried every setting, finally gave up and called Kodak service. I was asked to mail the camera to Sydney from Melbourne where I live. A few weeks later, the camera returns with a note that there was noting wrong with it. Since I still could not take acceptable pictures, I contacted them again. This time to be told to send pictures via e-mail. I did and to my surprise the answer was that poor lighting caused the shutter speed to slow down and hence the blur images. But the pictures were taken in broad daylight. When I disagreed with the logic of the comment, I was told to call them for a discussion over the phone. But the number they gave me was a fax number. Using my resources, I got in touch with technical service by phone. This time I was told to try using a tripod and if the pictures come out alright, it's probably due to shaky hands! It's as though they have people in tech support who have never owned a camera and who have never taken pictures before in their lives. It is so frustrating thinking of the damage the camera has done to my recent India trip when many of the pictures turned out blur. Now I have to put up with illogical and incompetent service people. There is no way I will ever buy another Kodak again. I can recommend it only to my worst enemies. I have now to, again, send the camera in for troubleshooting and going by the level of service so far, I am not holding my breath for answers. Still want to buy a Kodak? Go ahead but don't say I did not warn you. By the way, my other camera is a Casio and it works beautifully shaky hands or not</review_text>
I have to say that I really wanted to like this camera. It takes good pictures and the ultra-wide lens is a nice feature. It is quite compact and has a nice screen. The software is reasonably good and has a nice presentation to the user interface.Why 2 stars? Ok here's the bad stuff:1) In the first shipment I got, the normal mode (non-ultra-wide angle) didn't work. The images were garbled and almost unrecognizable. The ultra-wide images were fine. I attributed it to getting a random lemon and returned it for an even exchange. The second V570 I got from Amazon worked fine until about 5 months later and then the normal mode crapped out on me. So, I don't think it is just a random problem. There appears to be a reliability issue with the non-wide angle part of this camera since it seems statistically unlikely that I would randomly get two cameras with the exact same problem. My V570 is now a nice-looking paperweight and I use a Casio Exilim EX-Z70.2) The stand seemed nice at first until it came time to travel. You have to unhook the whole thing and lug it around with you if you want to charge your camera or download pictures and movies without a card reader dongle. Also, since you have to charge the battery in the camera, you can't charge a spare battery while you are taking pictures with the other. For comparison, my new Casio EX-Z70 has a USB cable that is easy to stick in the pocket of my bag and has an external battery charger. So, if one battery is dead I can leave it behind in the charger while I take pictures with the spare.3) The movies that you take with this camera are stored in MOV format instead of AVI or MPEG. While it does play in most PCs if you have installed Quicktime, it is not supported by my streaming media player (D-Link DSM-320RD) and is difficult to work with in the video editor/DVD creator SW I use (Sonic MyDVD). I can't say how widely MOV is supported compared to AVI and MPEG, but that format created problems for me.So, I applaud Kodak for not clinging to the sinking boat anchor of the photographic film business and going digital. But I think a few more usability studies and more attention to reliability would help make this a winner in future iterations</review_text>
The manufacturer apparently states this case is compatible with the Panasonic FZ1 (and by extension the FZ3 which has an identical body).  I bought it and can report that it is not compatible with the FZ1.  With just the lens cap on you have to jam it into the bag sideways and then wrestle with the camera to get it back out.  If you prefer to use the camera with the lens hood adapter on the camera can't fit in the bag at all.  There's also no padding to speak of with this case.  By comparison my Lowe case for my Canon EOS Elan provides a secure, padded repository and you can put the camera in lens down with the strap on top so the camera can easily be withdrawn again.Targus makes decent laptop cases, but they have a great deal to learn about camera cases apparently.Apparently it does fit some cameras, just not the Panasonic FZs.Considering the product is made in China one should be able to expect a bit more at this price</review_text>
You have this camera case listed under accessories for the Panasonic DMC FA20PP Lumix Camera. The camera does not come close to fitting in this case. The camera is 1 1/2 inches wider than the case.</review_text>
Bought this as an XMAS present to myself - to bring along family photos while on business travel. I'm now on the 2nd unit (exchanged directly w/Phillips), and am still having the same issue with it not reliably working with external (in my case, Sony memory sticks).The internal memory is pitiful, and unless you want to resize all the photos you put in it, you are not going to be able to hold very many internally.I've yet to get the auto on/off feature to work, and while it is perhaps a PC friendly device, it's certainly not always Mac friendly - the controls are cumbersome to work with, and the directions meager.I wanted to be able to carry this in a backpack or carryon bag, the fact that the support stand can't be folded tight against the unit makes it difficult to do this - of course, no mention of this in the product description.Also no mention that it only supports older memory sticks - NO SUPPORT for the new, MS ProDuo sticks (and no mention of that in the product descriptions either)I thought I would get a quality product from Phillips, and this certainly looked like it had potential - unfortunately, it's turned out to be a piece of junk, one I've been screwing around with for so long that it's probably not returnable.Don't waste your time and dollars.......................</review_text>
The power cord that accompanies this charger is bulkier than the charger itself.  You wouldn't get that from the picture.  Too bad, other manufacturers have learned to incorpaorate the plugging mechanism directly into the charger.</review_text>
The quality of the pictures are nice WHEN they will actually print.  Unless you use the printer with your camera ON the dock it is incredibly hard to get the darn thing to work.  If you decide to crop the picture on your PC and then want to print it be prepared to invest time in getting the darn thing to work!  I have had it for sometime now and I have never been more irritated than when it comes time to print pictures on this thing.</review_text>
This is a wonderful item IF or WHEN it works.  It prints the pictures beautifully IF it works.  The trouble is that after using it for a little while (and I mean a little while) It will quit feeding the paper in and the lights start blinking saying that you are out of paper and that you are out of ink.  I have messed with it and messed with it, for some of you who have the same problems sometimes cleaning the feeder roller with rubbing alcohol will get it to work but this doesn't work all the time.  Right now my printer won't work and I cleaned the roller and it is very aggravating as the paper and ink aren't cheap.  I think it is cheaper going down to WalMart and using their instant photo machine.  This is not worth the money or the aggravation!!!!</review_text>
Terrible product.  Printer jams repeatedly or paper never feeds properly.  I've had a replacement sent and the same thing happens.  Even though I have printed less than 50 photos with this replacement, which I have had less than a year, Kodak support says it cannot be fixed by me and I need to have it serviced by them for 80 bucks.  A new one sells for $99 and the price is dropping fast.  I told Kodak support I would not send it back to them, spending 80 dollars would be like flushing money down the toilet or taking a stick in the eye. I further notified Kodak that I would instead send it to the place it belongs - a land fill.Also, I've heard that the recommended fix (which does not work, by the way), unplugging the unit to reset, will cause the color cartridge light to illuminate prematurely.  With the cost of paper and cartridges, this last insult makes this printer one to avoid.  1 star because when it does print the prints look good, but, man, the aggravation to get this thing to work correctly is not worth any price.  Rushed to the market place without enough reliability testing on an unsuspecting public.  Total junk from a venerable name desperate for a hit product.</review_text>
Mini DV cams are better, and should cost about the same. This particular camera has poor quality video and it is a pain to get video transferred to your computer. The software is glitchy, so you'll probably end up downloading drivers yourself. Find a different camera</review_text>
The camera operates good, but I thought it was suppose to be new.  It looked a bit used and was cracked on the bottom.  It does work, but unfortunately all the packageing was tossed out</review_text>
I was counting on a THREE HOUR working battery. After all, that's what it says it gives you.  So far all I get from it, after more than a month of use, is two hour, max..</review_text>
I made mistake getting such a big & bulky case for small MiniDV Sony camcorder HC26. This case can take any big size old camcorders (like old Sony Hi8), so if you are looking for your new camcorder this definately is a bad choice</review_text>
The noise problem with this camera is horrendous.  DO NOT BUY IT!  If you take a close-up picture of an eye you will not be able to see the eyelashes clearly... NEVER.  NO MATTER HOW HARD YOU TRY.My 3-year old 5MPX Sony is much better than this Panasonic camera.  I am sorry I bought it. I would return this product if I could and buy a good camera instead.The Lumix DMC-LX2 camera cannot focus one bit, many pictures are out of focus and made worse by the noise problem.  Even with the motion smother function turned on many pictures come out blurred.  Noise is very noticeable with graininess appearing very readily.  You can tweak the quality enhancing features for sharpness, noise reduction, contrast and saturation all you want but these are worthless to reduce the noice and sharpness problem.The Amazon website says you can use standard SD memory which is untrue(perhaps this has been corrected now).  The camera only accepts more expensive SDHC (high capacity) cards.  These SDHC cards cannot be read by standard memory stick readers so I have to use the USB port which takes forever to download even a handful of pictures to my computer.</review_text>
Got this camera for my wife - a digital novice - during Christmas 2005. Camera is easy to use and takes good pictures. Easily interfaces with PC through USB. However, I also (as did another reviewer) started having problems after about 11 months. Camera would not take pictures as the CCD went bad. Luckily I had an extended service contract and it was repaired. Unfortunately, it just quit working again (April 2007) and the service contract company says they "...won't bother fixing it again..." and is refunding my purchase price. Gracious but a hassle doing without a camera for a second time. Good camera but if you buy one make sure you get the service contract</review_text>
...but it stopped working after a year. The only thing the lens sees now is black, although the camera still turns on and I can look at pictures I took before the problem started. Nonetheless, I loved this camera, and I think it was worth it, even though it only worked a year. Now I've learned my lesson and will buy a longer warranty or exchange for m new camera</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my own birthday present last October.  I have owned it for 1 year and 2 months and now it isn't working.  I paid $400.00 for it last year when it was "new."  The LCD will only turn on every 15 - 20 times after I take the batteries out and turn the camera on and off. I purchased new rechargeable batteries, but that wasn't the answer.  I contacted Panasonic but it is out of the warrantee period.  They will charge a flat $140.00 to fix it and I can get a new one for about $150.00.  I loved this camera, but it is such a disappointment.  I was very easy with it - it just stopped working!  Buy a different camera - I wish I had</review_text>
Great camera for the price. But I guess you get what you pay for, bad warranty...........</review_text>
After doing a bunch of research, I bought two of these for my teenage kids since they were said not to have the defective Sony CCD that late model 2005 point-and-shoots all seem to have had.  The first zamera lasted six months before the lcd display began to worsening exhibit dark striations.  After a few days of that, the camera dies completely.  The second camera made it another two months before falling prey to the same disease.  One camera . . . a fluke maybe.  But two?  That suggests a real problem so beware.</review_text>
DSC Series camera all have a CCD imager defect that will leave screen blank after you use the camera for 2 or 3 years. (Do a google search. You will find out what happened.) Sony knew this problem years ago. But refuse to fix it. They will wait until the camera fail and then charge you $300 to fix it. That's what happens to my DSC-F717. Ever wondering why Dell, HP etc all recall Sony battery for laptop, but Sony did not recall their own laptop battery? Sony will never fix their own problem. We the customer have to pay for their mistake.</review_text>
I bought this in August 2005, when the original battery that came with my Nikon Coolpix 880 (late 2000) started running down fast.  On the page I ordered from, it appeared to be a genuine Nikon battery, however, when I received it, it was not.  It was made in Taiwan, and does not have the Nikon brand name anywhere on the battery (or packaging, as I remember).  This battery has never held a charge well.  It's about as bad as the original battery is now, and I've only had it a few months.  Maybe I just got a lemon--but I'd recommend you buy a genuine Nikon, if you can find one</review_text>
I was looking for a pair of roof-prism binoculars like this, for hawk and bird watching. I had looked at Swarovskis, but they were way out of my budget, nearly a thousand dollars for this resolution.These binoculars are crystal-clear, with sharp focus. The 42mm lens lets in lots of light, lots more than the 35's I've been using. I wear glasses and the twist- up- and -down eyecups are a blessing. There are also attached lens protectors for the 42mm, nice because I always used to lose them.For the price, these can't be beat</review_text>
I bought this camera for myself during Christmas 2004.It was suppose to be a utility camera, ebay items and class projects for the kids only--I don't trust digital cameras for family photos.The Kodak CX7300 seemed to fit the bill; inexpensive, easy to use and with more than enough resolution at 3.2mp.The flaw in this camera didn't appear until I pulled it out of the drawer some months later. The camera wouldn't turn on. I checked the batteries and they were in excellent shape. I eventually tried replacing the batteries and, sure enough, that worked.The next time I took out the camera, the exact same thing happened. And the time after that.At first, I thought the CX7300 was eating the batteries. But eventually I came to the conclusion that the camera doesn't eat batteries, it nibbles at them. It won't run on anything but brand-spanking-new batteries.The Kodak batteries that came with the CX7300 are still in my mini-mag flashlight, going strong.I contacted Kodak about this flaw. They wanted to talk about what kind of batteries I'm using--Kodak--or the option of my purchasing a Camera Dock and some rechargeable batteries. A solution that would increase my investment by about seventy-five percent.I thought that buying an optional AC Adapter would be the simple, and cheap, solution. Surprise, surprise, the CX7300 is one of the few digital cameras Kodak makes that doesn't take one.So, now that I'm way past warranty, what do I do with it?I'm shopping for another camera</review_text>
I bougt this camera and a Olymus camera, both in the same price range, the Kodak camera was by far deficeint in quality of image and workmanship. Avoid this at all cost the Olympus was well made, durable, higher quality picture and ease of use</review_text>
My camera has broken in less than one year of owning it.  Because I received it as a gift I don't have the proof of purchase so Kodak will not fix my camera for no cost.  What a lemon the CX7300 is.  First of all it takes pictures so delayed you never really get a good candid picture.  What's broken?  I can take one picture before the batteries go dead.  I change the batteries, one picture.  Change the batteries again, one picture</review_text>
I got this camera when it was rather new. I am not extremely pleased with it. It is not acting this way because it is 2 years old...it was like this when i bought it.-first of all...it has no lens cover so you HAVE to keep it in a camera bag. Incase you touch the lens without relizing...all your pictures will be ruined.-It takes for ever to take a picture. You have to wait for like  2 seconds for the picture to be taken.-It eats up batteries like crazy-It takes forever to turn on-If you have the flash setting on autoflash, the camera will still flash in bright sunlight-The pictures are extremly blurry when you print at home-It has no optical zoom (but the zoom is really the customer's choice.</review_text>
I bought this camera 3 months ago and have used it a few times. Last week all of a sudden the pictures look out of focus and over-exposed. I haven't changed anything or done anything. I have no idea what's wrong with the camera, but given the price I'm pretty annoyed and Amazon.com will not refund my money because it has been over 30 days</review_text>
I've read good reviews of this camera on this and other sites but I am not having the same experience. The quality of the photos are horrible so I started thinking it was me and I tried it with different settings, tried being very, very still etc but, I only get one good shot out of about ten. I have a Fuji 4mp that I bought about 6 years ago and it takes way better pictures than this. I bought this so I could give my old one to my daughter but I'm gonna end up giving this one to my daughter and and keeping my Fuji. We recently had snow here in Tucson so I took pictures with mu Fuji and compares them to the Canon and the 6 year old Fuji Finepix beat it hands down. I don't get it, did I get a defective camera or am I doing something wrong or does this camera just suck</review_text>
I was looking for a pair of roof-prism binoculars like this, for hawk and bird watching. I had looked at Swarovskis, but they were way out of my budget, nearly a thousand dollars for this resolution.These binoculars are crystal-clear, with sharp focus. The 42mm lens lets in lots of light, lots more than the 35's I've been using. I wear glasses and the twist- up- and -down eyecups are a blessing. There are also attached lens protectors for the 42mm, nice because I always used to lose them.For the price, these can't be beat</review_text>
I am far from an expert however even for an amatuer this lens was horrible. I took about 400 shots with my Digital Rebel XT and got so frustrated witht the poor quality of the auto focus that I immediately returned it / got a refund.In all but the brightest lighting conditions this lens was extremely slow with the autofocus. In many cases the lens could not focus and continually hunted through it's entire range. Since most of my photography is of animals I simply could not wait for the autofocus to work and missed many shots.I tested the autofocus against my Canon 18-55 EF-s (packaged with the Rebel XT) and a Canon 75-300 EF. In every instance where the Tamron could not focus the Canon lenses had no problem! When the Tamron would focus I found the pictures were not as sharp as my Canon lenses. Again I'm far from an expert however I was only printing 4x6 photos.I replaced the Tamron with a Quantaray(Sigma) 55-200 DC which has proven to have a very good autofocus and great optical quality(for amatuers..)Bottom line.. It was hard to part with the Tamron because I was really enthused about the zoom range however I would much prefer to use 2 lenses can focus than 1 that doesn't. I have read many reviews with the same problem noted. Tamron needs to get thier act together</review_text>
I loved this camera when I received it and used it a couple of times. Then, it just stopped working. I have since purchased the same camera elsewhere and it is works great. Maybe this was just a bad egg. Good camera, but 2 months of use for the money wasn't good</review_text>
I was looking for a pair of roof-prism binoculars like this, for hawk and bird watching. I had looked at Swarovskis, but they were way out of my budget, nearly a thousand dollars for this resolution.These binoculars are crystal-clear, with sharp focus. The 42mm lens lets in lots of light, lots more than the 35's I've been using. I wear glasses and the twist- up- and -down eyecups are a blessing. There are also attached lens protectors for the 42mm, nice because I always used to lose them.For the price, these can't be beat</review_text>
I originally purchased the Samsung DUOCAM SCD6040.  It fortunately broke 1 week before the warranty ran out.  The video began having giant pixilated squares when video taping and on playback.  Though under warranty, it still cost me $49 (their fee) to send in the camera for a repair.  The repaired camera came back broken.  I had to deal with many customer service people, but finally got them to agree mine was a "lemon" and they sent me the SCD6550.  Now 10 months later, the video and playback on this duocam has broken.  You see a black screen with yellow blocks on the LCD and through the viewfinder.  I cannot video tape or playback anything on tape.  It is not under warranty.  I can't believe their cameras/duocams don't last longer than one year.  They must use cheap parts.  PLEASE save yourself the headache and chose another brand.</review_text>
I thought I was upgrading from analog to digital but after seeing the videos I shot indoors I liked the analog better. Very poor and grainy.  Also the focus is terrible! While filming 3 people in a row moving from one to the other the focus would blur then refocus.  I filmed my daughter's ballet recital and could not believe how the auto focus kept bluring then focusing.  Very disappointed with this purchase.  I guess it's true what they say. "You get what you pay for"  It seems under $600.00 doesn't get you much</review_text>
I have many pet peaves about this camera.a) the video showed untrue colors and came out rather dark----don't try to record indoorsb) didn't fit into my hand naturally and had to use two hands to navigate the menu and even the record button. NOT GOODc) didn't start up fast enough---I always missed the shotd) the camera photos aren't of good qualitye) microphone not that great---you couldn't even hear people that were standing ten feet away from the camera.f) if your laptop is over 3 years old, even if you've got Windows XP, don't expect the software to be compatible.g) the zoom lens zoomed to fast at the movement of my finger. I'd lightly press the zoom button to one side and it zoomed too fast and it did the same for zooming out. I felt like I had to just manually zoom----ie. walk up closer to the subjectI honestly say stay away from the Samsung's and the Sony's aren't much better and they have a monopoly on the matching accessories, ie. only Sony products are compatible with the camcorder.I finally bought a JVC and they are awesome----the take more light in, better acoustical recording, better zoom function, quicker start up, and lighter. You can even buy the cheapest model (which is pretty much what I've got) and the picture is great! My parents commented on how they thought I must have a camera like the News reporters, as it's the same quality</review_text>
To add on to the previous reviewers, I was very disappointed with this camera's performance.  I compared the "5 megapixel" photos with photos taken with my Canon, PowerShot G3 (4megapixels), and the SCD6550 simply did not produce the same quality stills.  The camera itself also seemed flimsy.  The idea of having a two-in-one camera is so attractive.  But another attractive concept, Canon's Elura50, offered a camcorder with a compact design.  In the end, however, it broke down only after a year and a half.  For a $500 purchase that is not a durable lifespan (cf. reviews for Elura50 and you will see that many are having hardware problems).  This camera seemed less durable than the Elura50 as I maneuvered the various parts and dials.  Of course, I am returning the camera before it can prove its durability.  Nevertheless, maybe the folks at CNet can stake their money on it.  Lastly, I should add that the positioning of the record button and function dials are poorly placed.  I found that I had to use both hands when switching back and forth from camcorder to still cam modes as well as simply engaging the record button.  This definitely takes away from the idea of a convinient solution for capturing those special moments.Again, this camera is a great idea.  But, I suppose we should wait until the manufacturers make one that has both solid hardware and quality image recording.  This one is on the right track, but, still so far from accomplishing a quality product.</review_text>
I would agree with the other review.  The indoor/low light quality of the video is unacceptable.  I will be returning the camcorder today to purchase another</review_text>
The SCD6550 is a great idea, but just doesn't preform as I had hoped.  I was looking for one camera to take on vacation, replacing carrying a 2 year old Sony MiniDV and a 5 MP Sony CyberShot.  My Sony takes 1 MP stills, has excellent video, but @ 1MP, the stills are not nearly print worthy.  This camera is actually smaller and lighter than my Sony.The 5MP still camera function gave excellent results, both with flash and with natural light and outside.  Shot for shot it produced either as good or better prints (4x6) than the Sony CyberShot.Digital video is this unit's short coming.  I did identical shots inside and outside with the Sony and Samsung.  The Samsung's video quality was very poor, looked more like analog or standard 8mm quality.  Inside, with natural room lighting, it was pretty much unacceptable.  Outside, the shots lacked the crispiness of the Sony.  I took it back, will keep the Sony's and hope that Sony comes out with a greater than 2 or 3 MP model soon</review_text>
These are NOT pioneer boxes.  These are MBI boxes. I bought them and was very disappointed since I also have bought pioneer boxes before, and when I compared with the MBI, the latter one is much less sturdy and even the index cards are flimpsy compared with the Pioneer's.  Do not buy these.Also, Adorama's customer service is very unfriendly in regard to making their customers satisfied.  They insist that they are the same, that I need to return them on my cost, because of their mistake.  They flew from one reason to another with blame from that they have never carried pioneer products, to Amazon's mistake in naming them Pioneer.  But then their own website also has named them Pioneer.  Anyway, just reconsider about buying any products from this company. It's not worth it, considering the shipping is outrageously high.  It is my honest opinion.</review_text>
I have to agree with the other reviews of this scope.  I purchased this scope as a Christmas gift.  When I opened it, the equatorial mount (the basis for the ENTIRE scope) was broken.  I contacted Celestron and was promised another part for it, which never arrived.  I contacted the company again and finally had the replacement part shipped to me.  It DIDN'T FIT.  Finally, I was sent another telescope to replace the original telescope.  The equatorial mount was in 1 piece.. yeah!  Too bad the optical tube had a screw that was bent and I could not assemble this one. I even had the chance to speak with the manager of the technical support (who was the original person who offered to send me the part that never arrived) and all I got was a bunch of excuses.I finally took peices from both boxes and made myself one ENTIRE telescope.  It's February and I just now have a product that works.  (I haven't had time to try it though!)  Celestron offered no refunds for this telescope, so buyer beware.  If they are not willing to satisfy customers, your business is better served with a company who will stand behind the product it sells. Good luck</review_text>
First off, many of these reviews address the actual use with this telescope....I cannot even comment on how well this telecope works because the TWO that were sent to me were BROKEN!I ordered well before Christmas as a gift for my son...but to be his big gift from Santa Claus.  My husband opened the telescope up late Christmas Eve to put it together and have it ready in front of the Christmas tree and right away it was clear that this telescope was broken.  The 2 mounting screws were  bent, very bent.  This puts you in quite a position when it needs to be up and ready for your child.After A WHOLE LOT OF EFFORT with Amazon's customer service (from another country!) they sent a replacement...to the WRONG ADDRESS!!  (long story that I will not bore you with.)When the 2nd telescope arrived my husband once again opens it up and guess what?  They same screws were again bent.  The box on the outside was not damaged, but something is not working for them.I am so disapointed with them.  This was the first time I had purchased something this big from Amazon.  I have mainly done music and movies, small stuff.After this experience I will NO LONGER buy a big ticket item that would have the possibility of damage.  It's just not worth the headache and problems, not to mention DISAPOINTMENT, to my son.I would proceed with caution when ordering this item from Amazon.  If you get a broken one...you just might be receiving the 2 I have had to return</review_text>
This is a good example of the kind of scope astronomers warn beginners against.The first red flag is the ridiculously high maximum magnification of over 700x. Do you know what you will see at 700x in this scope? Nothing but a dim blur. Note that the objective (main) lens is 60mm. All telescope optics have inherent limitations; maximum useful magnification per millimeter of aperture is about 2x. Therefore, with any attempt to use this scope at magnification of over 120-140x,  increase in image size will be more than offset by breakdown, and that's even assuming the quality of the objective lens is any good.The finder is useless, smaller than the bare minimum size of 6x30.  Finding anything but the moon will be time-consuming and frustrating.  The low power 20mm eyepiece may or may not be usable on the scope, depending on its design and field of view.  That the design information is not given in the ad is disturbing.  And don't even think of using the 4mm (high power) eyepiece or the barlow.I do not recommend equatorial mounts for beginners.  Their tracking properties are primarily for astrophotography, and for this they require careful setup.  The equatorial mount on this scope is provided primarily as a marketing gimmick to impress nave buyers with its complex "scientific" appearance.In a way, it is hard to fault Celestron for making and marketing this scope.  Their upper-tier instruments are quite good, but the big money appears to be made on mass market toys like this.  In one sense the sale of these scopes subsidizes their good models.  Just make sure, gentle reader, to stay away from the toys.Using an astronomical telescope is not like playing an MP3 file and but rather like playing a guitar. It is a learned skill. And you must do a lot of homework before you buy a telescope. Buying without prior experience is like buying a car without knowing anything about driving. If you want to see the wonders of the sky, contact your local astronomy club and attend one of their star parties. The members love sharing their hobby and can set you straight as to how to get started. The best way is to learn the sky with the unaided eye and 10x50 binoculars (decent ones are available on Amazon), then graduate to something along the lines of a 150-200mm (6-8") Dobsonian; Celestron's own 6" Starhopper can be found on Amazon for under $290.For more information on buying telescopes, see my encyclopedic guide on Amazon: "So you want to buy a telescope.</review_text>
This scope is not a good starter scope for anyone interested in astronomy.  Here's why:1.  The objective is too small, only 60 mm, 2.36 inches, so it is too small to bring in the light necessary for even a beginning look at the universe.  I suppose it is adequate for the moon, but that is it.  The planets will appear as very small disks.  One will be able to see Saturn's rings, but the image will be very small.  Forget it for deep sky objects, clusters, galaxies, etc.2.  The 4mm eyepiece is too powerful for this scope.  The observer will find it hard to look through (very small eye opening), and will in most cases cause blurred images.  The 20 mm eyepiece is the only functional eyepiece.  The barlow is a 3x, which again is too poweerful for this scope.3.  The mount will vibrate when touched, which will cause the image in the eyepiece to "shiver", which is very frustrating.Even for the low price, don't be enticed by this scope; it has too many flaws. Save your money for a larger scope with a better mount.Jim "Konedog" Koenig, astronomy buf</review_text>
My ownership of this camera was brief.  First, you must know I love Nikon.  I have 2 other Nikons--an old Cooplix 2200 and a Coolpix 5700.  They have wonderful lenses and give great pix.  I thought my experience with this model would be similar.  NOT!~  From picture numero uno, the lens cover refused to completely open and cooperate.  I got pictures, yes, but they had lazy black eyelids on each corner where the lens cover had not opened up to clear the lens.  What a dissappointment!  I traded it in for a Canon A520 and am happy with that camera.  I suppose it is just what it is.  If I'd saved and spent a lot more money on a D50 or Rebel, who knows?  Anyway,  that is my sad tale with the Nikon 4800</review_text>
Not too long after I purchased this camera the screen turned white when I turned it on. I would turn it off and on and nothing would help. Finally I would take the batteries out and put them back in. This seemed to fix the problem a few times. After that I thought it was just operator error. But it wasn't. The camera finally gave out and the white screen never went away. So after being annoyed I left the camera alone for awhile. An event came up about a month later. I got my camera and tried to turn it on. Nothing happened. So I changed the batteries. Still nothing happened. I'm not sure what happened. I do believe I purchased a LEMON camera. I'm hoping to resolve these issues with Samsung. It was one of the cheapest cameras on the market at the time. So I guess you get what you pay for!</review_text>
So this was my first digital camera, got it last july for my birthday. I go to a lot of concerts, so i needed a camera that could take pictures in not good light and take pics of moving subjects. Well, two days after i got it, i was at a festivale watching my fav band perform and the the screen went white. It would still take pics, only you couldnt see them. After changing the batteries and turnign it off and on, it went back to normal. Alarmed, i called Samsung and they told me the couldnt do anythign until it was white again. It only did it a couple of times after that so i never called again.But that was only one thing wrong with it. This is a horrible camera for concerts, the pictures are always blurry. Shoot, even when im at my house the pics still come out blurry sometimes. Tuesday i went to see my fav band again, and the dumb thing goes white. It woudnt stop, no matter how many times i turned it off and on again. Now the flash is broke and i'm ready to throw it against the wall. You can't trust this camera. You never know when it will take good pics or bad pics.I wouldnt even consider buying this camera for a minute!</review_text>
I guess I really shouldn't complain because my husband won the camera in an office rally. But the pictures it takes are disgraceful for a Samsung product every two to three pictures are blurred unrecognizably-where you can't even tell what you have taken. If you have found yourself among the fortunate few who actually found success with this camera thank your lucky stars. Even if it is a less expensive choice versus the other cameras on the market today spend the extra money it would be worth it not to miss any family moments like my family did,on this useless piece of CRAP</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my 13-yr old daughter as her first digital camera. It was a Christmas present so I am highly dissapointed that 3 months after purchase, the flash stopped working. The picture quality was good but it hardly makes up for the fact that she can no longer take photo's indoors or in low light. I would not recommend this camera.</review_text>
I agree with the two previous reviewers.  There needs to be a user manual and there isn't one.  The fine adjustment will adjust the vertical angle maybe 15 degrees.  This isn't very helpful for star gazing.  The maximum height of the tripod is only 45 inches.  This is an uncomfortable height for looking through binoculars while standing. Celestron should have a users guide showing how their tripod and binoculars are supposed to work together</review_text>
On reciept of the tripod, I found it wrapped and packed (on the outside)in a manner that should have insured an undammaged product.  When I opened the box, I found a tripod that looked like it had been run over by a fork lift and then thrown into the box.  There was minimal packing around the tripod itself, mostly just nylon bags to prevent scratching, and nothing to keep the unit from being tossed around.  I have to wonder about the quality control prior to shipping.  Also, if you are not familure with how to assemble and work this type of tripod you will be better served with a different model or company, instructions are not part of their package</review_text>
I ordered this product from amazon.com and when it arrived I fully charged the batteries.  When I went to use them they were dead.  I charged them again and when I went to use them a few days later the batteries were dead again! I want my money back</review_text>
I own the Olympus FE-100 Digital camera, and it came with unchargeable batteries (oxyride). I switched to Energizer Batteries and bought an Energizer 4-battery charger that can be had for less than the price of half a tank of gas. It's not a quick charger like this one, but I say for less than half the investment, I've got a charger that does the job. I would NOT spend this kind of money on a charger. So I say, if you're part of the "gotta have it now" generation, you definitely pay for convenience. Otherwise, charge your batteries more slowly (2-3 hours) and save a lot of money</review_text>
Two months. . .the amount of time in which I saved to purchase what I thought was an 8 megapixel camera for a steal. . .One week. . .to find that no matter what I tried I was utterly dissapointed. . .1)No matter the setting EVERY picture is drowned out by the flash and withouth the flash the picture is nothing more than I horrible blur.2)The 5 minute 2 time flash is horrible. . .every person I try to get a picture of thinks it has taken the picture before the final flash even goes off resulting in 90% horrible family photos.I could go on but I wont. . .I cant even stress my dissapointment in my waste of money. . .there is a reason that it is not the bestselling camera on amazon. . .BECAUSE IT IS NOT WORTH IT.I now have to save up for another and hopefully pawn this off on someone with less expectancy in a camera</review_text>
this thing stinks! so much digital noise its output is terrible. I don't know how they can put this thing out and have it be so BAD. Don't be fooled thinking WOW 8 megs for a low price, I have a 5 meg sony that is many times better. all that noise blows the detail out. get it if you like lots of little green and red flecks in your pictures, other wise stay away</review_text>
I ordered this tripod, and it arrived broken.The assembly to which a camera is attached is made out of plastic.    I asked for an RMA order via E-Mail, and they only gave me an address to mail it back to with a 'copy of the invoice.'Being lazy about mailing things back, and since it was cheap to begin with I tried repair it myself.  Where it broke (the three plastic rings on the camera mount), it was impossible to re-glue, because of the torsion placed on those rings with any sort of pressure.Even if your tripod arrives un-broken, it will likely break the first time you drop it on the camera mount from any height at all.</review_text>
The first day I took them out to hunt with them they fogged over.  I brought them home and there is fog INSIDE.  Also inside is some dark crap that you cannot get to...and it is on the lens.  I called Bushnell's help line and they told me..."Well, it isn't internally fog proof, just externally"  When asked about the stuff on the inside.  "That is probably fungus, that sometimes happens"  I JUST BOUGHT THE BINOCULARS!!!  He stated I could send them in and miss my entire hunting season and they would take the fungus out.AVOID THESE AT ALL COSTS!!!  They are a shoddy product with an even worse strap that is plastic and cuts into your neck</review_text>
I read other review, and decided to give it a try. As soon as I recieve it in the mail, and opened the box, I realized this was a mistake. CHEAP quality Binocular with "high power" being a selling point. It came in already broken with two eye ruber pieces falling apart. you can see how the cheap glue was being used to put it in place! It is extremly heavy to hold in hands for more than one minute for nature observation. You will be CONSTANTLY ajdusting the focus. Your fingers bumps with focus bar while you are holding it. Indeed Strap, Case, Lense protectors are all cheap crap, and annoying to have it all ON~! I am taking this back, and buying MADE IN JAPAN "NIKON EAGLE VIEW" 100 times BETTER. YOU GET WHAT YOU PAY FOR~!!!!!</review_text>
I was looking for a pair of roof-prism binoculars like this, for hawk and bird watching. I had looked at Swarovskis, but they were way out of my budget, nearly a thousand dollars for this resolution.These binoculars are crystal-clear, with sharp focus. The 42mm lens lets in lots of light, lots more than the 35's I've been using. I wear glasses and the twist- up- and -down eyecups are a blessing. There are also attached lens protectors for the 42mm, nice because I always used to lose them.For the price, these can't be beat</review_text>
The case does not fit and the battery is incorrect forthe DX759</review_text>
This kit conveniently contains 20 sheets of photo paper. Unfortunately, Kodak doesn't contain an ink cartridge for them.Fine, I thought, I'll buy a separate cartridge. Guess what? You can't! Kodak only sells cartridges bundled with paper so you will be forced to use their paper. Why do they sell paper separately but not ink cartridges? Seems pretty dirty</review_text>
I don't see how they can recommend this kit for all DX cameras.  The DX7590 would barely fit in that case</review_text>
Just returned the mobiCam- had poor reception, even in adjacent room! smallo screen & not stable - falls easy & seems like would break very quickly with a 3 yr old in the house!</review_text>
VERY GOOD PRODUCT VERY SATIsfied, the night vision is great clarity is very good and portability is awesome plus the price is even bette</review_text>
I purchased, through work, the PowerShot S70 in July of 2005.  I've always owned Nikon products personally, but the features for the price of the S70 swayed me away from my usual Nikon brand loyalty.  In the 12 months I've had the S70, it's been sent to the factory twice for repairs--the second time was just 6 days before the warranty expired.  The first time it was sent in was because the lens door failed to turn on the camera and it was almost to come off of its track.  Eight months later, the flash quit working in all modes AND the door was failing AGAIN!The flash and door problem occurred while I was in Yosemite NP, so you can imagine the disappointment in being in a place like that with a camera that is only half functioning.Now, the warranty is expired and I hold my breath every time I slide the lens door open.  I have no faith in the Canon S70 and have lost a lot faith in Canon products as a whole.The only bright side of this experience is that the factory repairs were completed within 2-3 weeks, which I thought was fast for warranty work</review_text>
I received the lens adapter but there was no info on how to use it. It screws in over the regular ZOOM lens but offers absolutely nothing to the use of the KODAK DX6490. I suspect there are additional filters or other accessories that might make the adapter useful and hope to find out what they may be in the near future. The lens adapter by itself, doesn't seem to add anything to the use of the camera without something else ???Ben Boykin, Las Cruces, NM 8801</review_text>
I made the mistake of ordering this camera to substitute buying a pro camera. The color and noise was terrible. If you want a great point and shoot camera get the Canon powershot s50 while they are still available. The camera has pro features, it was so good they stopped making it because it should have been in the pro camera line at a much higher price tag. If you want to see s50 pictures go to [...] and search my gallery Cathreen Styles. All most all of the pictures in the gallery were taken with the s50. I am going to buy another just to have when mine breaks. By the way, I did end up buy a pro camera, mainly because of the look. I got the Canon 30d and love it</review_text>
I just got this printer dock with a camera, and the printer feature is a real pain!  The paper will almost never feed no matter what I've tried.  When it does feed, it ends up jamming.  I only successfully printed one picture and tried 7 others and then the laminate was gone.  I'm very unhappy with it and will probably send it back</review_text>
I recently purchased the G600 printer dock and haven't even gotten to try it out yet--the print cartridge that came with it didn't work.  I ordered another and inserted it and it still doesn't work. It constantly tells me the cartridge is empty and needs replaced.  Lots of time and money involved in this mess---stick with HP!</review_text>
Here's the Good News:I have had many cameras in my life, digital and film , and I have found the Z1 to be my favorite.  The camera is very user friendly and the pictures are sharp with great color.  My previous camera was a Minolta Dimage 7($800) and I found that this camera's photo quality was just as good.  The best feature of the camera is the fact that it is sturdy and compact enough to carry with you daily.  Owning this camera made taking pictures a daily part of my life.Here's the Bad News:Recently my camera broke and when I tried to contact Fuji to get a replacement or a repair, the service was terrible.  Their website is very difficult to navigate and offers very little support.Summary:Great camera as long as it doesn't break.  It's easier to pay someone to fix it than actually get Fuji to repair it</review_text>
I bought the camera in May of 2006, as a graduation gift for my son.  He loved the style and compactness.He experienced focus/zoom problems after 1 use.  Unfortunately he didn't start to use the gift for 2 months or I might have been able to return to Amazon for a refund.  Contacting Fufifilm has been overly cumbersome. Their website is not straightforware and their voice response system is not user friendly or responsive (LONG WAITS).  They have had the toy camera (AS THIS IS BEING WRITTEN)for over a week and when I called yesterday for status, they told me that the camera "hasn't been diagnosed yet".  I expect it will be, once their 90 day warranty expires, which will limit Fujifilm's liability to the 1 repair.  I have a mean case of buyer's remorse.  I might as well have taken the ~$235.00 spent on this camera and tossed it in the street.If you own one and it doesn't require repairs, you might like it.  If it ever requires repairs, you might feel as I that you would have been better to purchase a disposable digital camera.  Save yourself the potential aggravation and look to a camera that has a longer warranty, a better support environment or by all means purchase the extended warranty.  You may still face the frustrations but will have the consolation of knowing that it will cost you no more then shipping to have it repaired.  I bought it in May of 2006....I feel like I lost it in July of 2006.IF I COULD HAVE GIVEN THE Z1 LESS THEN 1 STAR, I WOULD HAVE.  THAT'S WHAT IT DESERVES!   !&%$$##444EN FUJIFIL</review_text>
Bought this camera for my wife.  Takes good pictures but handle this camera with extreme caution.  If you drop it be prepared for a large repair bill.  Fuji customer relations is sub-par.  Warranty does not cover any impact internal damage.  I've had better luck with Nikon and Kodak and will steer clear of Fuji in the future</review_text>
I have two 8" picture frames that are other brands, and they are GREAT and I use them for Open Houses all the time! I got this one as a gift from a friend, and it is terrible!! The instructions are difficult to understand. The wide screen makes everyone in the picture look FAT and distorted! This is a weird size and I am not happy at all!! I don't recommend it</review_text>
The battery which "popped up" with my camera order does NOT match the camera.  Thus I am stuck with the hassel of returning a battery.  I was leaving for a trip when it arrived and so I had to go out and buy a replacement after it arrived.</review_text>
Product is hard to review because you sent me the wrong battery.  As of 1/29/07 it has not been taken off my credit card.  How would you rate my review</review_text>
My frame freezes after displaying a few pictures. The remote doesn't work. There is no website for contact or support</review_text>
This is absolutely the worse digital device I have ever owned.  The manual is worthless and the web site even worse.  I try to delete the included photos, and nothing happens.  I can't download photos from my Mac.  If your digital memory card has many photos, good luck trying to find the ones you want to download to the frame.</review_text>
If you want to load directly from your camera's memory card the system takes forever to copy photos to the internal card.  There is no "copy all" function.Loading information from a computer didn't work.  The USB connection was not recognized by Windows XP and I couldn't find any drivers on the Web.A setup CD would be a nice addition.BTW the screen was not as large as one might think.  It is very wide but not tall and it crops the top & bottom of most pictures making it great for shots of the grand canyon but not for portraits of people</review_text>
I wish there was a space for zero stars.  We bought this frame for my in-laws for Christmas and it worked for TEN MINUTES and then died.  It was definitely a fault unit and gauging by the other reviews on here, others have had a problem with it freezing.  Once it does that, there's no fixing it, apparently.  Do some research and buy another unit; that's what I'm going to do</review_text>
I received Pandigital 7" Photo Frame (DPF70-2) as a Christmas gift and haven't been able to get the SD Card slot to function. When connecting to the PC via USB cable it tells me the removable device needs to be formatted.  Windows attempts to format the card and fails.  I'm able to format the card with a USB Card Reader and copy pictures to the SD card OK.  When I insert the SD Card into the Photo Frame is doesn't display any of the pictures, just a blue frame around the picture location.I contacted PanDigital Tech Support via 800# and never received a call back so I sent them an email.  I received email response back after several days.  They had me try several things to resolve the issue; this troubleshooting process went on for more than week to no avail. They eventually acknowledged the Photo Frame appeared defective, When I asked to exchange the Photo Frame (taking advantage of the 90 day warranty advertised on their site), they told me to return it to the store it was purchased.I do not consider this very good customer service; I would not recommend this product.</review_text>
Having recently built a digital picture frame from scratch, I was excited when someone gave us this frame for xmas, to see what a commercial frame would be like. After using it for a few weeks, I have to say that if it wasn't a present I would return it and get one that was built by people who had some sense of innovation.The Good:* Screen is bright, images look great* Resolution is only 640x480 but it will play images up to 10 megapixel and they look pretty good to me. Doesn't seem like you need much higher resolution than that on such a small screen.* Computer connection worked great - I plugged it into my xp box, all drivers installed automatically without the need for a cd and then 4 new removable drives showed up. It would be nice if only the drives with a card in them showed up but this is a minor issue.The bad:My main complaint about this picture frame is that the people who made it obviously had no interest in making the sort of product that you enjoy using because it is clear that the inventor appreciated why such a product would be fun to have or what makes it an improvement over what was there before. If I bought this frame in 1999 or if it cost $50, I could have forgiven it for the poor design, but in 2007, for $180, it is completely unacceptable.  We live in the future here people, get with the program!I have not used other frames on the market, but given that you can buy an old tablet pc with a 12" screen on ebay for $70, strap it into a cheap frame and make your own, pc-based screen that works 100 times better than this frame, just by running a screen saver for under $150, I'd say this frame is not worth the money at all. This screen just doesn't deliver the goods for the price.Some details:* Menu system is insanely poorly designed - for instance, you have to be in a specific menu to adjust the system settings - pushing the "setup" button at any other time does nothing despite the fact the the setting are global* Remote control only works when you are standing about a foot from the computer and pointing it directly at the tiny IR hole in the front of the screen.* Screen only works as a horizontal frame - there is no way set it up as a vertical frame (i.e. as a 480x640 frame) because the frame automatically rotates vertical images and there is no way to turn this "feature" off.* The slowest slideshow speed setting is 1 minute between images. Your only other option is to have it just be on 1 image that doesn't change.* No way to connect remotely to the computer or to easilyget images onto the frame without having to take the frame to where your computer is or go through a tedious process with a memory card an the crappy menu system.* Good viewings angles are limited but this is a general problem with lcd screens</review_text>
Keep in mind that you can't use this product unless you buy an external flash. The built-in flash results in harsh shadows on the left edge of the photos.canon's responseThank you for your inquiry regarding the PowerShot G6.We are sorry to hear of any issues with the Conversion lens.When using the built-in flash, a portion of the image may be blocked by the converters and appear dark.Please refer to page 186 of the camera manual for detailed information.When the converters are used, it is recommended to not use the built-in flash.Thank you for choosing Canon</review_text>
I bought this camera for my 13-year old son to take with him on a soccer trip to Bermuda.  It was ok.  Felt sort of cheap, but seemed like it would do what it was supposed to.  BIG DRAWBACK....there is no lens cover that slips into place when a picture isn't being shot, so the danger of scratching the lens is immense.  My son was so afraid of scratching the lens, that he barely used it.  Some of the few pictures that he did take were ok, but others were not of the best quality.  I think this camera is a bit too costly for what you get, and I'm surprised, because I usually love Samsung products</review_text>
I have two 8" picture frames that are other brands, and they are GREAT and I use them for Open Houses all the time! I got this one as a gift from a friend, and it is terrible!! The instructions are difficult to understand. The wide screen makes everyone in the picture look FAT and distorted! This is a weird size and I am not happy at all!! I don't recommend it</review_text>
Unfortunately I received the items damaged.  The exterior postage box was unharmed but the paper boxes were obviously dropped at some point before packaging.</review_text>
I have two 8" picture frames that are other brands, and they are GREAT and I use them for Open Houses all the time! I got this one as a gift from a friend, and it is terrible!! The instructions are difficult to understand. The wide screen makes everyone in the picture look FAT and distorted! This is a weird size and I am not happy at all!! I don't recommend it</review_text>
I bought two one time, but there was no vedio on LCD as opened for both! They could not recorded vedio but audio only. It seemed that they hadn't CCD at all! I had to mail them back to repare just the day I got them, and the JVC even would not cover the charge</review_text>
I bought this to play back old Hi8 tapes so I could transfer them to DVD. However, there is no S-Video out and no stereo out. Video quality was bad: output was noisey and reds were over saturated. I imagine this is because there is no S-Video out. I returned it and have ordered a Sony GV-D200. Hopefully it will give me better quality since it was more than twice as much. There are some cheaper used options available, e.g. Sony EVO-250</review_text>
Ok this is the third Sony Handycam i have owned and this is the most lacking in options..Sony Messed up with the USB port because if your looking for that one just spend the extra cash and get the TRV 280i had the 280 and it was stolen from me so i came on here and saw the TRV 138 and i purchased it and was disapointed in the picture quality..its fuzzy.. im in the process of seeing if the seller will return this camera so i can get the TRV280 back..I hope this has helpe</review_text>
Not worth the money spent on it.  After reviewing info on my new digital camera I followed suggestions to get the rechargeable batteries kit to save money on AA batteries.  I did not need the camera case that came with this kit, and it really had too many pockets for my liking.  The batteries did not hold a charge.  I only got a few pictures taken before they went dead.  If the spare set sat in the camera for a few days they too were dead.  At least I got a full set of pictures taken on the duracell ones.  I would much rather buy batteries and have them on hand then always be running back to the charger after a few shots.  I have had no experience with rechargables before so I do not know if this is common.  But I returned this item as a defect because for this amount of money you should get more then six pictures per charge</review_text>
We ownded this for around 10 months but used it for just 5-7 hours.It stopped working all of the sudden (no power)Sent it for warranty, (part no labor). $160 labor fee just to know what was wrong with it.Would not but another camcorder from Panasonic (they even wanted me to pay for having it sent back)</review_text>
I have tried everything. Firewire, USB. There was an insert in the guide that mentioned that you have to connect the cable first to your PC then to your camera, then turn on the PC then turn on the camera...then wait for the stars to align in the right order. If you do anything in a different order then your camera can get damaged. What kind of a crazy world does Panasonic live in?Well, I followed the instructions to the tee, downloded the right drivers and all and yet my PC does not recognize the GS19 or the GS9. I have used both. The GS19 is a new purchase so this is definitely going back. I thought, this model would have gone away with the kinks but, NO!So, my panasonic recorded DVs are gonna remain on the tape. I will never be able to put them on DVDs. What a joke, this camera turned out to be</review_text>
One of the most disastrous purchases we've ever made.  It works fine until you try to get the video images onto your computer.  Don't bother trying to consult the instruction guide; it's the worst one you've ever seen.  You could go to the website to attempt to download all the drivers that you supposedly need, but they're not actually on the website.DEFINITELY find another brand</review_text>
This camera was easy to use and it was light and had decent quality picture and audio, however, I was unable to make copies for back-up or to share with family members. I took it back and bought a mini-DV camcorder as I was told it was easier to make copies. This has yet to be tested</review_text>
This camcorder worked well, but I had two complaints with it.1.  On the sound track you can hear noise from the recording head moving back and forth, sounds like a woodpecker.  This alone made it unacceptable or what I wanted to do.2.  I wanted high quality video, but since it records on a small dvd disk, the video is compressed before it is recorded on the disk.  This causes some loss of detail in the picture, especially if you're going to edit it and rerecord the video which I need to do.If you just want a camera to record a small dvd which you can then play in a dvd player (and not all dvd players will play the small dvds) this camera might be acceptable.  I returned it and bought a Panasonic PV-GS35miniDV camcorder which uses the miniDV cassette tape.  Much better video quality because its not compressd, and no noise from the tape drive</review_text>
Be warned, if you have a computer with a slot dvd drive, you simply cannot transfer your video files to your computer for editing, sharing, whatever.  Can't be done without a series of possibly mythical workarounds and loss of quality with each step.  I was even willing to consider buying an external dvd drive with a firewire connection and a loading tray that supported the 8 cm disks, but couldn't find one.  I searched all over, asked in several places on the apple web boards, talked to the 'geniuses' at the Apple store - this camera is simply not usable with a macintosh that has a slot drive.  Talk about crazy!</review_text>
Don't order this battery unless you have money to throw away!  I ordered one that would not hold a charge, called the company and they told me it was defective and to send it back.  Did that and got a replacement that proved to be just as bad.  Now after 3 months, it isn't even holding a charge for more that 15 minutes of usage time!!!  This is unacceptable, and again the company is still trying to stand behind their bogus product!  AVOID AT ALL COST, EVEN IF THAT MEANS PAYING THE EXTRA $10 BUCKS FOR AN ORIGINAL KODAK BRANDED BATTERY</review_text>
I used this camera once and have no good photos to show for it.  It took 5 frames then skipped several and took 2 more, then nothing for the rest of the roll.  We swam with sharks and I have nothing to show for it. Should have bought a disposable one</review_text>
I purchased this camera for a friend to use in Hawaii.  We had nothing but problems getting it to wind properly and the pictures both on land and underwater were all blurred and my friend was very unhappy and I was frustrated.  I do not know if this is just a bad camera or what</review_text>
This is the Worst camera I've ever owned. I'm not exaggerating. I'm so upset for wasting money on it. The only pictures that turn out, are outside in bright daylight. It takes horrible pictures in low light, there's a high level of noise in the photos. The video mode moves in and out on its own, ruining the video. I sometimes get colored lines down the right side of the videos. My friend's $88 dollar digital camera takes way better pictures than this thing. It just plain sucks.</review_text>
As I have gotten older seeing the tiny print inside the view finder has become more dificult, as well a seeing the image clearly enought to get super sharp focus.  I thought this might be a solution.This Eyecup fails on all requards.  Worst feature, the optics are not nearly as clear as you would expect.  Second the magnification is so minimal as to be useless.   Last it has the cheep feel of Cracker Jack plastic, well and the optics to match.  Now I know where Olympus had it manufactured</review_text>
Offers no eye comfort whatsoever. Magnification is very weak. Stick to original eye cu</review_text>
The ME-1 provides a modest 1.2x magnification for viewfinders on Olympus's E-300 and E-500 cameras. Ideally, this would allow sharper manual focusing and more precise framing. Unfortunately, this did not happen when I used the ME-1 to make a number of trial images with my E-500, so I will be returning the ME-1 for a refund. (For the record, I wear prescription eyeglasses while shooting, with my "shooting eye" corrected to 20/20 vision.)Like other folks, I find the E-500 viewfinder a trifle small so that it's not always easy to frame a shot and see exposure data at the same time. The camera must also be pressed against your face when framing, which is not always comfortable.In some ways, the ME-1 created more problems than it solved. The ME-1 kept the camera further from my face (though it seemed to bump harder against my glasses), but at the cost of *narrowing* my angle of vision in the viewfinder. Divide the viewfinder into four equal columns and rows so you have eight squares. The four squares in the middle of the viewfinder were easily visible, but those along the sides, top, and bottom were *less* visible than before, the corners considerably less. To frame a shot, I had to move my eye around the viewfinder much more with the ME-1 than without it. To see exposure data, I had to shift my eye almost completely away from the image. More hassle than I need when shooting in the field.Fortunately, there is another option that works for me. The E-300 and E-500 come with an EP-5 eyecup, which is definitely too small for my taste. But a larger eyecup is also available, the EP-6. The EP-6 keeps the camera a little further from my face. And with the viewfinder diopter properly adjusted (a critical step no one seems to mention), the EP-6 allows me to see both the entire image and exposure data without shifting my eye very much at all.All of this will vary from person to person, of course, and there may be circumstances when the ME-1 is exactly what's needed -- so two rather than one star. But not in standard shooting conditions, especially if you need to compose, set exposure, and shoot quickly</review_text>
Almost useless! Tried it for several days of photo shoots and finally gave up in frustration. Went back to using the viewfinder without this magnifier.Professional medical photographer</review_text>
This bag could be a bit larger and have more pockets.  Quite small for the price.   Just paying for the name on the bag</review_text>
Not too long after I purchased this camera the screen turned white when I turned it on. I would turn it off and on and nothing would help. Finally I would take the batteries out and put them back in. This seemed to fix the problem a few times. After that I thought it was just operator error. But it wasn't. The camera finally gave out and the white screen never went away. So after being annoyed I left the camera alone for awhile. An event came up about a month later. I got my camera and tried to turn it on. Nothing happened. So I changed the batteries. Still nothing happened. I'm not sure what happened. I do believe I purchased a LEMON camera. I'm hoping to resolve these issues with Samsung. It was one of the cheapest cameras on the market at the time. So I guess you get what you pay for!</review_text>
So this was my first digital camera, got it last july for my birthday. I go to a lot of concerts, so i needed a camera that could take pictures in not good light and take pics of moving subjects. Well, two days after i got it, i was at a festivale watching my fav band perform and the the screen went white. It would still take pics, only you couldnt see them. After changing the batteries and turnign it off and on, it went back to normal. Alarmed, i called Samsung and they told me the couldnt do anythign until it was white again. It only did it a couple of times after that so i never called again.But that was only one thing wrong with it. This is a horrible camera for concerts, the pictures are always blurry. Shoot, even when im at my house the pics still come out blurry sometimes. Tuesday i went to see my fav band again, and the dumb thing goes white. It woudnt stop, no matter how many times i turned it off and on again. Now the flash is broke and i'm ready to throw it against the wall. You can't trust this camera. You never know when it will take good pics or bad pics.I wouldnt even consider buying this camera for a minute!</review_text>
I guess I really shouldn't complain because my husband won the camera in an office rally. But the pictures it takes are disgraceful for a Samsung product every two to three pictures are blurred unrecognizably-where you can't even tell what you have taken. If you have found yourself among the fortunate few who actually found success with this camera thank your lucky stars. Even if it is a less expensive choice versus the other cameras on the market today spend the extra money it would be worth it not to miss any family moments like my family did,on this useless piece of CRAP</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my 13-yr old daughter as her first digital camera. It was a Christmas present so I am highly dissapointed that 3 months after purchase, the flash stopped working. The picture quality was good but it hardly makes up for the fact that she can no longer take photo's indoors or in low light. I would not recommend this camera.</review_text>
If you are looking for a still shot digital camera ok.. but why buy this monster for that? I have a T1 that does the trick there and gives 5MP.Ok, so maybe video? ok, but then why do I want a dvd with nothing but raw footage? cant edit it without a lot of work. (where is the firewire port, or even the ability to edit an mpg file?) geeez..anyway.. I am taking mine back. it is totally useless to me as I already have a still shot camera.. save your money.. dont do it..</review_text>
This is a nice case, however, i needed something more sleek and small to fit into my purse when i go out with my friends. This case is bulky and my Panasonic FXO1 would fit into something much smaller. I ended up going with a great case that i found at Wal-Mart for a cheeper price, sleeker design, small enough to hold my memory cards and camera and still fit into the small purses i take when i go out on the town</review_text>
This case looks good and protects the camera adequately, but is too bulky. It hasn't got a lot of room inside - I was unable to fit an extra SD card in its little case and a spare battery. The belt clip is difficult to use, and I end up carrying the case in my hand most of the time. There are better cases for this camera</review_text>
This case will protect your camera but has no place for spare battery or even a extra memory card. It only has a spring clip to fasten it to a belt or bag there is no belt loop or other handle strap. There are other cases available with better features for less money</review_text>
I found a case that's almost exactly like this one, except it's $10 cheaper.It's made by Samsonite.  model # TM90BLU (there is also a black case).  but like I said, exact same thing.  Unless you care about your camera case saying "lumix", save yourself some dough and get the one from Wal-mart</review_text>
This is the first digital camera that I have owned.  Overall I am generally satisfied with the quality of the pictures it produces.  However, there are a few things that, if I had known beforehand, would have prevented me from purchasing this camera.1) Camera is not plug-and-play (even if they say it is).  You have to install the Kodak EasyShare Software to download pictures.  This is a HUGE negative.  In the future, I will only buy cameras that show up as removable storage drives when plugged into a computer.2) Video is stored in Apple Quicktime format (*.mov).  The is also a huge negative.  The codecs for this format are not widely available for application integration.  You have to download and use Apple Quicktime to view them.  You can not view the videos in Windows Media Player.  It is also not compatible with some photo-album software.  I would only buy cameras in the future that have an option to store video in a non-proprietary format.Update:  After review, I have found that WinXP and Vista plug-n-play with the camera when it is plugged into the USB port.  It does not work on Win2k.  Thanks for the comment that made me double-check</review_text>
I like this camera.  Some settings take it beyond the standard point and shoot experience. For a first-timer, it has been great. The camera rates 4 stars.Customer service, on the other hand, has been a disaster. An Easy Share software downloaded update didn't load properly and led me on a trail of three customer service reps over the course of 4 1/2 hours with no resolution. After requesting to speak to a customer service manager, I was promised that a $7.95 CD of the software would be sent for free (though it was clear he was doing me a favor because "these cd's cost money and don't grow on trees," he said. Whether or not the CD solves the problem remains to be seen. But customer service is awful.To recap: Nice camera, but unless you have endless customer service patience, search out other options</review_text>
I keep this frame on all day and night. The LCD backlight should last longer than 4 months but mine just burned out.The quality of the pictures are okay if viewed from a distance but the low res. is not good if viewing up close.There is no external power controls or a remote so turning this unit on and off is a drag. Regular LCD backlights should last a few years even if it stays on all day and night. This one just lasted 4 months. So the image is almost non-existant now. In the glare, you can barely make out the image so it's still there but with no backlight so good as dead.I would recommend a more expensive Philips ones. My friend has had it for about two years and it's still going. plus it's higher res and and has more controls such as a timer function and also can play video clips, which this one can't</review_text>
I bought this frame in Jan. '07 and the screen burned out March '07.  I returned it and the newest one burned out last night - April '07.  This product needs a redesign - the screens don't work for long.</review_text>
Purchased this item in Dec 06' Screen burned out Mar 07'. On top of that screen quality was not that great. Do not order order this item</review_text>
I bought this product from a nearby retailer. The packaging is deceptive. The Photoframe must be plugged into an external power source or you must buy a uniquely designed battery from the manufacturer. The battery is $35.00 with shipping, and it is poorly designed so that when installed the battery case rubs the connector wiring. This frame has no on-board memory, so to use it you must have one of the two types of memory it accepts. This is an additional expense. After purchasing the Photoframe I discovered the plastic frame was chipped and the device did not perform as the instructions said it should. I took it back to the store and opened eight boxes before I found one which had an unbroken frame. I took that Photoframe home and discovered the device would not work as the instructions described. I then went to another of the retailers' locations to exchange the device (the original location had shipped their entire inventory back to the manufacturer). With the retailer's very helpful clerks I tested three more PhotoCo Photoframe devices, none of them worked as described (they would not scroll through and album of photos). I returned the item to the retailer and received a full refund for the device, then by email I requested a refund for the price of the battery. Photoco replied that if I sent them the battery they would refund its price. I mailed the battery on May 6,and then inquired about my refund on May 14. PhotoCo replied that the only employee who could process the refund was out sick. On 3/17 I sent an email demanding immediate processing of my refund. PhotoCo said that my credit had been processed but that I might not see the credit for 7 to 10 days. I still have not received my credit for the battery. If you want to avoid a headach, avoid doing business with this company. Read the other reviews before considering this product</review_text>
NOWHERE on the package is it indicated that this products requires a particular type of photo memory card (MS or SD).  It will not operate without it!  On the back of the package it reads "Download photos with USB cable (incl.) or simply insert memory card (MS or SD - not incl.)"  Wording is extremely deceiving and implies that photos can be directly downloaded to the device - they cannot</review_text>
The Photoshare digital frame is a classic example of poor engineering.  The "Plug and Play" ability is aggravating, at best, freezing two of my computers, requiring endless reboots to transfer images.  Photoshare provides ZERO customer support or technical assistance when you have problems interpreting the very poor operations manual. The expensive battery is almost impossible to install.  The power cord has to be super glued to stay in place. And the frame is sloppy and dangerous - very easy for unit to fall out.  Buy another brand or just put pictures on disc and use a portable DVD player instead.</review_text>
Quite unsatisfied with this product and will be returning the 2 I purchased as gifts. In fact, the recipients asked me to return them. Main reason, in order for it to be "portable" it requires a special battery that you can only buy from the manufacturer for an additional $30. I already spent $100, not planning on spending more money. I think PhotoCo needs to rethink their product and improve customer satisfaction.</review_text>
I added these batteries to an order of a few other things, and didn't realize that they were going to ship this separately from Circuit city. Make sure if you pick this, that you are getting something else from CC, or else you will end up like me. With a huge box (you could fit 4 Tom Clancey novels in the box) shipped to you with a pack of batteries and end up paying more for shipping then you spend on the batteries</review_text>
You have listed this battery as an accessory to the camera and now that I have purchased it I discover that this battery doesn't fit this camera. It is listed wrong</review_text>
Beware of poor CS policy at JVC. They recently let me down when it was obvious the camera was poorly designed and built. They were not interested in even trying to help.I hate it when companies only care about their profits</review_text>
This unit would be beautiful except for the fact that the input power plug and the on/off switch has a serious design flaw.  I received the unit and it worked one time upon the first plug in of power.  After that it became intermittent for about two or three switches off and on.  It then failed completely and would not work at at all.I returned it and ordered another identical unit and it worked only one cycle on and would not come on at all after that. On both units the mp3 player continued to work.There is definately a serious problem with the power input receptical and/or the on/off switch.But for this problem it would be a wonderful unit</review_text>
Tried this as a possible improvement over using AA NiHM batteries in my Olympus D-524 camera. Turned out to be a DOWNGRADE. Did not stay charged as long as my Panasonic 1950 mAh AA batts. It would die a sudden death -- no low battery warnings before the camera shut down. I have gone back to the dependability and predictability of the AA NiHM batts. The CR-V3 now gathers dust. It did not even improve the flash recycle time. Just a waste</review_text>
THE battery is good after a full charge.  It lacks in holding the promised charge.  I find after 2 weeks it is questionable, depending on how many pictures were taken before the camera sat waiting to be used again. I got over 100 pictures when used in 3 days, Which is more that my AA nimh 2100mah. Which I bought from Walmart {so probably not a super battery}  The wallmart batteries actually hold the charge longer {very sad}.The charge time is not to long when charger from half charge.Over all, I hope the next ones I buy will be better than these.  My solution is to carry a non rechargeable battery in my case for when the Delkin dies.  I also try to give it a full charge before leaving the house, as there is no memory effect.  I also recomend checking to see if there is a firmware upgrade for your camera.  Every camera shuts off when the battery is at a different power level.  My Nikon coolpix 3100, seems to shut down sooner than later.  All reviews should mention what camera they are using for this reason.  Have been using 3 months now.</review_text>
I've had this battery for half a year and I agree with a fellow reviewer's assessment that the battery does not hold much power. I am diligent about expending all energy before recharging because they have memory, but this Delkin model's life span was noticeably short. Now i am going to buy a new charger/battery altogether because I don't want to buy another Delkin battery</review_text>
I bought this battery in July 2004. I charged it as soon as I got it. I put it in the camera and then used the camera about 10 days later. The battery was dead. So I charged it again and put it in the camera again. I used it and it seemed to work fine. But the next time I went to use the camera (Approximately 2 weeks to a month later.) it was dead again. As I write this review I am sitting in a hotel room in Prague. I charged the battery ten days ago. I used it once 7 days ago and took approximately 15 to 20 pictures(Did not use the flash). I then used it again today. I was able to get another 15 to 20 pictures before it went dead( Did not use the flash). I bought the lithium rechargeable battery because they have the longest life and no memory. So now I have to charge the battery everytime I use the camera. This was a big disappointment. I get better life out of the standard Duracell alkalines. It appears that this technology hasn't been perfected or that Belkin has not perfected their quality control. Beware when buying this product</review_text>
I purchased this digital picture frame after doing my homework, and reading all the reviews I could on the different kinds. The one I purchased was flawed, and would take 5 or 6 tries of inserting the memory card before I could get it to boot up. When it was running I was very disappointed with the quality of the pictures.What the description of this product does not tell you is - the frame does not come with a usb cable- so it does not hook up to a computer. This means that you must either have all the pics you want to display already on a memory card from your camera, or that you must have/purchase a card reader to download the pics from your computer to your camera card.( A side note - if you have a Sony digital camera, Memory sticks do not allow you to back any pics onto them from your computer that were not taken in their format - so forget about using pics someone else sent, you took with another camera, or you reformatted with a photo program).I went with the digital pic frame from Brookstone instead - far better quality, and MUCH more user friendly</review_text>
In my experience, this camera takes great pictures, but the zoom lens is so delicate that it breaks easily.  It stops extending and just makes a clicking noise.  This happened to me when the camera accidentally turned on while in my pants pocket rendering the camera unusable.  My brother and two of my friends experienced a similar problem with their EX-S500 after they accidentally dropped the camera while the lens was extended.  I would recommend looking into another camera that is not so delicate</review_text>
I gave this picture frame to my wife for a christmas gift,we pluged it in and within a half an hour it made a loud bang and smoke poured out of the thing like crazy....not a good gift.</review_text>
I am [...] the unit because it will not run a slideshow from a media card. 16 Mb of internal memory for a slideshow is just not enough! Read on!If you call they will tell you that the slideshow from cards is not possible because on Page 13 refers to excluding pictures from the slideshow on only on internal memory. This is not a definitive statement that slideshow is not possible from a card only that excluding individual pictures from a card is not possible. (because the unit is not capable of writing to a media card.)Looking further on p13 it states: "Choosing slideshow frequency Note: This function applies to photos stored on all media." Page 27 in FAQ states: "2) Q: Can I switch between different slideshows photos by using different memory cards? A: Yes. When you connect your memory card to PhotoFrame(tm), it will slideshow photos stored on that specific card." Finally, the Quick start guide FAQ states: "Q Can I switch between different slideshow photos by using different memory cards? A Yes, Digital Photo frame will slideshow photos stored in the card or camera currently connected."Clearly the three references I provide indicate that the DPF can operate slideshows from a media card. IN REALITY SLIDESHOWS FROM MEDIA CARDS DOES NOT WORK. Philips how about a firmware upgrade?I bought this thing to allow my mother who is not computer savvy and lives far away to look at family pictures. I was planning on sending preloaded cards to her. All she would have to do is insert the card and turn it on. (Mom is 75 and this is as technical as she gets..). Do not buy this DPF for older, none computer savvy people. Since media card can not be used, you have to use the internal memory for slideshows. The internal 16Mb memory can hold about 70 pictures - that's it. It is also unclear the maximum size a file can be. I believe the internal memory converts the file to a DPF friendly format and renames the file when copying from a media card. (How is Mom going to tell me which picture to print if the name changed?)Why have media card slots if they are useless? Internal memory is way too small! DO NOT BUY and save yourself the hassle.</review_text>
I ordered this digital frame for my husband for Christmas, with the assurance from a "tech weenie" that it would work, based on the advertisement found at Amazon. Still uncertain whether the ad (also found in Philips cursory literature) is really true. My husband is working with the "phone people" at Philips to determine whether it will or will not interface with MAC. If it does eventually work, the process has not been easy</review_text>
I bought this camera for its great price, good reviews, and overall reputation as a great camcorder for the novice shooter. I returned the camera after three weeks, however, due to abysmal low light performance among other things.The catalyst for purchasing this camera was the impending birth of our first child. I took the camera to the hospital and filmed some of the labor/delivery and follow up. Unfortunately, when we returned home to view our footage, much of it was grainy and plagued with shadows and silhouettes.The camera does include a light and a MagicPix option, but unless you're using a tripod, you're bound to end up with a strobe-light effect (Perfect for recreating "Thriller music videos," but not much help otherwise.)I also found the image quality with the GS31 to be fairly lackluster and pixilated. Granted, you get what you pay for, but I was really taken aback that my 1992 camcorder shot much better footage.That being said, the camera did a lot better in good/outdoor lighting (albeit still somewhat pixilated), and the zoom is incredible. The camera is very light and smaller than I anticipated.In the end, I returned the camera in favor of a more significant investment (...)I will say that Amazon did a great job with customer service throughout. Also, if you do buy this camera, make sure to buy the DV cable (firewire for Macs) through Amazon or some other online retailer. (...</review_text>
We returned this video camera due to video picture quality. The camera requires a lot of light to have a decent video, even after changing settings, the video had a "grainy" look. We just needed something basic to replace our 10 year old video camera and thought this would work, but the picture was worse than our previous camera. Purchased the PV-GS65, next model up with 3CCD's and love this model. As a matter a fact we still had the GS-31, used the same tape, shot the same footage, and reviewing the two different shots, the GS-65 did 100% better.The camera has a great feel in your hand, although the menu button can be difficult to press</review_text>
Panasonic offers a USB driver however no video driver. This means that anyone using windows xp will be unable to transfer video to their computer. When talking to panasonic they just said they didnt have a driver and were not developing one. They offered no suggestions or alternatives</review_text>
I've read good reviews of this camera on this and other sites but I am not having the same experience. The quality of the photos are horrible so I started thinking it was me and I tried it with different settings, tried being very, very still etc but, I only get one good shot out of about ten. I have a Fuji 4mp that I bought about 6 years ago and it takes way better pictures than this. I bought this so I could give my old one to my daughter but I'm gonna end up giving this one to my daughter and and keeping my Fuji. We recently had snow here in Tucson so I took pictures with mu Fuji and compares them to the Canon and the 6 year old Fuji Finepix beat it hands down. I don't get it, did I get a defective camera or am I doing something wrong or does this camera just suck</review_text>
The camera came with no memory  chip.  The online store had no more of this camera or chips so the only thing they could suggest was to return it for a refund.  Not a great experience</review_text>
I was extremely disappointed with this camera.  It's a shame there is no option for zero stars, because it doesn't even deserve one.  I bought two of them for a vacation to Belize because we were planning to do a lot of activities in and around the water, and we were hoping to capture those memories without risk to our digital camera.  Now I really regret not putting a little more money into a waterproof case for our digital camera rather than wasting money on this camera and developing pictures that were only worthy of the garbage can.All of the pictures from both cameras were very grainy - terrible, terrible quality.  The camera that we took pictures with while diving was slightly better than the one we never even submerged in the water.  Those pictures were so grainy that we couldn't even tell what the pictures were supposed to be of.  Extremely disappointing for a camera that wasn't even submerged in water.  Not to mention both cameras said that there were more pictures left on the roll when there were none, so we took shots that we thought were going to be really amazing only to find that they weren't even on the negatives.I was so disappointed in this camera that I wrote to Kodak and they offered to send me two new disposable cameras.  Unfortunately our trip to Belize was a once in a lifetime trip, so I have absolutely no need for replacements - the damage is done.  And I have no desire to ever use one of these cameras again. If you are planning on using a disposable waterproof camera for capturing valuable memories, DO NOT waste your money on this one.  The only thing you will receive from the photo lab is disappointment.  I wish I had done more research before purchasing this one - please don't even bother with it</review_text>
My husband and I bought two of these to take on a cruise for our snorkling outting. Due to weather, the snorkeling was canceled, but we did end up using the cameras.  One we used for regular pictures, outdoor only, beacuse there's no flash, and it was okay, though the pictures were a bit grainy. The other I took on a camping trip with some high school kids and the camera jammed a few pictures into the roll, I could turn and turn the winder, and the film wouldn't advance, but it would let me take another picture. After fighting with it the entire weekend, I ended up getting about 10 pictures that could be made out, though these were grainy, too</review_text>
I bought this camera and it took great pictures above water, but none of the pictures I took underwater turned out. I looked at the negatives and it was like I never even clicked the shutter. The negatives were blank where I took the underwater pictures</review_text>
I purchased this camera and took it to the beach.  The photos were so bad, I threw them away.  The images were all washed-out and blurry.  Also, the film advancing mechanism is very tricky, so several of the pictures I took overlapped each other.  I've used other disposable cameras before that wouldn't let you take a picture until the film had been fully advanced to the next frame.  With this camera, I advanced the film until the mechanism stopped, and the camera allowed me to take another picture.  Unfortunately, the film hadn't advanced fully and the next picture partially overlapped the previous picture that I had taken.  What a waste of money this camera was!Thankfully, I had also taken my digital camera, so I still had some good pictures of my trip :)</review_text>
Made the mistake of taking this camera on a trip to the pool!!Pictures were horrible. Eye Piece is the biggest pain!! DON'T BUY THIS PIECE OF JUNK. If you want GREAT, GOOD, WONDERFUL pictures, buy the Fuji Quicksnap camera. Kodak could have done MUCH, MUCH better</review_text>
I bought this camera after using a Sony MiniDV (very small one) camera over 8 years. The image quality of Sanyo is horrible compared to my old Sony under any condition: daylight, night etc. However price, size and easy operation makes this camera a winner as you can have it with you all the time. So if you want to use this camera as a second camera for everyday use go for it, but this is not a serious replacement to a high-end camcorder.</review_text>
I read the reviews and thought I'd still give it a try.After one battery charge, I was "lucky" enough to have a defective unit - the camera wouldn't start again after the first charge.My observations from that first short use were:- Quality of pictures was very poor (my Pentax Optio 4mp camera takes better quality photos) -- very disapointing for a 6mp camera.- The flash was generally useless, and actually hurt quality- The camera was very uncomforable if you don't have very small hands.  My wrist hurt after using it for 20 minutes.- The video was ok, but the focus was very slow (and noisy).- I had the same problem as several others -- that the camera died shortly afer getting it (shows very poor quality).All-in-all don't waste your money.  You can get a much better camera at a lower price</review_text>
This camcorder has an excellent form factor and conveniently transfers clips to PC via USB. However, the camera picks up the sound of its own zoom and auto-focus, which makes the video unacceptable in my opinion. The clicking and whirring is louder than the level of normal conversation.We returned the first unit that we got thinking that it may have been a production defect, but the second unit had the same problem. Apparently, according to the manual, this is "not a malfunction"</review_text>
In theory, this camera is perfect. Fits into your pocket. Video quality is definately good considering it records in the compressed format of MPEG-4. Pictures are good if you know how to finesse it. Perfect all around anytime camrea, right?Here's the thing. I got the camera mainly for video. I just had a daughter and wanted something for those candid moments that I could always have on me. Also, I did not want miniDV because uploading to the computer is real time. I wanted the SD card as film, even if it would sacrfice some video quality. But the thing that ruins this camera for me is the mic picks up the lens motor/ auotfocus nosie. On the playback I cearly hear the zooming in and zooming out and every time the lens focuses. It sounds like someone smoking a hooka. And get this, it even says so in the instruction manual, page 35, "CAUTION During video clip playback, the sound of a motor is audible....During recording, the sound of the optical zoom movement or autofocus movement was recorded. This is not a malfunction."Awful.By the way, the take a picture while recording video function is worthless. It leaves a pause on your video image while the sound keeps recording, and the still image captured is usually blury. Whats the point anyway, I think the camera has a built in function to extract a still from the video. Or you can do it with whatever editing software you use.Oh, and one last thing. I have to keep the still camera in sports mode to get a clean pic. My hand shakes too much. There is a digital stabalization for the video, but no optical stabilization for the stills.Its a big shame, too. The camera is very cool. If not for the audible motor noise, I would have given this at least an 8/10. But the lens motor noise is unacceptable!ps. all cameras today should have a built in lens cover. This is one has a cheap plastic one, that you'll probably lose</review_text>
I really wanted to love this camera. The camera is compact and could fit into the pocket of my jeans!I did plenty of research before choosing to buy this camera so I expected all the quarks of the unit mentioned in other reviews. The 30 frames per second uninterlaced video is good - of course it's not as good as full resolution 60 fields per second video... but the unit fits into my pocket! Another huge plus is that each "shot" is an individual file that can be dragged off the unit and onto a PC using a USB cable. No further processing - the file just copies and plays in Quicktime, etc. Another great feature is the ability to zoom while recording a movie, which most point and shoot cameras that record video will not allow you to do.Now the sad part; Amazon has shipped me two units - both with bad pixels on the LCD and CCD. The bad pixels on the LCD, according to the manual, are expected and "Not a malfunction"; I disagree with that. For the cost of the unit there should be no bad pixels on the LCD monitor. The HUGE problem is the bad pixels on the CCD! This results with white pixels being recorded on the files; this is compounded by the "image stabilization". The image stabilization shifts the image the CCD receives around in attempt to stabilize a shot of video - and it works great! However, as the video is shifted and stabilized the white pixels are shifted around the screen as well. It's almost like there are flies moving through every single shot you record.The bad CCD is the reason why I can't love the C6... I gave up hope and sent both back to Amazon. I'm not sure what I will buy now.</review_text>
HP is selling this bag for $30 bucks, so when I found it here for $10 less I couldn't let this "Deal" pass me by... however when I received the bag, I wished I had... the color is less vibrant, it's cheap, poor quality, plus HP isn't embroidered on the bag... walk away from this bag and get the blue and black HP bag instead, it costs a little bit more but it's well worth it!!</review_text>
I purchased this camera case for my granddaughter for Christmas to go with the camera her parents had bought for her.  This is the first time I have ever been DISAPPOINTED with a product I purchased from Amazon.  It was, in my opinion, not worth the price I paid!  The picture looked much larger that it actually was.  I wil continue to purchase through Amazon but I will be much more careful and definitely return it if I'm not satisfied.  In this case I did not have time to find another camera case.Thanks for giving me the opportunity of expressing my opinion.Linda Sutto</review_text>
so i saw that this product got 5 stars, so i ordered it......when i got it, its like "um... is THAT it???" it's really cute, and really well made, but it has no where to hold my usb cord or memory cards...also, there is no HP embroidered in the front like the picture has it, also, the strap that I got is really cracked and does not look good at all...other than that, it's cute, but not the best out there.</review_text>
I bought this camera in the beginning of January. I was looking for a compact camera (not necessarily pocket size, though) that was capable of taking great pictures and that was also capable of taking movies in a decent quality. Based on test reports at DPreview and other customer reports I decided for the Fuji F31fd. I was intrigued by the new sensor that Fuji is using and that seems to be very light sensitive, which is true. After receiving the camera I took a lot of test pictures under various conditions, with and without flash, bright light, low light, different ISO settings, different exposure times, etc. I compared the pictures with my 4-year old SONY DSC-V1 and the results were amazing. The picture quality of the Fuji was very poor. Colors were 'smeared' but the main problem was noise. Even under bright light conditions and ISO 100 settings the white had considerable noise, same with other colors (RGB noise). I didn't check grey/black noise (as they do in the test reports) but the noise in white and colors was just too annoying. What a disappointment. The lens seemed to be pretty poor as well, at least there was no comparison to the SONY DSC-V1 with a Carl Zeiss lens. After one week we returned the camera and I bought the SONY H5. This is really a great camera, I must admit. The picture quality is even better than with the V1 and I thought that the V1 was already pretty good. I can only recommend SONY's H5, even though it has a different form factor and may therefore not really compare to the much smaller F31fd. What I liked about the F31fd was its size, its responsiveness and the monitor and menu. However, if the picture quality is so poor it also doesn't really help</review_text>
I bought these binoculars because I wanted a medium size pair to use primarily for birding.  First time out, I had difficulty getting a clear focus.  To make maters worse, every bird that I looked at had a halo of red chromatic aberration around it's head.  I have a pair of Nikon 10X25s which out performed the Bushnell's hands down in terms of both clarity and sharpness. I am returning the Bushnell's and considering the Audubon Equinox HP binoculars instead.</review_text>
...unless you want to have trouble focusing, have difficulty using them indoors at a sporting event, or have the neck strap bracket break off, etc. I wear glasses and these never did focus well for me. I was not happy when the bracket broke off the day I received them, just as I was to leave for an Africa safari vacation. The biocs kept slipping off my neck the whole trip, and it was frustrating.Even more frustrating was trying to get them repaired. Suposedly there is a warranty on these. Hah! When I sent them to Bushnell for repair, they wanted [...]</review_text>
I got to the tip of Alaska, and none of the four batteries worked  no power!I missed getting a day of once in a life time pictures.David Highe</review_text>
Did not get Kodak Max, instead recieved regular Kodak CRV3 battery. I thought I was ordering a better version, seller NEEDS to change misleading picture!</review_text>
In my opinion this is not a marketable product. The cameras features are irrelevant if it does not work. There is clearly a design fault and the product should be withdrawn from sale until there is a fix. When it did work it was a convenient pocketable unit. As for HD - possibly at high noon in the Sahara, but in anything but perfect light the results are dissappointing.</review_text>
The quality is not real HD looking.  The footage is jumpy.  The camera is terrible in low light.  Even indoors during the day, you have to blast light into the camera to get a readable image.  I returned mine and I'm looking to getting the much better Sony HD cam which is almost double the price, but at least they were smart enough to put a video light on it.  Being a professional filmmaker and knowing what Cameras shoot real HD, I quickly realized that I got ripped off.  This may be good only if you're shooting mostly outdoors during the day, but don't expect to bring it to a party, club, or out on the town at night.  It seems like they should have devoted effort to making the low light shooting excellent.  The size of the camera is amazing and the fact that there are no tapes is great.  I was really disappointed because I was expecting something better.  Most digital cameras shoot better video, seriously</review_text>
Before that it was kind of nice, but it cannot focus in even semi-low light.It is definitely light and easy to take everywhere, but there are so many conditions where the results are disappointing. No way I would call the output HD quality, just the best SD ever with a 16 * 9  format. And then it broke</review_text>
I purchased the camera in mid June 2006. After 1 month/1 hr of recording the screen went black when in recording mode. It took the shop about 7 week to fix the problem. I used the camera to record another 20 minutes and now it does not want to focus to infinite. The recording now flickers a lot and a dot appears floating around the screen. This camera has been in the shop more time than in my hands. The store were I bought it said that It would give me a new camera if this happends for the thrid time. The only problem is that if this is a design problem, what do I get by getting a new camera? Just avoid buying this camera until they fix the problem</review_text>
This camera has major problems.  Do your research.  Go to any digital camera forums and you will see tons of post of  the "black Screen".    After using our camera about 5 times the screen became black.  Apparently had to do with defective lens housing or something.  Sent it to their customer care service.  Took 1 month to get back.  3 days later black screen is back.  Sanyo is doing everything they can to prevent me from getting money back or get new camera.  They just want me to keep sending to customer. Care.     Sanyo has a very defective product and they do not want to admit their mistake and replace the defective cameras.  See for yourself.   Go to the forums and see what others have been saying.  Don't make the mistake I did</review_text>
The noise problem with this camera is horrendous.  DO NOT BUY IT!  If you take a close-up picture of an eye you will not be able to see the eyelashes clearly... NEVER.  NO MATTER HOW HARD YOU TRY.My 3-year old 5MPX Sony is much better than this Panasonic camera.  I am sorry I bought it. I would return this product if I could and buy a good camera instead.The Lumix DMC-LX2 camera cannot focus one bit, many pictures are out of focus and made worse by the noise problem.  Even with the motion smother function turned on many pictures come out blurred.  Noise is very noticeable with graininess appearing very readily.  You can tweak the quality enhancing features for sharpness, noise reduction, contrast and saturation all you want but these are worthless to reduce the noice and sharpness problem.The Amazon website says you can use standard SD memory which is untrue(perhaps this has been corrected now).  The camera only accepts more expensive SDHC (high capacity) cards.  These SDHC cards cannot be read by standard memory stick readers so I have to use the USB port which takes forever to download even a handful of pictures to my computer.</review_text>
I have owned this camera for ~6 months and have finally deciced to replace it. I bought this camera to replace another Nikon CoolPix that was stolen from my house. But this one does not have a view finder to begin with and is way more complicated to use. I have always liked Nikon cameras but the S9 just doesn't make it. I can not use it outside because I can not see the LCD screen. Sorry Nikon but you blew it on this camera!!So I replaced it with a Canon PowerShot A710. What a difference in ease of use and... it has a view finder. also my 1G memory card from rhe Nikon fots in the new Canon.</review_text>
I purchased a Nikon for my first camera, I just loved how you can take it anywhere, fits handy in your pocket and perfect size. I couldn't wait to take pictures but soon realized that the picture quality was great but as soon as the battery hit low the camera refused to hold my photo's. For my birthday I took over 100 photo's with a fresh battery but as soon as the battery was low all of them were lost. I was so devistated. The video feature is a nice thing too but the quality is very grainy and distorts people's faces. My friend has the identical camera to mine and his camera can have a low battery and maintain all its photo's. So maybe I just got the short end of the stick...but this was my first camera so its okay for starters...but if you love to take photo's be full aware that on a LOW BATTERY that it just might not want to hold them. A major plus I do give this camera is the capasity of capturing a close up image! That I'll give 5 stars to...everything else I'd have to say 2 stars!</review_text>
I bougt this camera because I had had a Sony Coolpix 3, which took great pictures.  With this camera, you can never get it adjusted right.  If you use the flash the  pictures are to light, if you dont they are too dark.  It is a constant battle with this little cute camera. Worse camera purchase I ever made.</review_text>
I bought this with my camera and I guess I didnt realize I could get 3 sony tapes at walmart for the same price. My bad. But I would recommend you get the sony ones locally versus spending $14 on one tape</review_text>
I agree with reviewer Steve - anything less than a few hundred feet and these binocs are worthless.  The paper works says the "may" focus down to 35'.  Maybe some will but not certainly not my pair.  I am returning them since they are not good for simple viewing around the yard.  And no, the rubber eye caps ABSOLUTELY will not stay back making these binocs almost unusable by people with glasses (like me).Scot</review_text>
My cheap 10X50 Rugged Exposure brand binoculars give me a better view.  The rubber eye cups did not stay folded back for use with my glasses and I couldn't get my glasses close enough to eleviate the round "binocular effect".  I did a side-by-side comparison with my cheap binocs and liked the cheap ones better - my vision is not that bad either.  Maybe with perfect vision they would work for, but I doubt it</review_text>
The roll of paper that I recieved had what appeares to be 3 roller marks down the paper.  I am trying to get it replaced but Adorama is not willing to help out because the order is more then 14 days old.  I was not informed to inspect the product on arrival to insure a 14 day turn aroundf on issues.</review_text>
...unless they hadn't insisted on the "geared" telescopic part. It has some sort of swivel that is supposed to raise and lower it, but the handle is the cheapest possible plastic and it broke the very first time I used it. It's extremely annoying because overall it's not a bad tripod, but it really didn't need that bit of "hi-tech", and now I am unable to use the telescopic part at all...Yes, it's lightweight and somewhat unstable, but I can live with that. The biggest problem is the bad engineering and the subpar materials...</review_text>
I bought this camera after owning an Olympus digital camera for years. I was extremely happy with my Olympus, but wanted something smaller that would fit in my purse or diaper bag since I'm expecting. This camera was SUCH A DISAPPOINTMENT. Just about every single picture I took had huge white blobs all over it. (This only happened when using the flash. I must admit the camera takes great pictures in broad daylight without the flash.) Plus, if you used the zoom at all, the pictures came out fuzzy. The first digital camera I ever owned (7 years ago) took better pictures! The store I bought the camera from wouldn't take it back because I waited two days past the 14-day return policy. So, I sold the camera and took a $100 loss. I'd much rather lose $[...] than keep this camera</review_text>
There is a serious design flaw with this camera and it is even acknowledged on the FAQ section of the Sony website.  "If there are dust particles floating in the air, they can be illuminated by the strong light of the flash and sometimes appear in a recorded image as white, round glare spots.  This symptom tends to occur in low-light environments when using a compact digital camera due to the close proximity of the flash to the lens assembly.  However, this is not a malfunction."  READ:  your low-light pictures will have spots all over them!  Sony does not think this is a problem.  It is a design flaw.If you are only going to use this camera in full sun, then it is fantastic but seriously, there are many other cameras out there that do a much better job!</review_text>
I bought a Sony ICD-MX20 Digital Voice Recorder a week ago.  I was surprised that Sony does not provide downloads of the associated software named "Digital Voice Editor".  Sony Customer Service staff told me that if you lost the CD that came with the box, you had to buy a new one.  Only patches of the software are available to download.The Customer Service personnel told me that it was corporate policy despite the fact that the software is bound to the digital device.This immoral policy violating the norm of digital appliance industries and should not be encouraged.  Sony is demoting its brand name by offering poor post-sales services.  Think twice before making your buying decision.</review_text>
This is an awesome little camera.  Except that you can't use it at night!  There are horrible white spots in nighttime photos when the flash is used.  Apparently these appear because the flash is SO close to the lens in this camera, and so dust reflects badly.  It's a known problem [...]Also, it's totally annoying that Sony uses all their proprietary technology.  As a result, the cable for connecting this camera to the computer is unwieldly (uhh, have you heard of USB??!!), and you have to buy a sony Memory Stick, which probably won't work with anything else you have.  On the flipside, you can take movies that aren't limited to 30 seconds with this guy - i think that might be a result of the memory stick technology.But other than that, the design and operation of this little guy seems pretty slick.  The lens is not one of those that pops out, so not sure if that affects image quality at all, but as far as I could tell, quality was good.In the end, what good is a camera that can't take usable pictures with its flash??</review_text>
This is the 7th Olympus camera I've owned over the years, from film to digital.  I have always been very pleased with Olympus cameras and their usual superior optics.  This camera, though, is a major disappointment, mainly because even though it can shoot in RAW, there is no compatible conversion available yet, leaving you unable to process RAW images.  This renders the camera worthless at this time for serious pictures as you have no choice but to shoot in JPEG.  Olympus should have ensured that vendors such as Adobe had the necessary information to make the compatible RAW conversion Plug-ins available before this camera hit the market.  There's no excuse for Olympus to not have made sure this was the case, indeed it's downright irresponsible.Having said the above, the camera lens is quite nice, the camera itself operates well.  You can take quite good pictures.  However, the camera is not suitable for flash pictures in medium to low-light situations as there is significant lag time from the time you press the shutter to the picture actually being taken----if you're taking pictures of people, they will have moved by the time the picture is taken.The battery life is very good.  The camera fits nicely in your palm. And, having a 28 - 500 mm lens is great.If you don't shoot in RAW and you don't depend on flash photography, the camera is worth a look.  Otherwise, look at other products at this time</review_text>
I was so excited to buy a camcorder that recorded straight to DVD AND took pictures.......Well, the picture quality is AWFUL! I have gotten maybe 20 nice pics out of over a 1000........The problem is its SO low in pixels. We hear about 5MP cameras and up, this camera has less than 1MP!!!! I bought this before I knew anything about megapixels........You have to have 5 or more for the prints to be decent. All of my prints from this camera are bad! And they are only good for email. That's it. The camcorder capabilities are fair. My problem is that it doesn't work well on the computer, and it does NOT play immediately in all dvd players. You HAVE to buy the very expensive RAM discs for editing....Overall, I definitely would NOT buy again and I would not reccommend to a friend. I wish I had spent all that money on something else....</review_text>
This camcorder is only good for outdoor recording. In indoor recording or recording in little bit low light, picture quality is very bad. I tried to record in my living room where I have two 100 watt bulbs but recorded picture was very blurred. In outdoor recording in a sunny day, picture quality is quite good with sharp colors. Zoom works well</review_text>
I bought this camera for Christmas and it is absolutely horrible! It takes really bad quality pictures and it has a very noisy lens. It's a great looking camera but the screen is only 2 inches which is very small. This camera is not a good buy for it's class</review_text>
Don't be fooled by the enticing 6 megpixels that this camera offers.  I'd been waiting along time to upgrade from my 3 MP Nikon Coolpix SQ as the prices of the higer resolution cameras continued to drop.  What've I've discovered, however, is that there is so much sensor noise in the full resolution 6 MP images from this HP camera that the additional resolution is worthless.  The images look absolutely horrible.  My little Nikon SQ with it's lower resolution produces much sharper pictures at every image size.  Do your homework and make sure that the sensor in the camera you're buying is a good one</review_text>
The case looks exactly as in the pictures above, and the camera fits perfectly in it. However, the case is hardly a protection, it's not to be considered as more than a carrying bag. The velcro that keeps it closed is quite easy to open so I've dropped the case a few times while walking outdoors. Fortunately the case is designed to use the straps on the camera for carrying it around, so my camera stays with me in any event.There is a little strap on the case, supposedly to attach the case to the camera or to the straps, but it opens too easily, so it can't be trusted at all (the strap almost opens by the very weight of the case, which is not much).There is also a small pocket in the back, providing barely room enough for a set of replacement batteries (4 AA batteries) and the USB cable. Again, the velcro on it is too easy to open, even more after placing the batteries and the cable inside the pocket.Definitely, this is not designed as a practical solution. Just enough to protect the camera from dust and some scratches.If you value your equipment and want to protect it from more than the wind and the sun, while not being worried of losing the case around -or its contents, DON'T buy this one. Spend some more money and get a decent carrying case. I will</review_text>
The S9000 fits perfectly in the case. Too bad the case has no strap and no belt loop. Apparently, the camera strap is supposed to function as the case strap also. Too bad the camera strap is extremely short, made for very small people. So, instead of returning it and using a generic case that would not protectthe camera as well, I will adapt the case to work for me. I will get a bigger aftermarket strap for the camera. I can take the case to my seamstress and have a belt loop sewn on. It will work but only after extensive modification. Great camera design so it's odd that the case appears to have been designed by someone who has never used a camera before</review_text>
In the past, I have considered Amazon to be one of the better and more reliable online shopping websites. To be perfectly honest, I am no longer sure. Two months ago, I bought this camera set from 47th st photo that was being sold on Amazon. This camera set was called the 1 GB Stylus 720 SW kit. Ironically, the case did not fit the camera and the card reader did not even support 1 GB cards! My first thought was that 47th st photo made an oversight with the accessories. Two weeks after receiving the kit, I emailed 47th st photo to inform them of the mistake. After waiting a few weeks for a response, I decided to send them a second email. Again, no response. By this point, I felt helpless and turned to Amazon for aid. Surprisingly, Amazon was not much better than 47th st photo. Minutes after sending the email to Amazon, I received an automatic email informing me that Amazon had received my email. That was the last I heard from Amazon. More than two months have passed and I have not heard from either company</review_text>
I have purchased the pv-gs65 and everytime I use the camera with autofocus it makes everything blurry and only stays in focus for about 3 seconds.  I returned my camcorder and got another one (pvgs65) and I am still having this problem.  everytime i have used the camera i have to use manual focus.If anyone else has had this problem or knows how i could get this fixed please email me or post another review.brandonwg8677@comcast.netThank You</review_text>
So, you go out and plunk down nearly 600 bucks of your hard-earned cash for a Panasonic PB-GS65 DV camcorder. It is a digital video camcorder, after all. That's why you bought it. Well, guess what? It doesn't come with a DV cable to plug it into anything. That is so pathetically stupid I take it as an outright slap from a company that must think I'm just some sort pain in their shorts. It cost me completion of a project that I had to put together as soon as the camera arrived. So, Panasonic, I'll post a negative review of as many of your products I possibly can over the next few weeks and make you pay as much as possible for being about as stupid a company as I've ever had to deal with. Oh yeah, and you're camcorder is being returned. Go buy a cable and have a ball</review_text>
We purchased this camera and overall it was a good camera.  It took excellent outside video and was not a great performer in low light conditions but that is not atypical of today's reasonably priced miniDV camcorders.  However after six months the LCD screen suddenly stopped working.  It was not mishandled and the otherwise the camera works great.  We sent it last November to the Panasonic authorized service center.  They returned it three months later unrepaired because the part is not available.  We were out $100 in labor fees plus we still have a broken camera that is less than a year old.  I only share this as a warning to potential buyers.  Panasonic did not honor our warranty</review_text>
If you want a nice camera that works well for 15 months, then look no further.  But mine died completely and is headed for the electronic recycling bin.  I didn't realize I was getting a disposable when I bought it</review_text>
Bought this housing new in November 2005.In April I used it for the first time and it flooded on the first dive! Neither Amazon (since it is ouside the 30 day return policy) nor Canon will stand behind this product! Period! I got so much run around from Canon it was ridiculous. They wanted to "evaluate" the housing to determine if it was defective...DAH? They WOULD NOT tell me if I sent it back for the "evaluation" what the final resolution would be (refund, rework etc).Coincidentally, another person on the same trip had the same housing...it flooded on their first dive too!!!!Coincidence? No. Just terrible quality control and NO product support from Canon. DO NOT BUY CANON PRODUCTS!!</review_text>
Cons only, no pros:the velcro closure is week and opens easilyterrible lookthe side zippers are a mistery, totally uselessno space for extra memory or batteryattaches only to a very small beltthe flash opens spontaneously while inserting the camera in its pouch making it difficult to get it out later on and probably damaging the flash</review_text>
Overall this is a well-designed case which is custom fit for your Panasonic LX1 or LX2 camera, but it has a few major flaws.  First, there is no simple way to attach it to your belt.  There is a belt loop on the back but it is so small and tight that it won't fit any belt more than 1/2" wide.  Also, there are two zippers on this case, one on each side, which could potentially scratch your camera coming in or out of the pocket.  Finally, the velcro tab that  closes the case is not particularly strong and can occassionally pop loose on its own.  This might be a good case if you are going to keep it in your backpack or suitcase, but not for carrying around for everyday use.</review_text>
The Night Owl Optics monocular had a major flaw as soon as I started using it. The system uses high voltage derived from 2-AA bateries. Occationally the unit would create a large snap(arcing noise) and emit a bright flash of light from the eyepiece. If one is using the instrument, the light actually hurts the eye. I have returned the monocular to Night Owl for repairs. I do not know the result of the repairs as it is still in transit. They told me to ship it at my expense.Another strange requirement of the instrument is that the batteries are recommended to be removed if not used for 24 hours.Other than the above, the monocular has performed well.epilogue-Night Owl Optics did repair the unit and returned it.</review_text>
I bought this item over a year ago, and it has never served for anything. Once I spotted a deer and turned on the "IR" illuminator, and the deer ran away - not too surprising, it is actually a red light and totally visible for most animals. Better use a flashlight. This is a first-generation nightscope, and has a very small range of utility: If there is a little light, the adapted human eye sees better, and if there is almost no light the device does not see either. 100 bucks is not too much of a waste, but if you are serious about nightvision you should spend about 10 times as much</review_text>
The field of vision is too small for any useful viewing.  If you already know where your object is in the dark, then you can point this device towards the object and view it in dark.  But if you are searching for an object in the dark, the small field of vision makes the search useless.Also, there is too much "noise" in the image, thus making it very difficult to recognize the object that you are viewing.The IR makes the field of vision even smaller.Overall I did not find this device useful even for ordinary pleasure viewing.By the way, if you own a camcorder with night-view, you already know how how the objects look in the dark.  You can use your camcorder's night view feature instead of buying this expensive devic</review_text>
It was suggested by Amazon.com that I buy this product since I was purchasing a Canon PowerShot S2IS Digital Camera. Not knowing any better, I bought it.  It doesn't even WORK with this model camera. I bought a memory card reader instead at a local store & bypassed the need for an adapter altogether</review_text>
It takes too long to focus and shoot! This, coupled with the very long time it takes to write to the memory card, well, it is horrible.  People who write in saying they didn't notice the the slow focus and writing, must be either paid by Nikon or total nubs.Do not buy this camera.It did take decent movies, and the size is nice</review_text>
Poor and slow Focus and flash. Thought Nikon had a good name.......WrongIf you like this camera it must be you first digital</review_text>
i bought this camera based on an older 3mp version a friend of mine has that i liked.  the older model is far superior.  this camera is slow to focus, slow to shoot, and slow to save.  i took 5 pictures in a row of the same thing in the same lighting condition (indoor, medium light) on the automatic setting, all 5 pictures turned out different, only one turned out clear.  i returned it the next day and bought a cannon that i am very happy with</review_text>
This is not the best way to get started in astronomy.The low power eyepiece is fairly useful, the higher power one less so, and don't even think of using the barlow.  The maximum useful magnification for a 60mm scope is about 120-140x, assuming the objective lens is of good quality. When you use the middle and high magnifications provided with this scope, you exceed that limit and the increased image size is more than offset by breakdown.To their credit, the manufacturer has provided a reflex "red dot" finder in place of the useless 5x24 finders that plague so many similar scopes.Even so, what you can expect to see in this scope is rather limited.  Some star clusters will be dimly visible, but galaxies and nebulae will be barely--if at all--visible.In a way, it is hard to fault Celestron for making and marketing this scope.  Their upper-tier instruments are quite good, but the big money appears to be made on mass market toys like this.  In one sense the sale of these scopes subsidizes their good models.  Just make sure, gentle reader, to stay away from the toys.Using an astronomical telescope is not like playing an MP3 file and but rather like playing a guitar. It is a learned skill. And you must do a lot of homework before you buy a telescope. Buying without prior experience is like buying a car without knowing anything about driving. If you want to see the wonders of the sky, contact your local astronomy club and attend one of their star parties. The members love sharing their hobby and can set you straight as to how to get started. The best way is to learn the sky with the unaided eye and 10x50 binoculars (decent ones are available on Amazon), then graduate to something along the lines of a 150-200mm (6-8") Dobsonian; Celestron's own 6" Starhopper can be found on Amazon for under $290.For more information on buying telescopes, see my encyclopedic guide on Amazon: "So you want to buy a telescope.</review_text>
This scope is not a good starter scope for anyone interested in astronomy.  Here's why:1.  The objective is too small, only 60 mm, 2.36 inches, so it is too small to bring in the light necessary for even a beginning look at the universe.  I suppose it is adequate for the moon, but that is it.  The planets will appear as very small disks.  One will be able to see Saturn's rings, but the image will be very small.  Forget it for deep sky objects, clusters, galaxies, etc.2.  The mount is an altazimuth, which will not follow the celestial object in the sky.  The earth is rotating, and anyone focusing on a star or moon will quickly find the object drifting out of the field of vision.  A better mount is an equatorial mount which makes it much easier to track objects.3.  The 4mm eyepiece is too powerful for this scope.  The observer will find it hard to look through (very small eye opening), and will in most cases cause blurred images.  The 20 mm eyepiece is the only functional eyepiece.  The barlow is a 3x, which again is too poweerful for this scope.4.  The mount will vibrate when touched, which will cause the image in the eyepiece to "shiver", which is very frustrating.Even for the low price, don't be enticed by this scope; it has too many flaws. Save your money for a larger scope with a better mount.Jim "Konedog" Koenig, astronomy buf</review_text>
We have NOT received this item yet.Please let me know the current status</review_text>
The eye piece that comes with the scpe is practicaly unuseable.But of course  you can 'buy' the eye piece that really works separately from the manufacturer.The whole thing was a waste of time...I gave it to my five year old to trash.  At least he will have some fun with it that way....it's realy just a childs toy.</review_text>
This is not at all suitable for young children.  It's awkward and difficult to use.  We're sending it back.  Totally inappropriate for children</review_text>
I have owned numerous Celestron telescopes up to 11-inch apertures, so I expected better. I ordered this for my daughter - it arrived defective; the primary mirror had slipped from its bracket, making collimation impossible. In Celestron's defense, it likely happened in transit. Amazon's return policy is not a hassle, and I'm upgrading her to another telescope. I'm sure that had this particular scope not arrived in a defective condition it would have made a great scope. Only criticism is the plugs on the back to cover the collimation screws pop out a bit too easily</review_text>
I had high expectations when purchasing a laser range finder for use on the golf course. After a lot of research, I settled on the Pro Tour Laser.As previous reviewers have stated, this unit is very hard to stabilize.  I have a feeling this is true of all lasers.Even with supporting both elbows on the hood of a car I found this unit very hard to find yardages for objects beyond 150 yards paricularly when bright sunlight is present.On the golf course, finding the flag and obtaining a yardage at longer yardages is almost impossible if there are objects behind the flag such as trees or landscaping.This unit has been returned and I have gone to a standard handheld GPS instead. Once the center of the green is initially saved as a waypoint, this is a very reliable and quick method to get a yardage, you just have to convert feet or 1/100's of a mile into yards. I do this with a chart taped on the back of the GPS. Accuracy is about 2-4 yards which is good enough for anyone but a vey low handicapper.I am staying away from a laser finder until golf courses uniformly put reflectors on their poles.</review_text>
Nice look, good feel, turns on fast, takes great pictures.  Really great, with ridiculous depth of field and resolution, you can in no way appreciate how good the pictures will look on the LCD back, which is huge.  So, what's my beef?  Slow pictures, double flash, slow slow follow on shot, slow.  Okay say cheese, one second, two seconds.... i only got thiis camera because I thought that problem was solved.  Yes my battery is charged, no I do not see how to stop the problem other than no flash at all... where is one flash and let me worry about the red eye? slow- i hate it!!!!!!  Still, its awsome, slick, and a fair price</review_text>
After reading the great reviews regarding the VCT870RM tripod (here and elsewhere), I decided to purchase one for my Sony HDR-HC1 camcorder.When I first opened the box, the VCT870RM seemed sturdy and well made.  The tilting action was smooth and had a nice touch, and the remote controls on the handle worked well.  However, the panning action was so stiff that while attempting to pan, the main column would twist and the handle would bend slightly.  It felt like the tension control knob was tightened, but that was not the case.  In fact, the panning continued to drag severely even with the tension knob completely removed.I recently found a VCT870RM review from about 5 years ago where somebody else was having the same problem with stiff panning.  However, due to all of the other great reviews for this tripod, I'm assuming that I just received a bad one.I'm now in the process of working with Amazon to get a replacement sent to me.  So far, Amazon has been great, as they've already scheduled UPS to come to my home and pick up the defective tripod the very next day.  They say that I'll receive my new tripod next week.  I'll post here on the status of the new one when it arrives.UPDATE:  I received a new replacement VCT870RM tripod from Amazon, and this one works great.  Panning and tilting are both very smooth, and the tension is adjustable.  If I'd have received this tripod originally, I would've given it 5 stars.  The first VCT870RM I received was definitely defective.  I'm glad I returned it, and I'm glad I bought it through Amazon (best price at the time, and a hassle-free return)</review_text>
Like other reviewers, after careful research, I decided to purchase this product. It was affordable, received good reviews, and was of bigger size than others in the similar price range. When I received it in mail, I was quite happy: it worked great out of the box and it looked even nicer than what I had expected. The screen was bright and very attractive.The problems started about three weeks following the purchase. First, the slideshow option (the kind with music) stopped working. Whenever I pushed the slideshow button, the screen would completely freeze and I had to restart the unit in order to use any other function. I thought, no big deal, I would just exchange the frame for another one.My second unit arrived yesterday. This one, however, started having problems right out of the box. After about 5 minutes into the slideshow, the screen started flickering, than shaking, became completely staticky and finally it re-started automatically. I played it two more times after that, each time with a similar thing happening 10 or 15 minutes into the slideshow.It is obvious this photoframe has a lot of potential (big, bright screen); unfortunately, the software is very buggy. I checked the Portable USA website and it does not appear that they have any patches that could be downloaded as a fix. I will have to return this unit again, this time for a refund.My assumption is that this product has received many positive reviews because people like it after they initially open the box. However, I would be curious to learn if others have had a similar experience after several weeks or months of ownership</review_text>
I selected a Sony VF-30CPKXS polarizing filter but it took me to this page where I got a Sony VF-R30NKX 30mm Neutral Density Filter. There is a big difference. May 9, 2006. I hope this is a mistake and not intentional deception</review_text>
This battery is NOT compatible with the the JVC-GRD270US video camera.  I did get a purchase price refund, but I am out shipping costs both ways</review_text>
There is a serious design flaw with this camera and it is even acknowledged on the FAQ section of the Sony website.  "If there are dust particles floating in the air, they can be illuminated by the strong light of the flash and sometimes appear in a recorded image as white, round glare spots.  This symptom tends to occur in low-light environments when using a compact digital camera due to the close proximity of the flash to the lens assembly.  However, this is not a malfunction."  READ:  your low-light pictures will have spots all over them!  Sony does not think this is a problem.  It is a design flaw.If you are only going to use this camera in full sun, then it is fantastic but seriously, there are many other cameras out there that do a much better job!</review_text>
I bought a Sony ICD-MX20 Digital Voice Recorder a week ago.  I was surprised that Sony does not provide downloads of the associated software named "Digital Voice Editor".  Sony Customer Service staff told me that if you lost the CD that came with the box, you had to buy a new one.  Only patches of the software are available to download.The Customer Service personnel told me that it was corporate policy despite the fact that the software is bound to the digital device.This immoral policy violating the norm of digital appliance industries and should not be encouraged.  Sony is demoting its brand name by offering poor post-sales services.  Think twice before making your buying decision.</review_text>
This is the Worst camera I've ever owned. I'm not exaggerating. I'm so upset for wasting money on it. The only pictures that turn out, are outside in bright daylight. It takes horrible pictures in low light, there's a high level of noise in the photos. The video mode moves in and out on its own, ruining the video. I sometimes get colored lines down the right side of the videos. My friend's $88 dollar digital camera takes way better pictures than this thing. It just plain sucks.</review_text>
I ordered this DV Cable in hopes that I would be able to use it to transfer my videos from the DV Camera to my computer, however, my computer does not have a DV plug-in.  I have not been able to use the cable since I bought it and I am truly disappointed</review_text>
My kids can see better through a toilet paper roll than this "telescope."Meaning, you can't see a freaking thing through it. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY</review_text>
I got this telescope for my desk at work because I have a decent view.  It stinks, I think I can see better with my naked eye.  Plus you can not focus it because the slider is so stiff.  I guess I will be buying another telescope now</review_text>
Amazon sent me an email asking me to write a review of this product.  Usually I like to have actually used the product before writing a review, but since I haven't received it yet, that is not possible.  It has been over 1 month since I ordered this with the Crutchfield storefront at Amazon.com.  Amazon's site indicated the product was in stock, but since ordering, it has been placed on back order twice and expected to ship in a few days from now.  I just wonder how it could take so long to get a product from manufacturer to end user.  I don't know where this is manufactured, or who Crutchfield's supplier is, but needless to say I am not entirely pleased with this whole process... which doesn't really have anything to do with Amazon.  I hear DV cable does it's job, but I'll have to wait and see</review_text>
I bought this frame as a gift for my husband and he was extremely disappointed with the grainy quality of the photos.  We promptly sent it back for a refund.  I would recommend spending the money on a better digital frame or save your money altogether and create a slideshow screensaver on your computer monitor!</review_text>
I received this as a gift and at first I thought it was great, but then I realized it would only display 142 images. I worked with technical support for several months (they are not the speediest or most helpful). I resized, renamed, restructured the photos, tried them on different media and finally they admitted it was a bug. I RMA'd the unit at my shipping expense of course, only to recieve another with the same problem.  I wouldn't recommend this purchase</review_text>
Received the 'first' unit which was missing cables and had a non-functional remote.  Played MP3's, mov, and displayed pictures fine.  Would have been happy enough if all the parts were present and working.  Returned this unit and received a second which didn't work, didn't even have a remote or speakers (561 in a 562 box?).  Time for another replacement - which came without remote, with speakers, but faulty software or micro?  Menu's one deep were blank rectangles which didn't function and MP3's which played on the first unit locked up this unit - same for mov files.  Actually tried a forth time because the first unit seemed to be OK functionally, but last unit was exactly the same as previous with blank menu's and faulty functionality.  E-mailed Digital Spectrum and have not received a reply, which actually led me to write this feedback!  Hard to believe this company will survive if they don't straighten up their act</review_text>
It arrived broken with the stand missing.  I have been waiting to replace it at a local Discovery store</review_text>
I bought this camera about a month ago and I am highly disappointed with it.  The quality of the pictures is very poor, showing large grain, even at SHQ and low ISO settings.  No combination of settings seems to improve quality</review_text>
If I could, I would give this camcorder a 0 of 5. Since I now have to search for a new camcorder, from reading other Panasonic model reviews, I am convinced I did not just get a lemon, but the Panasonic brand is bad.We bought this camcorder 18 months ago at the birth of our son. It has had problems from the beginning. First, I could not finalize the disk. I called Panasonic support, who basically told me the problems we were having were because the camera was not being held still while recording. This is ridiculous since I often set the camera down on a countertop so I can be in the video. Then I finally got someone to tell me that I needed to be recording on Panasonic mini-DVDs. The best it has worked have been on the Panasonic DVDs which are some of the most expensive, and even that is no guarantee that you will be able to watch the DVD after finalization. I still have freezing of the picture and sparatic playback when trying to watch. It has skipped over whole sections. I have 3 DVD players in my home (all different brands) and the disk works on none of them.I finally got an address to send it in for repairs. I was not happy to be without my camcorder for an extended period of time. I was told they would look at the camcorder, see if there was a problem and call me. I waited a week after I knew it was in the shop to check the status. Panasonic FAILED TO MENTION that I would need to pay $207.50 UP FRONT for them to look at it, then if any repairs were needed, this cost would cover them as well. SO, I have been without a camcorder for 3 weeks while waiting to see if it needed fixing, and the company I sent it to has not even looked at it because I have not paid them! This is crazy since I can get a brand new miniDV camcorder for $225.The only reason it has taken me so long to take drastic action is because we are military living overseas and bought it at Best Buy. So you see why I couldn't just take it back to the store (or I would have a long time ago)! Also after spending over $500 on this piece of junk, I could not afford to just replace it. Sending it in was not an option when my son was a newborn, because I didn't want to miss any precious memories (which I ened up missing anyway!). So now the holidays are upon us, and I will be forced to purchase another camcorder, since I don't know if they will send it back to me in time for Christmas. I will not pay the $207.50 for a camera that hasn't worked well out of the box. I also had to pay shipping both ways for nothing!Plus another thing, the still picture is bad quality. Very grainy and you can actually see pixels when you print it. We only used that function once.I have lost so many disks, and have so many others that only play part of the DVD that when I think of it I cry. I have also wasted so much time trying to figure out how to fix the problem with a customer support that is useless. I wish I would have never bought this camcorder! IF YOU ARE BUYING THIS CAMCORDER TO CAPTURE MEMORIES, BUY ANOTHER! I will not buy Panasonic products again!</review_text>
After reading the reviews a bought the accessory kit. I compared the eyepieces and the barlow with standard inexpensive plossls (orion, knigth owl, gso) and the celestron's optics looked the worst one. I sold the kit after 2 weeks..</review_text>
I recently bought a new Celestron Nexstar 4SE telescope and this eyepiece accessory kit.  Much to my disappointment, the eyepieces in this kit did not fit very well into the eyepiece holder of the telescope, and when cold (nights in Colorado are 25-45F), the eyepieces did not fit at all.Celestron customer service was horrible and did not pay attention to my problem and did not follow up by email as promised.  When I called a second time, they had no clue about the construction of the eyepieces and no thoughts about how to fix this problem.  Amazon replaced the kit (Thank you Amazon!), but the replacements did not fit either.  I'm returning that kit too.  I finally bought a kit from Meade (3 eyepieces and a moon filter) that fit properly and are very easy to use.To be fair, if these eyepieces fit your telescope then they are a tremendous value (hence the rating of 2 stars rather than 1).  The Meade kit is a worse value, but because they work in my nice new scope, they are the best for anyone using a Nexstar 4SE</review_text>
I took it straight out of the package, plugged it in for a charge.  Charger never reached "green" ready but the battery overheated and melted several hours later.Customer Service was not the best I've had.  Don't make the same mistake, keep looking</review_text>
if you are shoting kid at the swiming pool, it's ok. but,if you are the open water diver, please don't buy it. i try it yesterday, it will not work after 10m/33ft, it will show the red screen and count down timer, it scare me. and i miss a lot of shot for yesterday's dive. it's really disappointed to me</review_text>
Cons only, no pros:the velcro closure is week and opens easilyterrible lookthe side zippers are a mistery, totally uselessno space for extra memory or batteryattaches only to a very small beltthe flash opens spontaneously while inserting the camera in its pouch making it difficult to get it out later on and probably damaging the flash</review_text>
Overall this is a well-designed case which is custom fit for your Panasonic LX1 or LX2 camera, but it has a few major flaws.  First, there is no simple way to attach it to your belt.  There is a belt loop on the back but it is so small and tight that it won't fit any belt more than 1/2" wide.  Also, there are two zippers on this case, one on each side, which could potentially scratch your camera coming in or out of the pocket.  Finally, the velcro tab that  closes the case is not particularly strong and can occassionally pop loose on its own.  This might be a good case if you are going to keep it in your backpack or suitcase, but not for carrying around for everyday use.</review_text>
I purchased this camera in December 2005 to replace my 7 year old Sony Digital 8 camcorder. Unfortunately, everything except size is inferior in the Panasonic compared to the "ancient" Sony.  The color is not nearly as sharp, the low light capabilities are laughable and the battery lasts half as long.  The sound quality was adequate if not watching playback on the camera itself. The camera's highest volume setting is too low to use if you want to listen while loading video into your computer's editing program.The Panasonic does have a relatively convenient manual exposure feature many other miniDV camcorders lack. This allows better light control when shooting in auditoriums with spotlights. It uses a toggle to control the exposure and, while it is not as easy as the external thumb wheel on the Sony, it is adequate.  Unfortunately, it functions so poorly in low light it wouldn't provide adequate color in an auditorium.I thought the image stabilization would be a great feature but my video is much shakier with the Panasonic than my old Sony. Maybe it's because the camera is so small it's hard to keep as stable as the larger Sony.Video editing on a PC is equally easy on the Sony and Panasonic but the Panasonic's poor user manual would make it very difficult for a novice to figure out and your picture quality will be much better with Sony's Digital 8.If you don't HAVE to record in miniDV format or have a built in 3 megapixel still camera, I'd recommend buying an inexpensive Sony Digital8 for about a third of the price of the GS250.If you do have to have a miniDV camera and you won't be shooting in bright sunlight, try another brand.This upper end 3CCD camcorder will now have a home on a closet shelf where it will stay unless I need a very small camera to chase action in a cross country race or similar event on a sunny day. Otherwise, I'll use the old Sony so I can share the video I shoot without being embarrassed about the picture quality</review_text>
Try to call Panasonic customer service @1-800-973-4264 and tell them you have question about your camcorder first. Panasonic service is the worst one in this world.</review_text>
Straight out of the box disappointment with the extremely poor quality.  Plug into wall and does not work.  After trying numerous different outlets/wiggles of the cord, it finally powered on.  After putting in a card, the pics were ok, passable.  The mp3 popped and moaned and popped some more, and I was only playing very quiet jazz.  This is not worth the money even though it is cheap.  Pay a little more and get one that is of better quality</review_text>
I bought this frame as a gift for my parents and ended up returning it.  The price was right but the quality was poor and there were 2 spots on the screen that looked like they were already burned out (displaying blue and green pixels).  I did enjoy the fact that it hooks right up to the computer with a USB port but that is about all.  Overall don't waste your time and money</review_text>
I've just returned this unit. It doesn't play videos as advertised.  I was able to get it to properly play .avi files at 320 x 240 resolution...see other review below. But 320x240 gives a postage stamp size picture. At 640 x 480 the playback was full size but jerky and broken....more later.I have now had 3 different brands of 8" photo frames in my possession: a Phillips, a Pandigital, and this Coby.I have developed the following list of features in my "ideal" photo frame. First, video playback: I've been taking a lot of video clips with my digital still camera...they come out well and the convenience of not having to lug my camcorder along, and the ability to quickly transfer clip files within/between chips and my computer is attractive. I would like a frame which will play the format my camera is taking (.mov, more later) I'd also like the frame to play a multi-media show...that is, to play movie clips in show presentations, intermixed with .jpg photo files.Second feature is to play .wma music files, in addition to MP3. This is because I have a non-Ipod personal music player. All my music is in .wma format because it is roughly half the file size of MP3.Third, I would like a timer on my frame...set it to come on in the morning, off at night, for example.Fourth, I'd like an audio or speaker out feature. None of these frames has home theater-like sound, and I have an extra pair of computer speakers I'd probably hook up. Video out could come in handy too.Fifth, I'd like to be able to rotate stills from within the frame's software, manually or automatically. Yes, you can rotate them in the computer, but the frame may or may not preserve the rotation. (This may depend on which photo edit program you are using.)Sixth, I'd like a folder hierarchy file management system in the frame's software. Especially with the huge chips now available, I see an advantage to push a couple of buttons and change the picture set (folder), rather than switching out chips.Here is where the 3 units I've had stack up, followed by my next (fourth) unit.I am keeping the Pandigital....which Costco has for $140. It plays .mov video files, but not within a slideshow. It has no speaker out jack and the sound is tinny. It requires MP3 music files. It permits picture rotation.  No folder management system. No clock/timer. No ability to play stills/video intermixed. I think the Coby and Phillips picture quality is brighter but the Pandigital is ok.The phillips didn't play video, and since it also had a software glitch when I returned it I decided to look elsewhere. (no remote and no music with the philips either.)The Coby won't play my videos, even after I used my converter program to try about 10 different MP4 and AVI variations. The Coby plays .wma music files, won't rotate stills, has no folder system, no clock/timer. It has a speaker out jack. It does not permit intermixing video and stills in one multimedia show. Picture quality is fully equal to Philips, generally the recognized standard. If all you want is photos, and never turn your camera sideways, this unit will be a good value.Another unit I'd like to get to play with would be the Image Moments model by Digitalfoci. I've exchanged emails with someone there who clearly knows what they are talking about and I believe this unit will intermix my photos and videos.</review_text>
My primary use for this camera was to take pictures indoors with very bright lighting, without the use of a flash. The camera couldn't handle taking pictures without the flash at all, despite it being extremely bright in the room (5 different lights on plus 3 overhead halogen track lights). The camera's shutter speed was so slow that it was nearly impossible to get a picture that wasn't blurry. Maybe 1 in every 4 pictures came out clear. I believe the fact that its a 10 megapixel camera is what did it.I used to have a Cannon PowerShot SD450 that was awesome, but it was stolen and so I needed a replacement. I had no complaints about the 450 and it took the same type of pictures in bright indoor lighting just fine without a flash, unlike the 900. I am sure the camera would be fine for people who always use the flash or take their pictures in bright sunlight but for my purpose, this camera was horrible and it has since been returned. Instead, I just got a Fuji Finepix F30, which is supposed to be better without the flash. We'll see</review_text>
"lens error, restart camera" message appears today (mar 26) after buying production on amazon on feb 20, 07. When I searched google for this error message saw thousands of canon users having similar error / e18 error with older and newer version of the canon. I have tried panasonic and sonys before and never had an issue. I dread that canon customer service is going to waste my hours in getting a replacement and ultimately may end up charging me over a 100 for repairs like they have done to other users(after reading user feedback on web)</review_text>
Huge problems with the LCD screen, two cameras within one month after purchase showed the LCD "shattered." One has already been shipped for service and the other one will be going in tomorrow.  Sure it is easy to use and produces great pictures, but the LCD problem is a definite negative.</review_text>
I just got this camera a week ago and thought it was great.  But today I tried to turn it on and it's completely dead!  I even changed out the batteries and it's still completely dead.  This is the first digital camera I've had and I bought it because I'm going to Europe (two days after it died).  Now I have to scramble to get a replacement before I take off.Grrrrr!!</review_text>
I bought a 743 for the wife for Christmas. I had a 6330 that I was very happy with. So a 743 should be better Right? Every time that she went to use it the batteries were dead. We finally figured out that a new set would go dead in two days without ever turning it on! After several e mails they told me to call service. I got someone in India that could not understand me and I had a really hard time figuring out what he was saying. They made it very dificult to get it sent in. I sent it in today, but I do not expect much from the example that their service has done so far. I hope it comes back at least.</review_text>
I recommend NOT to purchase this item.  Look for another one.The lens itself seems ok, although I can't really say, but the adapter which is built in to the lens is shoddy and cumbersome and ruins the the whole deal.  The adapter is a quick release type where one end attaches to the camera and the lens simply snaps in, or is quickly released.  This would be great, except for two very important things.  One, the lens fits very loosely in the quick release adapter. This causes some MAJOR distortion, especially when moving.  Two, the housing is made of thin plastic which does not seem very durable.  In fact it is so cheaply thin that I am afraid to leave it in my car because the heat may distort the plastic. One drop, even a small one, and it is done for</review_text>
I bought this camera after my 3-year-old broke my kodak Z700. I  loved my Z700, even though it was only 4MP and didn't have a lot of the features the newer cameras have. I figured that buying a newer kodak model and upgrading to 6MP would be a no-brainer, but I was disappointed in 2 major areas. First, the lag time is so slow on the C653, when I took pictures of my kids I rarely got what I was expecting to see. The smile or look that I saw when the flash went was long gone by the time it captures. We experimented with tons of settings and there was no difference. The other disappointing area was low-light picture quality. Anything I shot indoors was grainy except where the flash hit. Every background was grainy. Terrible. Using the low-light settings fixed the problem, but then your subject is blurry because you're not in "Sports" or "Kids" mode anymore (which we used all the time with the Z700 for taking pics of the kids). On my Z700 (which is only $150 now), I could set it and forget it. Set it to "action", and it took perfect pics indoors, or out, moving or stationary. That's what I thought I was getting in the C653, but I was wrong. I ended up returning the camera</review_text>
Grainy ISO 100 pictures at any light conditions. Usage of 5mp and low sharpness options partially solves the problem, but if you take pictures with Panasonic DMC-FZ7 and compare ... it will be clear that a garbage trash is the right place for this camera.I had Panasonic DMC-FZ7 and the only cons. is really noisy high ISO sensitivity mode.In FZ8 camera Panasonic implemented the Venus III processor (FZ7 has Venus II processor). As a result picture quality really improved at high ISO sensitivity modes but DRAMATICALLY changed for the WORSE in ISO 100 mode</review_text>
This is a poor excuse for a lens coming from Canon.  Can only be used at a certain zoom or you will get a circular ring around the photo.  Please do not waste your money like I did</review_text>
I am a novice photographer, so take this with a grain of salt...  I just bought this kit and it included no instructions and lots of components.  I suppose if you are accustomed to using these kits, putting them together must seem self-explanatory.  If you are new to these kits you will find it frustrating.  It is also frustrating to discover Smith Victor does not have a support site (just references on photography).  They do not even provide a support # or address.  Keep all this in mind when considering something from this company</review_text>
The zipper was broken within one day, and the hook was broken within two days</review_text>
I bought this lens in May for my brand new Rebel XT. I used it on a vacation mainly, and am pretty dissapointed. I'm no pro, or even skilled amateur, but I do know the lens is not giving me quality shots.The autofocusing is slow, and af or manual shots aren't very sharp at any zoom. There seems to be a fingerprint on one of the inner lenses that indicates poor quality control to me.I wanted a good, all around lens before building a real lens collection of different types. I guess this would fit the bill, if it took sharp pictures. I wouldn't pay more than $150 for this lens again</review_text>
Date on still photo will not print,it's no good where yoy need that type of info on the printed photo</review_text>
Me and my wife bought the JVC camcorder and burner set up to send dvd's back to my parents because we did not have an computer at the time. At first it worked great then after 2-3 disc in it would pull up the same message unable to formate the disc. We have been throught about 25 disc just to burn off 10. We returned it to get another and it did the same thing. WE thought i might of been a bad batch of disc so we used the one that came with the burner and no deal. I do not recommend this to anyone</review_text>
We returned this item.  It was a glorified external DVD burner.  It was not worth the money</review_text>
I own many Sony products, including a Sony Cybershot DSC-F717, which I love. However, I am very disappointed by this camera, the Sony Cybershot DSC-T5.I bought the T5 for my mother and father as a present. It is small, lightweight, portable; easy to use; and stylish. It does take nice photos in brightly lit environments, especially outside.However, after several months of use, a few problems have become consistently evident:(1) There is HORRIBLE red-eye (and white-eye) artifact in MANY pictures. The so-called "red-eye reduction" setting does nothing.(2) Dim-light photography is very grainy, with lots of noise. Night-time photography is impossible.These problems are not unique to our camera... You will find many corroborating reviews above.Overall, I am VERY disappointed in this camera, and wish I could exchange it for something else.Do not buy this camera. Other reviewers suggest the T7 or T9 take much better pictures (and they are still small pocket-size cameras).</review_text>
Ordered one new from B&H.  In the 1x mode the top light came on, no worries.Turned on the bottom setting of the switch, 2x, nothing. Neither light came on.Pitiful.  Sending it back</review_text>
Not seeing many reviews, I'm writing this as a warning. This mic is horrible. I bought it to get rid of the &quot;motor noise&quot; from my Canon Optura Pi, as many others have. When I listen now, the sound is much worse. You can barely hear people speak over the loud humming... THIS MIC IS HORRIBLE</review_text>
I bought this about 10 months ago with an additional camera. The night vision only works on one of the cameras and the interference is horrible. It snaps and pops all night long and I have to move it all around to find "just the right spot".I actually have to sleep with earplugs in to drown out the noise. I live in a single story 2100 sq. foot house. I should have returned it right away, but I kept it because I had no other monitor at the time. Now, 10 months later, the volume control does not work anymore! I am now trying to find a new monitor. I love having the video monitor though, so I will look for a different brand</review_text>
I received this monitor as a baby shower gift, but it was something I had particularly wanted.  I was extremely disappointed when I found it didn't work at all!  There is so much sound interference it's impossible to tell if the noises are the baby or the interference.  We disconnected every electronic appliance in the house (cordless phone, microwave, even turned off our cell phones) and still the interference was there.  The video reception is awful, supposed to be up to 300 feet, we are only roughly 20 feet away and still the picture is terrible. I swear it was supposed to have "night vision" - forget it, non-existent.  I'm off the video monitoring; I'm on-line now to buy an old-fashioned voice monitor</review_text>
Because the camera eye moves only in one direction, the device had to be permanently attached on a wall across baby's bed. You have to decide whether you want sacrifice the resolution to see the entire crib (older child can crawl away from the view) or see just a part of it. We have cell phones and wireless network so static was pretty bad. We went with Graco's excellent digital iMonitor.</review_text>
Very dissappointed.  My son (I bought this for them) hooked it up and there is so much interference it cannot be used.  Audio just static and noise.I did find it interesting that the instructions tell you it might NOT work.  Try telling this to me before I purchase thank you.  This is the last I purchase equipment on-line.  I will stick to books thank you very much</review_text>
This monitor worked pretty well for 4 months. We purchased this monitor and it worked well provided we were in the next room or on the same floor as the receiver. However, when we were downstairs (baby's room upstairs next to our's) the monitor was fuzzy, and had static and lines running thru. We were still able to have audio recpetion. After 4 months, the picture disappeared, audio was still operational. Not a good camera for long term</review_text>
This camera has a very poor lens. At 1x zoom, the barrel/spherical distortion is enormous; try taking a picture of a tiled wall. Image quality is also so-so when a picture is viewed at 100%; scaled down on a computer monitor, the quality is OK. Color fidelity is next to nothing when using flash and auto white balance. [...]</review_text>
Review:Unit had a very large defect in the field of view. It's not one of the usual spots from the intensifier tube; those I am aware of as I have other night vision devices. This goes about 1/4 of the way across, near the center. Had to return it. Poor quality control.Update - the new one does not have any image defects. It also doesn't focus as sharply as the first one did (or my other one does), but it isn't too bad</review_text>
It never worked as advertised and total quit working after about two months. Don't buy, you've been warned</review_text>
I bought this camera after owning an Olympus digital camera for years. I was extremely happy with my Olympus, but wanted something smaller that would fit in my purse or diaper bag since I'm expecting. This camera was SUCH A DISAPPOINTMENT. Just about every single picture I took had huge white blobs all over it. (This only happened when using the flash. I must admit the camera takes great pictures in broad daylight without the flash.) Plus, if you used the zoom at all, the pictures came out fuzzy. The first digital camera I ever owned (7 years ago) took better pictures! The store I bought the camera from wouldn't take it back because I waited two days past the 14-day return policy. So, I sold the camera and took a $100 loss. I'd much rather lose $[...] than keep this camera</review_text>
There is a serious design flaw with this camera and it is even acknowledged on the FAQ section of the Sony website.  "If there are dust particles floating in the air, they can be illuminated by the strong light of the flash and sometimes appear in a recorded image as white, round glare spots.  This symptom tends to occur in low-light environments when using a compact digital camera due to the close proximity of the flash to the lens assembly.  However, this is not a malfunction."  READ:  your low-light pictures will have spots all over them!  Sony does not think this is a problem.  It is a design flaw.If you are only going to use this camera in full sun, then it is fantastic but seriously, there are many other cameras out there that do a much better job!</review_text>
I bought a Sony ICD-MX20 Digital Voice Recorder a week ago.  I was surprised that Sony does not provide downloads of the associated software named "Digital Voice Editor".  Sony Customer Service staff told me that if you lost the CD that came with the box, you had to buy a new one.  Only patches of the software are available to download.The Customer Service personnel told me that it was corporate policy despite the fact that the software is bound to the digital device.This immoral policy violating the norm of digital appliance industries and should not be encouraged.  Sony is demoting its brand name by offering poor post-sales services.  Think twice before making your buying decision.</review_text>
This is an awesome little camera.  Except that you can't use it at night!  There are horrible white spots in nighttime photos when the flash is used.  Apparently these appear because the flash is SO close to the lens in this camera, and so dust reflects badly.  It's a known problem [...]Also, it's totally annoying that Sony uses all their proprietary technology.  As a result, the cable for connecting this camera to the computer is unwieldly (uhh, have you heard of USB??!!), and you have to buy a sony Memory Stick, which probably won't work with anything else you have.  On the flipside, you can take movies that aren't limited to 30 seconds with this guy - i think that might be a result of the memory stick technology.But other than that, the design and operation of this little guy seems pretty slick.  The lens is not one of those that pops out, so not sure if that affects image quality at all, but as far as I could tell, quality was good.In the end, what good is a camera that can't take usable pictures with its flash??</review_text>
The leather case has a magnetc latch, the magnetic force is strong enough for an SD card to stick onto it.  I have not lost any images yet and the camera has not gone haywire, but I decided not to chance it. I am surprised that Canon cautions against placing the camera in Strong magnetic fields in their user guide yet produce an accesory with this feature!Although constructed of fine leather, the case is also very bulky, making the tiny slim elph twice as thick and too big to fit into a pocket or purse.The neck strap is OK, it looks metallic but is wrapped inside a clear plastic tubing, making it look quite cheap and stiff, again increasing the bulk of the camera.The battery works fine, but the two other accessories are not worth the extra money</review_text>
My Coolpix 8800 lapsed into "system error 2" mode within weeks of getting it.   After taking 3 or 4 shots the error message comes up and I have to shut it down and start it back up to take a few more shots before the error 2 message recurrs.  Nikon says to try a fresh battery and different storage card...no help.   Now Nikon says says send it in and we'll fix it- but don't say what it will cost...   The shots I do get aren't as good as an HP camera we have that was half the price.  The controls are ridiculously complex.   The flash pops up and fires when shooting in bright light...the whole thing is a piece of junk.  The only good shots I've gotten with it are inside shooting documents from 2 feet away...but for any outdoor complicated lighting it is unreliable... I wouldn't recommend this camera or any Nikon product to my worst enemy....Oh yeah, and they made the lens an oddball size so you have to buy overpriced Nikon filters for it....</review_text>
I loved this camera but I have had to send it back 3 times for the infamous "system error 2" design fault which plagues many of these.  The repair service is slow - the camera has been in repair 50% of the year I have had it</review_text>
The camera has really amazing features. But it also has an outrageously major focus weekness. I made a mistake of buying one</review_text>
I was down in Antarctica when I turned on the camera and it said "lens error". After a day of missing some of the best pictures of Emperor Penguins with my 8800, I twisted the lens and got it to work. The same thing happened to me in Bolivia, just after the warranty expired. I called Nikon and they insist there is no problem with the camera. Do a Google search of "lens error" and Nikon 8800 and you will find lots of unhappy people with the same experience. This is my third and last Nikon</review_text>
The camera (Canon S-80) barely fits in the case and there is no room for even an extra storage card, much less a second battery pack or the charger. I ended up using my old Tamrac case that has an extra zippered pouch for accessories. Total waste of $$$</review_text>
This case is good for protecting your camera from nicks and scratches caused by storing it in purses, briefcases or luggage.  But don't count on it to protect your camera from falls, dirt or dust.It looks good, the PowerShot logo gives an authentic look to it</review_text>
When it was new out of the box it worked for baseball about 50% of the time if I was within a few feet of the pitcher or catcher.  It seemed to become less effective each time I used it to the point that now I'm lucky to get a reading 10% of the time.  It still works for clocking cars but for baseball it is almost useless.</review_text>
If you're looking to capture "The Decisive Moment" with the Nikon Coolpix 8400, STOP---DO NOT BUY THIS CAMERA!!! For that matter, carefully check any digicam or other camera with which you want to capture "action," because what you think you see,  may not be what the camera has the ability to capture as an image.Let me briefly explain where I'm coming from: I made my living as a field photojournalist for 40 years. By the time I retired out of the business I had probably created something like a million color and b&w film images. I owned and used mostly Nikon equipment all those years (although I sure liked working with Leica rangefinder cameras and short focal length lenses), starting with the original Nikon F SLR (which I still have) and finishing up with the N90S and probably ten different lenses of varying focal lengths. I like Nikon equipment a lot.I decided to begin working with digital images last year. I was attracted to the Coolpix 8400 because the "spread" on the zoom lens was the 35mm camera equivalent of 24mm--85mm. When I worked with film I probably used my 24mm and 105mm Nikkors more than any others in my bag, so this little Coolpix beauty had just about what I was looking for in one package.Let me say that while the problems with the viewfinder and shutter lag make this camera absolutely useless for editorial photojournalism, it is, nevertheless, a marvel of human ingenuity. For many other uses---such as taking pictures of fire hydrants or cows standing in a pasture (put another way, things that don't move), it works wonderfully well.Seriously, I shot an assignment here in Tucson that was essentially architectual in nature. The images can only be described as superb (if I do say so myself). I worked only with the camera and a tripod on the shoot. Working inside I simply changed the light balance within the menu on the 8400 (which you can pretty much do on any digital camera these days), did not have to check the scene with a separate exposure meter, etc. Point being that with film I often carried a bunch of light balancing filters and sometimes a separate Gossen exposure meter and all sorts of lights to shoot an assignment. Even then, I'd sweat blood until I could get the processed film on a light table. Of course with digital, I (you) don't have to worry about any of that stuff. One can check the image immediately and know instantly if you're good to go.Alas, the shutter lag on this, and many other digital cameras made these days, is the "downcheck" which makes me unable to recommend the 8400. There is also the delay in the electronic viewfinder to deal with. The combination of shutter and viewfinder lag make it absolutely impossible to capture an image, the precise composition of which lasts only a split-second. I have taken many good pictures of people working, "action" shots and the like, but it was only by taking large numbers of images of any given activity and then retaining the one or two that said what I intended that I achieved my purpose. Essentially, my shooting eye (which is pretty damned good) had nothing to with it. It's like a soldier trying to kill an enemy with a machine-gun---if he fires enough rounds, one of them is going to hit the other guy. Marksmanship has nothing to do with it.  Same-same shooting with electronic viewfinders and shutter lag. If you shoot enough images, statistically you're probably going to get a good one. But it's not a very good way to do things.So if you're looking to capture what Henri Cartier-Bresson (I'm not sure I've spelled his name correctly) so artfully described as "The Decisive Moment," look at a digital single-lens reflexes, or wait for improvements in digicams.</review_text>
Some digital cameras have no viewfinder at all, but the Nikon 8400 has a "electronic viewfinder" and the reviews have been good and the price is great, so I bought the camera.The electronic viewfinder turns out to be too dark to see the face of the person you are trying to photograph indoors with the flash, you cannot see any expressions, just the outline of the person's head, so you guess and shoot several times and then see the photos you just shot in the viewfinder.  Outdoors you cannot see enough detail in the viewfinder to know what you are including in your shot.The "display" LCD monitor is small and washes out in sunlight.The background of the flash shots is unacceptably dark.After 3 days of use and 90 shots I mailed it back to "Ritz on Amazon" this morning, Dec 5.  They require it back "within 10 days of receipt of purchase", their "date of order" was Nov 29 and it arrived at my house on Dec 3.  It's a good thing I already had a compact flash card to use, there is not one in the box and if I had waited for the one I ordered to arrive, well, it's not here yet.  It cost me $11.65 to return it, insured, with 2 day delivery and a "delivery confirmation receipt".The camera had some strengths as well as it's weaknesses, but with only a short time to try it out before the "10 days" ran out and serious difficulty trying to see what I was shooting I gave up on it</review_text>
It fits in the S1, but it doesn't always charge -- the contacts arent the same size as the OEM version.  When it doesn't charge I just re-insert the batter and it works, but its sort of a bummer</review_text>
I am not satisfied by this product. The calrity is not good. Also this is the most battery consuming device I have ever seen</review_text>
I was very happy with the previous model DSC-N1, which took very nice pictures just with pointing and shooting. But this one, while I only had chance to use it indoors and outdoor in raining weather, it really disappointed me. The pictures are always blured due to too much exposure, I used auto flash, for which the camera should takes nice pictures as it  is a point and shoot camera and it is 10.1MP!I'm going to try more when the weather gets better but most possible I will return it, I just can't accept the quality of the indoor pictures it takes. I doubt I was unlucky and got a bad one, I can't believe a 10.1MP sony camera takes so poor pictures. And after reading the previous review about the terrible Sony custmer servce, I decide I will avoid Sony customer service, and the camera will just be returned.Note: Found the review by Cecelia Choy "cece" on March 13, 2007 mentioned the same problem I had. I didn't have this problem with my previous model DSC-N1.April 17, 2006: I bought a new one and it takes nice pictures now! Suggestion for those having the same problem I had before -- exchange for another one!!</review_text>
I ordered two of the items above in error.  I did not think the first order was submitted properly so therefore a second one was ordered and came from Antonline.  I have been trying since Dec. 19 to return the wide angle lens and adapter to them.  I am 71 years old and not computer savvy.  I just wish I could get return labels and my account credited.  They are still in the original packing as received and never been opened.  Thank you for being interested. I was informed by them that my time had expired.  I do not believe this to be true, or does your opening web page not apply to them.</review_text>
When mated to a Sony wide-angle lens, the on-camera flash becomes partially blocked causing a dark area in the photo. A major flaw in my opinion.Sony makes no mention of this on the packaging</review_text>
I had high hopes for this battery for my Nikon camera.  It promised more MAH than the OEM battery that came with the camera.  Unfortunately, it must be leaking electrons all over the place, since a charge in this model does not compare to the original.  I would guess that the charge lasts half the life of the original Nikon battery.  The price was cheap and you get what you pay for.  If you are going to purchase this one, get two since you'll need to keep one charging while using the other.  Cheers</review_text>
If you want a quality product, this ain't it.  The dreaded "Remove the Cassette" error is true and in full force.  Don't take my word for it, search the net and find the hundreds, upon thousands of unhappy consumers who purchased this piece of junk and discovered it the hard way.  I highly suggest the Panasonic AG-DVX100.  It costs a bit more, but well worth it.Before reading other reviews, make sure that they are comparing the GL-2 to another cam, like Tony L. Shores.  He compares the Canon GL-Piece-of-junk-2 to the Sony HDR-FX1.  Sure, the Sony is much better, but it is also a High-Definition cam.  If you want HD, check out the Panasonic AG-HVX200.Do your research, read the reviews</review_text>
I bought this over the Sony and I regret it.  I get a tape eject error every time I try to rewind.  I can only rewind at 10 second intervals before I get an error message to eject the tape and do the same thing over again.  That's a long time to rewind a 60 minute tape.  Many Canon users are having this problem and the only way they address the problem which is clearly a mechanical problem is to charge a ridiculous price to send it off to be repaired.  Canon needs to own up to this problem and have a recall on the item.  I will never buy Canon again after they have turned a blind eye to a serious problem</review_text>
My primary camera is a Sony HDR-FX1.I bought the GL-2 as a second unit for multiple camera angles at sporting events.The GL-2 is a respectable camera but in my opinion the video image doesn't even come close to the Sony.The price and rebate offer was the greatest incentive in my purchase of this camera.However, beware of the rebate offer.I sent all the documents in strict compliance with the terms of the rebate only to have it rejected.The rebate facilitator claimed I did not include the UPC code.If I had it to do over, I would dig deeper into my wallet and buy a second Sony</review_text>
I bought this item as a gift, and it ended up becoming mine. I have to say, I am greatly dissatisfied. Here are some main issues I am having with the camera:1. It is very poorly designed. The look and the feel of the camera are not elegant. Buttons are really ugly, and operating the camera is awkward, and for some functions requires both hands to   operate..2. The camera has been having issues with turning on and off occasionally.3. The worst, by far, is the picture quality. Colors are just plain terrible. Automatic settings are a disaster of photography. I have used a Canon (2MP) before getting this one (5MP). The Canon was far superior in quality, colors, lighting.. I don't need large files of trash, I am perfectly fine with smaller files with great pictures.As a result, I am strongly recommending getting a different camera. I have had great experiences with Canon; and seems like Sony and Nikon are doind a good job too. But HP must stop making cameras, and indeed many other devices.</review_text>
This camera took some great pictures, and I enjoyed it's size and functionality for several months.  I was sitting in a lawn chair at a barbecue last weekend when I was passing it to a friend who was also seated.  The camera fell about 2 feet onto soft grass.  THE END.  The lens assembly is shot, according to my local camera store, not economical to fix.  This was about the softest fall a camera could take, and not work, it was like landing on a pillow.  I will not buy HP cameras again</review_text>
I loved the camera, absolutely loved it.  I was using it one night and it died.  I went home and put in on the charger and nothing happened.  The light on the charger didn't flash or the camera didn't even go in after dying.  The second time I used it, I just got back from vacation and put it on the charger.  I was able to turn it on to look at the pictures.  As I was looking at the pictures, it just shut off.  I was unable to find a way to turn it back on or even shut the nose.  I would not recommend it for this reason unless the charger you get is different than mine.</review_text>
I purchased a Canon camera carrying case that came with an extra battery and UV filtering lense. The case came within a few days and is perfect for what I needed. Smooth fast transaction. Five star</review_text>
I had an older Canon camcorder that I was very happy with, so I decided to get this new one. I ended up shipping it back because the tape noise was so loud. I even tried the same model at Best Buy to make sure it wasn't just a defective camera. But compared to a similar Sony model, the Canon was noticeably louder while operating. Way to loud for shooting anything resembling quiet conditions</review_text>
I have been searching on line and elsewhere for a good camcorder as 1) a replacement for my JVC GR-D70U, which died, and 2) to go online with a video blog.  After much study and evaluation, I chose the Canon ZR800 based on a salesman's recommendation, frustration as to the number of choices which are available, and the presence of an external microphone jack (which was one of my "must-have" options).  After returning home, I read the review by Miamian "New Reviewer", and felt trepidation.  After charging the battery, I tried the camera.  Lo and behold, Miamian is right.  There is an obvious noise when recording, which was not present in my JVC.  Hoping against hope, I played the tape back, and, just as I feared, the tape had a pronounced hiss.  This is not just tape hiss, but a much more pronounced noise, which transfers to the TV when watching.  It rendered the camcorder totally unacceptable. I took the camcorder back, and, like Miamian, ordered the Sony DCH-HC38.  (I know, it doesn't have an external microphone jack, but after all this confusion, I give up!! Why don't they make more cameras with them??)The plus signs of this camera are that its menu is much more intuitively laid out, and selection of the desired item does not even require looking at the instruction book.  The joystick selector is so easy to use, to select play, rewind, fast forward, stop, pause in the playback mode,  and is also is used to select various menu items in other modes.  The wide screen viewfinder (LCD) is so nice to use, and easy to see, all others (in 4:3) become passe'.I didn't have any chance to evaluate other aspects of the camera, due to the unacceptable noise which demanded rejection of the unit.  The picture looked OK; it did not greatly impress me, however, and the automatic focus appeared to be slow and very noticeable in playback.In essence, caveat emptor; especially if you're hard of hearing.  Others watching and listening to the tape will not be</review_text>
I was attracted to the Cannon ZR800 due to the very small size and very low cost.  However, you get what you pay for, although you get much more in other brands for just a little increase in cost.  I've already returned my Cannon ZR800 and replaced it with the Sony DCR-HC38.  The smallest problem with the Canon is the continued motor noise, which you should be aware of it if you have read any review for any of the ZR800 predecessors.  The problem is that the motor is very loud, and you will hear a very annoying whirr if you are indoors.  This could be forgivable given the low cost, but the problem with the zoom noise is not.  When you zoom in and out, a very noticable clicking noise occurs when you let go of the zoom switch.  It is a loud click and when you play back your video this click is amplified on your video.  It is impossible to watch a video and not notice this click.  It is annoying, unusual and a big flaw with these new ZR Cannon camcorders.  I called technical support, the person took a ZR800 and tried it out and then acknowledged that a problem does exist (she seemed stunned that this noise was occuring).  Bottom line, this camcorder is absolutely unusable due to this clicking noise and would not be worth using even if it were free.  Do not but it.BTW, I love the Sony DCH-HC38 which is a bit more expensive and, like the ZR800, just recently came onto the market.</review_text>
I found the same problem that other users of this product experienced.  Particularly the issue of the shutter release being at the bottom of the camera when composing a portrait oriented shot.  I found a stroboframe flash bracket that rotates the camera counter clockwise within the flash bracket instead of flipping the flash.  This leaves the shutter release at the top of the camera and also alleviated the other problem of speed light hot shoe breakage from repeated "flipping" of the flash that some other users have reported.  The item is manufactured by Stroboframe and can be found at an ebay store called "Gadget Infinity" under the listing title of "Flash Bracket with 90 degrees Camera Rotate feature".  Buy it now price is $29.99.  I just bought one and it arrived yesterday and I could not be happier.  Pass the word of this ingenious new product that will solve the issues that have plagued photographers for the past several years</review_text>
This is the Worst camera I've ever owned. I'm not exaggerating. I'm so upset for wasting money on it. The only pictures that turn out, are outside in bright daylight. It takes horrible pictures in low light, there's a high level of noise in the photos. The video mode moves in and out on its own, ruining the video. I sometimes get colored lines down the right side of the videos. My friend's $88 dollar digital camera takes way better pictures than this thing. It just plain sucks.</review_text>
I bought a Sony ICD-MX20 Digital Voice Recorder a week ago.  I was surprised that Sony does not provide downloads of the associated software named "Digital Voice Editor".  Sony Customer Service staff told me that if you lost the CD that came with the box, you had to buy a new one.  Only patches of the software are available to download.The Customer Service personnel told me that it was corporate policy despite the fact that the software is bound to the digital device.This immoral policy violating the norm of digital appliance industries and should not be encouraged.  Sony is demoting its brand name by offering poor post-sales services.  Think twice before making your buying decision.</review_text>
This is another example of how Sony is alienating its customer base. Not only will it not work with standard SD memory like everyone else, it does not include a docking station.  You have to shell out more money for that option.  I dont think so</review_text>
The reviews are worthless unless the writer mentions the model of device they are using the batteries for. Fifty percent of the reviews here don't mention what they were using the batteries for. Do this service justice and mention the type and model equipment for which the battereis are utilized</review_text>
Pros: Great resolution. Nice packaging. Excellent door stop.Cons: Stopped working after 3 weeks. Horrible overall quality. No customer support what so ever since I didn't have a receipt (ebay purchase).Tried contacting the ebay seller for receipt, never got a response now I'm stuck with a 360 dollar dead weight.  Tried contacting pacificdigital they offered a none warranty repair for $199.  Becareful what you purchase on ebay specially pacificdigital products.</review_text>
I can't say for sure that my experience was typical, but I can say that it was horrible.The short version is:  I had to return it once for a screen failure, then I had to return the replacement for a screen failure (and a refund).In between the returns, I spent a significant amount of time on the phone with customer support.  The manual was inadequate, especially for the wireless stuff.  I also had problems with Windows (Network Bridging, I think) that further complicated things.For the brief time the two units worked, I was pleased.  The picture quality was good, and once running, I had no problems with the software.I take a lot of digital photos.  This would have been the perfect compliment.I gave the Memory Frame two stars (instead of one) because, in between failures and configuration problems, I was pleased with the quality of the display.Too bad I couldn't say the same about the quality control.</review_text>
The E550 is a good camera and this lens does do a good job of zooming in on the subject but due to the way the camera and lens are designed, you must have the camera's zoom fully extended in order to use this tele lens.  So this means if the subject is moving around a lot, such as my daughter playing soccer, you will miss the shots where the action has moved to close to you because you can't zoom out.  As long as the action remains at some distance to you than this zoom lens is useful.   I unfortunately have too many ruined shots because the action moved too close and their heads get cut off, etc.Another negative is that the viewfinder doesn't show the zoomed in image, you must use the lcd screen to frame a shot, which can be difficult in bright sunlight</review_text>
I haven't got this item because it is too expensive for what it gives. I have a Fujifilm E550 camera which cost is USD 250.00 by this date. This lens cost is USD 95.00 and it need a special adapter ring that cost extra USD 20.00. That means you will pay USD 365.00 for a 8x zoom camera. For that price or less you can get a +10x SLR like camera like the Fujifilm S5100 or S5200.</review_text>
I loved this camera when I got it.But after three months the lens would not close.  It makes grinding noises,the canon logo pops up on the screen then shuts off again.I am very disappointed in this camera</review_text>
The EN-EL3a is a works fine and with no problems.  HOWEVER, AMAZON IS MISLEADING ITS CUSTOMERS BY PUTTING A LOWER PRICE FROM A PARTNER COMPANY AS THE PRIMARY PRICE OF THE ITEM.  Amazon should market the item at it's price and show the partner price as an option unless the item can only be obtained from the partner.  The 2 stars is not for the item but for amazon's misleading advertisment</review_text>
Just turned out ot be more complicated to set up than I wanted. Never used. Returned it</review_text>
Well. I was convinced the FX07 was a bad product after using it for 6 months. Like a lot of other reviews have pointed out, the noise level in low-light condition is annoying, and give you a watercolor-like effect. Some pictures I took during a visit to Monterey Bay Aquarium turned out completely dark (to prevent this beforehand, I even took photos of the same objects using several different settings, only to get the results of bad, worse, and worst). The picture quality is nowhere close to my old old old Sony cybershot T7. I was totally disappointed. If not for my T7 was broken, I wouldn't even wanna use this camera. Even re-sell it to other people, I would feel it's like a crime.After revisiting this webpage and read more user reviews, I realized I must have got the defective item from Amazon. Well. What can I say? It's been 6 months.Bottom line: Just be careful when you received this item. Do some test shots. If anything looks suspicious, ask for a replacement. After all, all the high praise here can't be all wrong</review_text>
It looks cool and it's easy to carry, but that is about it.  Camera is slow and pictures are often blurry.  Sorry I wasted my money on this one.  Get one of the new ones with VR so you don't have that issue.</review_text>
the nikon camera s3 is a good camera but the camera takes to long to take a picture i dont like it because when i am at a party i want to take a fast picture. it sucks and i wish i never bought it dont make the same error i did and waist my money on the piece of junk.</review_text>
I used to have an Canon Elura 70, which was an excellent camcorder but the firewire transfer didn't work so I decided to replace it with the Elura 100 only to find that Canon had discontinued the Elura line. I really wanted an Elura for the improved video quality over the low-end zr models. So as a compromise I purchased the ZR 850 which has a 1MP CCD, not a good as the Elura (1.3MP) but better than the other ZR's (.640MP). The video quality wasn't bad but the motor noise was so loud I couldn't believe it. I returned the first one but the replacement was just as bad. This isn't a minor hum in the background I'm talking about, its a full-on whine! I also found the ZR camera to be difficult to handle with my small-ish hands and the video stabilisation was a bit disappointing. Luckily I could return both cameras without incurring a restocking fee and found a reconditioned Elura 100 that is much more satisfactory. Its a mystery to me how Canon can produce two markedly different cameras (quality wise) in the same price range and opt to phase out the better one</review_text>
I really like the size and weight of the camera.  It is very easy to use and the picture quality is pretty good.  I had to return the cam because the motor noise is unacceptable.  I recorded some scenes while skiing and the whiny noise is very noticeable, even outdoors.  All the other reviewers claiming the cam records motor noise are dead on.  I will spend a bit more money and get the Sony HCR-DC96 instead</review_text>
The camera is decent. The fact that it doesn't come with the correct cable nor software to transfer video to a computer is unacceptable.  What do they expect 90% of consumers are going to do with it</review_text>
Watch out they will not ship it for 40 days after you buy i</review_text>
I just bought this camera and took it to one of my kid's indoor soccer games. The light was low, but not that low.  You should be able to take a picture without the flash. When I took the flash off, the picture looked fine on the preview, but came out completely black.  Yet the camera was able to take perfectly fine video at the same light level!  What a disappointment.  I am going to try to return it</review_text>
My hunting buddy purchased a Nikon 800. My intent was to put him in the shade. That Nikon kicks the crap out of my Bushnell Yardage Pro 1000. Tried new batteries, tried bluffing, even tried to lie but nothing helped this product past 500/600 yards.My opinion is this product is not worth the postage.Anyone with similar opinion or someone that has had a good experience with this product. [...</review_text>
I purchase this instrument twice.  The first time there were black specks in the lense, so it was returned.  The second time was worst, i.e. same black specs but the thing didn't work at all.  I have also checked this manufacturer's other models out and most come with the disturbing black specks in the lense.  This isn't a quality optical product</review_text>
HP is selling this bag for $30 bucks, so when I found it here for $10 less I couldn't let this "Deal" pass me by... however when I received the bag, I wished I had... the color is less vibrant, it's cheap, poor quality, plus HP isn't embroidered on the bag... walk away from this bag and get the blue and black HP bag instead, it costs a little bit more but it's well worth it!!</review_text>
I purchased this camera case for my granddaughter for Christmas to go with the camera her parents had bought for her.  This is the first time I have ever been DISAPPOINTED with a product I purchased from Amazon.  It was, in my opinion, not worth the price I paid!  The picture looked much larger that it actually was.  I wil continue to purchase through Amazon but I will be much more careful and definitely return it if I'm not satisfied.  In this case I did not have time to find another camera case.Thanks for giving me the opportunity of expressing my opinion.Linda Sutto</review_text>
so i saw that this product got 5 stars, so i ordered it......when i got it, its like "um... is THAT it???" it's really cute, and really well made, but it has no where to hold my usb cord or memory cards...also, there is no HP embroidered in the front like the picture has it, also, the strap that I got is really cracked and does not look good at all...other than that, it's cute, but not the best out there.</review_text>
I had this camera for 2 months. It was kept in a case and was very well taken care of. I would not even allow my husband to touch it. I was taking pictures and then one suddenly came out as a white screen. I took another and the same thing. I asked my husband what he thought was wrong. We took out our memory card and tried internal. Same thing again. He said maybe it was the LCD screen. We loaded the pictures in the computer and it was even worse. I contacted Kodak several times. They don't care about their customers. I have talked to several others in similar situations with similar results. We will try to get their attention with a lawsuit. If interested contact me [...</review_text>
Hi,I have lost the CD rom to download the movie from the camera.Sony does not offer it for free on its website. You have to pay $70 dollars to get it again.That clearly disappoints me.</review_text>
This camera is a decent enough camera, compact, easy to use and takes good quality video and still pictures and the battery life is excellent.  The battery that comes with it is good for a couple of hours continuous recording and the tapes only last for one hour.  I acquired a second battery that is good for 240+ minutes so I never worry about running out of juice.  I have only two complaints really, one minor and one major.The minor complaint is the fiddly little controls on the touch screen LCD viewfinder. I find I need to use my reading glasses to see what I'm doing.The major complaint is transfering video to my computer via the iLink cable (not supplied).  I have never persuaded it to work.  By browsing various camera fora on the web I am finding a complaint identical to mine with this model in particular as well as other Sony models.  The computer will recognize the camera in USB mode (for capturing still pictures from the memory stick) but does not see it at all when plugged in via iLink (firewire/IEEE 1394).  All indications are that my firewire port and cable are perfectly OK.  Sony tech support, both web chat based and phone, have no clue and because I am out of warranty it will cost a flat $210 to send it in and have them take a look at it.If all you want to do is connect the camera to your TV to playback the video you take, it's a good camera.  If video capture an editing is what you have in mind, buyer beware. Because of this, I can only give the product 2 stars, other wise it would be a 5.Update:  I installed a new Firewire PCI card on my computer and using a new cable tried the video capture again.  I also tried the camera on my neighbor's Mac (on the theory that if a Mac won't recognize it you really know you have a problem).  The computer still won't recognize the camera.  This camera has been used very little and definitely not abused.  It was probably defective right out of the box and it appears to be a common problem.  If you buy this, make sure you test all of its capabilities as soon as you get it.  Don't wait like I did because I'm out of warranty and it will cost me to get the problem fixed</review_text>
I returned this camera after trying very hard to like.  Picture quality (movie or still) is totally unacceptable.  I did not even get one good still picture.  Forget about indoors video or still.  The falsh and video light are useless.  The overall quality of the camera is low.</review_text>
Bought the camera on a recommendation, and also what looked like good specs on the web. Owned it for less than two weeks when the LCD screen cracked (below the surface of the protective cover). Turns out this is a very common problem with these cameras. Panasonic will not warranty fix this! If you do get one, or own one, be very careful not to use the left nav button. If you do, be very careful on the pressure you apply. This is the camera's glass jaw, and you might end up "bricking" a brand new camera. I am replacing mine with a Canon</review_text>
The Panasonic is very compact, very stylish SEXY as my wife called it, but the photos are very disappointing: they are way to noisy! Even if set on the lowest ASA setting at 80ASA it is just barely acceptable and they do get progressively worse anything above 100ASA.The colours are good, and it does take very good videos, but still photos are just plain bad when compared to other cameras in Photoshop CS2. Of course it is easy to understand why: the native resolution of the images. If one investigates such things, will notice that the Panasonic is only 72 dpi, same as Sony's, Canon improves this to 180, and Nikon is at 300 dpi. It is not just about megapixels folks, but how those megapixels are recorded and at what resolution. Obviously a camera with 72 dpi will have more noise than one at 180 or 300 dpi.So before you buy any digital camera or thinking about upgrading to a newer model, do yourself a favour. Try 4 or 5 cameras in the same megapixel range at a good camera store by taking photos of the same subject in the same light condition. Set the camera for the lowest ASA and the highest picture quality in JPG format, take the photos, pop the SD card  into the computer, compare the images in Photoshop. Enlarge to full pixel size (100%), and and look at the meta data at the same time and you will see for yourself. That is what I did, since I was not very happy with the images my Panasonic produced! I had this camera for 11 months and 20 days exactly, and today I traded it in on a Nikon P5000 after evaluating over a dozen models including the Leica D-lux3 10MP camera, and driving the sales persons crazy with all the testing and spending 4 hours at the store, but it was very educational for them too</review_text>
I spend hours pouring over reviews trying to decide which ultracompact was the best deal and the best overall camera.  In the end, it came down to Panasonic's FX01 and Cannon's SD600.  I read the warnings from other reviewers that the Panasonic's images weren't top quality, but I chose to ignore those reviewers because on paper the FX01 looks like it would out perform the SD600.  I was wrong.After using the FX01 for a few days I knew what those other reviewers were talking about - grainy photo after grainy photo.  I really really wanted this camera to be great, but it just wasn't.  Actually, my old 3mp camera took better shots then the 6mp FX01!  Very disappointing.  I ended up returning this camera to Amazon (very easy-great service) because of the poor image quality.  I mean, wanting good photographs is why you take photos, right?  I know someone with the SD600 and he's very happy with the quality.  Judging by the customer images on the SD600's page on amazon, I think I should've gone with Cannon</review_text>
I just opened my dock kit and began to assemble and the included battery is too big for the C743 camera.  The battery must be for one of the older cameras that is bigger.  I think it's odd, as the camera dock series 3 is the correct camera dock.  I'm disappointed with my purchase and wasted the money that went toward the battery.  I don't know whether the dock works okay, because I didn't get that far.  This is my second easyshare camera and dock and I was very happy with the first one.  Now I have to buy another battery</review_text>
Straight out of the box disappointment with the extremely poor quality.  Plug into wall and does not work.  After trying numerous different outlets/wiggles of the cord, it finally powered on.  After putting in a card, the pics were ok, passable.  The mp3 popped and moaned and popped some more, and I was only playing very quiet jazz.  This is not worth the money even though it is cheap.  Pay a little more and get one that is of better quality</review_text>
I bought this frame to display pictures of my newborn daughter on my desk at work.  I didn't really have high expectations for it, because it was so inexpensive.  As soon as it was turned on I had the following problems:1) Five seconds after I turn it on, it always says "USB Connected!"-- and I don't have a USB cable inserted into it!  This also freezes the device.  I found a way around this by selecting the memory card to read from within this initial 5 seconds or turning the frame on without any memory cards inserted.2) I cannot copy files over to it as described in pages 33-35 of the manual.  My computer does recognize the USB device, but when I try to copy files over to the frame, I get a "path is not found" error.3) I thought I could live with the above 2 problems if it could JUST SHOW MY PICTURES.  So I used a card reader to load .JPG files onto a CF card at 400x300 resolution. When, I plugged the card into the frame, these files show up as "Invalid" when I try to view them.Emailed Coby with the 3 bullet points above, got a response 30 hours later saying:"Coby Tech Support to me5:25 am (3 hours ago)Hello,We have received your inquiry. It appears that your unit is defective. Return the unit to the retailer for an exchange."What an inconvenience and disappointment.  I will be buying a different product</review_text>
I bought this frame as a gift for my parents and ended up returning it.  The price was right but the quality was poor and there were 2 spots on the screen that looked like they were already burned out (displaying blue and green pixels).  I did enjoy the fact that it hooks right up to the computer with a USB port but that is about all.  Overall don't waste your time and money</review_text>
I've just returned this unit. It doesn't play videos as advertised.  I was able to get it to properly play .avi files at 320 x 240 resolution...see other review below. But 320x240 gives a postage stamp size picture. At 640 x 480 the playback was full size but jerky and broken....more later.I have now had 3 different brands of 8" photo frames in my possession: a Phillips, a Pandigital, and this Coby.I have developed the following list of features in my "ideal" photo frame. First, video playback: I've been taking a lot of video clips with my digital still camera...they come out well and the convenience of not having to lug my camcorder along, and the ability to quickly transfer clip files within/between chips and my computer is attractive. I would like a frame which will play the format my camera is taking (.mov, more later) I'd also like the frame to play a multi-media show...that is, to play movie clips in show presentations, intermixed with .jpg photo files.Second feature is to play .wma music files, in addition to MP3. This is because I have a non-Ipod personal music player. All my music is in .wma format because it is roughly half the file size of MP3.Third, I would like a timer on my frame...set it to come on in the morning, off at night, for example.Fourth, I'd like an audio or speaker out feature. None of these frames has home theater-like sound, and I have an extra pair of computer speakers I'd probably hook up. Video out could come in handy too.Fifth, I'd like to be able to rotate stills from within the frame's software, manually or automatically. Yes, you can rotate them in the computer, but the frame may or may not preserve the rotation. (This may depend on which photo edit program you are using.)Sixth, I'd like a folder hierarchy file management system in the frame's software. Especially with the huge chips now available, I see an advantage to push a couple of buttons and change the picture set (folder), rather than switching out chips.Here is where the 3 units I've had stack up, followed by my next (fourth) unit.I am keeping the Pandigital....which Costco has for $140. It plays .mov video files, but not within a slideshow. It has no speaker out jack and the sound is tinny. It requires MP3 music files. It permits picture rotation.  No folder management system. No clock/timer. No ability to play stills/video intermixed. I think the Coby and Phillips picture quality is brighter but the Pandigital is ok.The phillips didn't play video, and since it also had a software glitch when I returned it I decided to look elsewhere. (no remote and no music with the philips either.)The Coby won't play my videos, even after I used my converter program to try about 10 different MP4 and AVI variations. The Coby plays .wma music files, won't rotate stills, has no folder system, no clock/timer. It has a speaker out jack. It does not permit intermixing video and stills in one multimedia show. Picture quality is fully equal to Philips, generally the recognized standard. If all you want is photos, and never turn your camera sideways, this unit will be a good value.Another unit I'd like to get to play with would be the Image Moments model by Digitalfoci. I've exchanged emails with someone there who clearly knows what they are talking about and I believe this unit will intermix my photos and videos.</review_text>
Be careful ordering this item - make sure it's the right one for your camera.  While it says it's for the A95, it isn't.  While it doesn't say in the header that it's the LA-DC52C, it is, and the A95 camera requires the LA-DC52D.  I had to return the wrong one and reorder the right one.  I purchased the wrong one based on amazon's direction when purchasing accessories and don't want others to make the same mistake</review_text>
If you are looking to take high quality pictures, then look elsewhere. It is nice for taking quick snapshots with the family or what-have-you, but not much else. (Or for a beginner in photography or a child.) You have to hold very still if you don't want your pictures to come out blurry. Also, the flash makes images far too bright and if you don't use the flash it sometimes makes images come out far too dark.The only thing I like about this camera is it's size. It's great to just keep in your pocket or your bag...Anyway, I'm buying a better one soon</review_text>
We just bought this camera to replace our miniDV JVC-DVL500 that was bought in 2000.In short the picture taking ability is worthless and the quality is VERY grainy and dark. I applied the workaround listed above, but found that I had to set the frame rate to 1/15 in order to ge the brightness that I needed which caused a VERY jittery image.The quality of this camera is something that I would expect for $200, needless to say I am returning this camera today</review_text>
I returned this item.  I have not received notice that they did receive it back so I will have to wait and see if my credit card account is credited</review_text>
Just turned out ot be more complicated to set up than I wanted. Never used. Returned it</review_text>
use less than 3 times, the touch screen doesn't work.don't know why~</review_text>
After being an amature photographer via print film, I decided to try a digital camera - though I've been leary about printing quality.  I knew I couldn't afford a digital SLR, so I opted for a "snap shot" camera that I thought would have enough features to satisfy me.  However, after having and using this camera for a year now, I am so disappointed in the performace- the flash is just way too much, its a washout.  After being used to print and picture quality in my film SLR (Cannon, I might add), I was so severely annoyed with the quality of the pictures with this camera, I wish I would have just saved my money for a digital SLR.</review_text>
I purchased this case for my DSCS90. I hate it! It is only big enough to hold the camera and nothing else. There is no handle to the case, in fact the case only has zippers and you are suppose to use the strap from the camera itself for the handle. The zippers do not stay in place and the camera can easily fall out of the case so I don't recommend doing this. Look for a better case for your new camera.</review_text>
I bought this camera for my 4yr old granddaughter who can handle my digital camera quite well and found it to be a total waste.  The camera was much smaller than expected, trying to figure out what mode you're in is ridiculous and the display is quite difficult to see let alone interpret. Nothing is a simple "one step" procedure which you would expect for an item geared towards children.  I was so frustrated setting it up that I didn't bother giving it to her.  The software installed okay but was also far from "kid friendly".  I wish I would've found and read these user opinions before making the purchase. Ironically, the reviews I did see made it out to be better than the other cameras on the market for kids.  I believe you'd be better off purchasing a "regular" inexpensive digital camera for your potential "shutterbugs".</review_text>
my 5-year old daughter spent all day taking pictures of her and her baby sister in san francisco. we put new batteries in that morning. the next day i was wondering why the picture numbers had reset. when i tried to download the pictures to my computer, they were all gone, and the battery icon was flashing. based on what i've read here, it appears the batteries died after one day of use and the pictures were all erased. the picture quality is about the same as an old camera phone -- pretty poor, but good enough for my 5-year to enjoy. but what good is that when there aren't even any pictures the next day. i'm hoping the store will take it back</review_text>
At least if your going to decieve people about the LCD screen in the back, AT LEAST make the picture quality decent.  I mean this barely qualifies as a picture.  Some pictures are so bright it just looks like a splash of light.  This was sickening to me because my daughter was excited and it broke her heart when I had to return it because she expected to at least be able to see the pictures.Definatly stay away from this camera</review_text>
This camera is a waste of money and should be taken off the market.  After purchase we were never able to retreive pictures.  The computer would recognize the camera but stated that no pictures were available to download.  It not only is difficult to use but not even an adult could figure out how to take a picture and this product is made for a child.  The instructions are complicated and eventually you give up.  Even putting in the batteries is complicated and you need a screwdriver (the smallest one you can find) to achieve it.  Unfortunately, I have wasted my money but luckily you don't have to</review_text>
First, I want to defend this camera's lack of an LCD viewscreen--really unrealistic to expect something like that at this price point.What's wrong with this camera is that it tries to do so many different things that it doesn't do the one thing it NEEDS to do well--i.e., take a picture with the push of a button.This product would be much better if you took out all the settings (what kid needs different resolution settings on a cheap camera, for crying out loud?) and simply put in an auto-flash.  As it is, you must consult the manual, push the mode button until you find the correct symbol for the flash (which is NOT intuitive, so you'll need to carry the manual with you), press the shutter button to turn the flash on, wait for the little red light to come on, and THEN you can take a picture.  Then you shut it off or it goes off by itself after a very short period of inactivity, and the next time you want to take a picture you have to do it ALL OVER AGAIN!Oh, and did I mention that it won't take a picture if there isn't enough light (there wasn't even in the brightest room in my house), so you MUST use the flash?Clearly, the makers of this product did not test it on real children.  Heck, MY digital camera is easier to use than this!  We never even got to see the picture quality--after trying to get it to even take a picture, I knew this was going back to the store ASAP</review_text>
This was a waste of money.  My 5 year old loves taking photos.  She uses my digital camera  sometimes.    I  thought this would be a great gift for  her.  She could  see the photos on the back of the camera like  mom's.  This was not the case.   The LCD does not  project the images  and it is so small  you  can not read what mode you are in. If the batteries run  out, it erases the  photos. I think they should have made it and the directions kid friendly.  My daughter  was frustrated  quickly and  it has laid  in  the  drawer  for 3  months.If your child  likes to take  photos, I would invest in something  else</review_text>
Overall, I was entirely disappointed with this camaera.  The packaging and description were deceiving.  There was no view finding screen, only a teeny, tiny window as in a regular camera.  This was a gift for a child who would have had just as much fun with a throw away camera.  I bought it because I wanted to give her a digital that had a large view finding screen.  The construction would not hold up to a single drop on the ground.  I would not recommend this to ANYONE</review_text>
I found it on sale- luckily because it did not work. Cute as the dickens and came with a great strap and the art program was fun for the kids- but no go on the camera. Never able to get it to power up- yes fresh batteries too. We were very disappointed :</review_text>
I bought this bag looking at the display on amazon. But compare to price I paid this bag is not atall good. Size is small, extra pockets are useless, where you cant keep much. Camera pocket is also not convenient.Only plus point is quality of material used.</review_text>
This cable did not fit my camera as stated.  Because of the cost factor, I chose not to return it.  The shipping was more than the cable was worth</review_text>
careful, this cable may work "for most digital cameras," but it does not work with canon digital camera</review_text>
I bought this item for $40 online and then found out my Canon Camera didnt need a Cannon brand charger and I could have bought one for $10 instead. In total I spent for this charger which included the shipping and handling. Not worth it. Go to another store and by one for $10</review_text>
Excelent product.I get about 15 times the life of ordinary batteries. I would reccomend to anybody who uses their camera a lo</review_text>
I own many Sony products, including a Sony Cybershot DSC-F717, which I love. However, I am very disappointed by this camera, the Sony Cybershot DSC-T5.I bought the T5 for my mother and father as a present. It is small, lightweight, portable; easy to use; and stylish. It does take nice photos in brightly lit environments, especially outside.However, after several months of use, a few problems have become consistently evident:(1) There is HORRIBLE red-eye (and white-eye) artifact in MANY pictures. The so-called "red-eye reduction" setting does nothing.(2) Dim-light photography is very grainy, with lots of noise. Night-time photography is impossible.These problems are not unique to our camera... You will find many corroborating reviews above.Overall, I am VERY disappointed in this camera, and wish I could exchange it for something else.Do not buy this camera. Other reviewers suggest the T7 or T9 take much better pictures (and they are still small pocket-size cameras).</review_text>
I ORDERED THIS ITEM ABOUT A MONTH AGO...I GOT THE PACKAGE IN ABOUT 2 WEEKS AND WAS SO EXCITED TO OPEN IT I WAS LIKE A 10 YEAR OLD WHO JUST GOT THEIR FIRST BIKE!...I OPENED THE PACKAGE TO ONLY FIND A THE CHARGER FOR THE CAMERA...YES...ONLY THE CHARGER...NO CAMERA TO BE FOUND IN THE PACKAGE!!!!!...I WAS SO PISSED I CALLED AMAZON AND ASKED THEM WHERE THE HELL IS MY CAMERA...AND THIS IS WHAT THEY SAID "OH IM SORRY...WE PROBABLY FORGOT TO PUT IT INTO THE PACKAGE" ...WHAT KIND OF @#$%@#$@#$% IS THAT...SO I ASKED THE GUY TO SHIP ME A CAMERA...AND TO MY LUCK THEIR WERE NO MORE IN STOCK...SO I TOLD THE GUY TO FORGET IT AND FOR HIM TO SEND ME A RETURN SLIP SO THAT I CAN GET MY FULL $220 DOLLARS BACK BECAUSE OF YOUR HORRIBLE/TERRIBLE/RIDICULOUS SERVICE. IT IS NOW FEB AND STILL NO MONEY BACK...I KEEP CALLING THEM AND THEY SAY THE RETURNED PACKAGE IS STILL IN TRANSIT....IVE NEVER HEARD OF A PACKAGE TAKING OVER A MONTH TO GET TO ITS DESTINATION...BUT I COULD BE WRONG RIGHT? I WOULDNT BE SURPRISED IF I NEVER SEE MY 200 DOLLARS AGAIN...IF I WANTED TO WASTE 200 DOLLARS LIKE THAT I COULD HAVE FLUSHED THEM DOWN THE TOILET....WHAT A RIP OFF!!!!!...IT WAS AN AMAZON VENDOR AS WELL...@#$%@#%$@#q^@#$^@#$%#$$%^@...NEVER AGAIN!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
My hunting buddy purchased a Nikon 800. My intent was to put him in the shade. That Nikon kicks the crap out of my Bushnell Yardage Pro 1000. Tried new batteries, tried bluffing, even tried to lie but nothing helped this product past 500/600 yards.My opinion is this product is not worth the postage.Anyone with similar opinion or someone that has had a good experience with this product. [...</review_text>
I purchase this instrument twice.  The first time there were black specks in the lense, so it was returned.  The second time was worst, i.e. same black specs but the thing didn't work at all.  I have also checked this manufacturer's other models out and most come with the disturbing black specks in the lense.  This isn't a quality optical product</review_text>
This microphone is listed as a compatible accessory for the Sony HDR-HC7 video camera on most websites, including SonyStyle.  While the microphone may be of good quality (I didn't have an opportunity to thoroughly test it), it is only marginally compatible and a very poor choice for the HDR-HC7.  The microphone does plug into the MIC jack on the camera and appears to work, but the shoe does not fit the hot shoe bracket on the camera.  (Note that there is no direct way to tell if it is actually working without playing the tape back, at which point it's probably too late to make a correction.)  After nearly an hour of very irritating chat room discussion and, finally, direct conversation with a Sony Technician, I learned that there is a "jury-rigged" bracket that will allow you to attach the microphone near the camera on a tripod.  Otherwise, there is no way to fix it to the camera.  The Sony technician finally admitted that it was " curious" that Sony lists this as a compatible microphone.  If you have a Sony HDR-HC7, CHOOSE A DIFFERENT MICROPHONE!</review_text>
I ordered this mic after having to return the ECMHS1 (because it was, in reality, totally non-directional).  Well, this one actually IS directional, but it is such a pain to use I wish I never bought it.1st of all, you should know this mic does not work with the "smart shoe" available on most Sony camcorders - this means it will not receive any power from or transfer sound data to the camcorder through the shoe.  Therefore it is battery powered.  This may seem like a minor problem, but it means you need to remember to turn it on and off each time you video, otherwise you will have either a soundless video or a dead battery.  Believe me, at some point you WILL forget this.Not being smart shoe compatible also means you have to plug the mic into a jack on the camcorder - this can be a real hassle if you have a small device and are trying to loop the cord around so it isn't in the way.  (In my case the jack is under a rather cheap plastic cover that threatens to break off with repeated use.)(As you might expect, I highly recommend you check whether a mic is smart shoe compatible.  Of course, that means the mic doesn't need a battery or audio plug - not that it will simply fit into the shoe.  It's a great feature.)Finally, while the engineers at Sony have done some amazing things over the years, they weren't able to do even a half-decent job designing the cap that covers this mic's battery.  This cap will fall off with even the slightest touch.  This can be INCREDIBLY annoying.  Mine fell off several times - fortunately I always managed to find it.  I finally put a piece of duct tape on to secure it (doesn't look great, but at least the color matches).Considering the high cost, this mic is a really bad investment.  While the non-directional mics in most camcorders are pretty pathetic, this is a VERY poor substitute.</review_text>
My hunting buddy purchased a Nikon 800. My intent was to put him in the shade. That Nikon kicks the crap out of my Bushnell Yardage Pro 1000. Tried new batteries, tried bluffing, even tried to lie but nothing helped this product past 500/600 yards.My opinion is this product is not worth the postage.Anyone with similar opinion or someone that has had a good experience with this product. [...</review_text>
I purchase this instrument twice.  The first time there were black specks in the lense, so it was returned.  The second time was worst, i.e. same black specs but the thing didn't work at all.  I have also checked this manufacturer's other models out and most come with the disturbing black specks in the lense.  This isn't a quality optical product</review_text>
I was so dissapointed with this camera! I purchased a Sony Cybershot 3 years ago and, it had been such a great camera, I automatically thought this newer model would be great. Almost every picture I took was either blurry or the light areas of the picture were blown out! As an experienced Cybershot user, I tried all settings to fix the problem, but no luck. Terrible for capturing a child's first steps, as the description says. Would not recommend</review_text>
My husband bought me this camera for my birthday in May 2006.  I loved this camera.  Well, it stopped working on Christmas Eve.  I used it that morning with no problems, put it on the charger to recharge for later that evening.  When I removed the camera that evening, the screen remained black.  It would not take any pictures.After talking with the customer service folks, I sent my camera in for repair.  It was under warranty, and I had not done anything to break the camera.  Well, they voided my warranty stating that it was "Impact Damage" and my repair bill was $111.00.  You have got to be kidding.  I called to question the voided warranty since I had not dropped the camera.  The technician I spoke to explained that "Impact Damage" could happen if the camera bumped up to something in your purse.  So I asked to speak to a manager.I am sorry, but if I am going to spend this much money on a camera, I expect a little better quality.  I have called and email the Kodak Company several times to have someone talk to me.  Nobody has bothered to return either my calls or emails.I would SERIOUSLY think twice before spending money on a camera that can break by no fault of your own only to have the warranty voided and billed an amount comparable to a brand new camera.  I have discovered that the quality of a product is only as good as the company that will stand behind it.</review_text>
Bought this camera to have better print pictures than what I get with the digital. I've tried using it in every mode AUTO, close-up, etc. but the autofocus never works so most of the pictures come out blurry!My older simpler camera took better pictures</review_text>
I measured 7 batteries out of the pack of 20 with La Crosse charger, which I also bought from Amazon.  The capacity ranged from 547 mAh to 2002 mAh, with the average being 886 mAh.  That's about a third of the stated capacity.  Before I took the measurements, I made sure the charger works properly by testing it with two different brands of AA NiMH batteries: La Crosse and Energizer.  Both scored very close to their stated capacity.  Therefore, the test is valid and SUNPAK's claim of 2650 mAh is grossly overstated.My advice: avoid SUNPAK like the Plague!</review_text>
Bought the camera on a recommendation, and also what looked like good specs on the web. Owned it for less than two weeks when the LCD screen cracked (below the surface of the protective cover). Turns out this is a very common problem with these cameras. Panasonic will not warranty fix this! If you do get one, or own one, be very careful not to use the left nav button. If you do, be very careful on the pressure you apply. This is the camera's glass jaw, and you might end up "bricking" a brand new camera. I am replacing mine with a Canon</review_text>
The Panasonic is very compact, very stylish SEXY as my wife called it, but the photos are very disappointing: they are way to noisy! Even if set on the lowest ASA setting at 80ASA it is just barely acceptable and they do get progressively worse anything above 100ASA.The colours are good, and it does take very good videos, but still photos are just plain bad when compared to other cameras in Photoshop CS2. Of course it is easy to understand why: the native resolution of the images. If one investigates such things, will notice that the Panasonic is only 72 dpi, same as Sony's, Canon improves this to 180, and Nikon is at 300 dpi. It is not just about megapixels folks, but how those megapixels are recorded and at what resolution. Obviously a camera with 72 dpi will have more noise than one at 180 or 300 dpi.So before you buy any digital camera or thinking about upgrading to a newer model, do yourself a favour. Try 4 or 5 cameras in the same megapixel range at a good camera store by taking photos of the same subject in the same light condition. Set the camera for the lowest ASA and the highest picture quality in JPG format, take the photos, pop the SD card  into the computer, compare the images in Photoshop. Enlarge to full pixel size (100%), and and look at the meta data at the same time and you will see for yourself. That is what I did, since I was not very happy with the images my Panasonic produced! I had this camera for 11 months and 20 days exactly, and today I traded it in on a Nikon P5000 after evaluating over a dozen models including the Leica D-lux3 10MP camera, and driving the sales persons crazy with all the testing and spending 4 hours at the store, but it was very educational for them too</review_text>
I spend hours pouring over reviews trying to decide which ultracompact was the best deal and the best overall camera.  In the end, it came down to Panasonic's FX01 and Cannon's SD600.  I read the warnings from other reviewers that the Panasonic's images weren't top quality, but I chose to ignore those reviewers because on paper the FX01 looks like it would out perform the SD600.  I was wrong.After using the FX01 for a few days I knew what those other reviewers were talking about - grainy photo after grainy photo.  I really really wanted this camera to be great, but it just wasn't.  Actually, my old 3mp camera took better shots then the 6mp FX01!  Very disappointing.  I ended up returning this camera to Amazon (very easy-great service) because of the poor image quality.  I mean, wanting good photographs is why you take photos, right?  I know someone with the SD600 and he's very happy with the quality.  Judging by the customer images on the SD600's page on amazon, I think I should've gone with Cannon</review_text>
I bought this camera after reading the reviews and wanted to get a camera that uses a different media type other than the SmartMedia (which only lasts for about a month). I would have to say that I am extremely disappointed, particularly with the grainy images and completely out of focus edges. Even with all the settings on the highest possible quality on the PowerShot SD1000, my old Olympus Camedia C-2020 takes much better photos.It's incredible how blurry the edges are and surprised why no one has mentioned it being so obvious, especially the other reviewer being a pro photographer. So blurry that I had to use Photoshop to crop out the left and right sides. The right side was worse than the left making 1/8th of the entire image unrecognizable.Maybe I simply got one with a bad lens. In any case, no thanks, I'll stick with my trusty old camera. I would rather pay for a new SmartMedia card each month.</review_text>
I had this camera for 2 months. It was kept in a case and was very well taken care of. I would not even allow my husband to touch it. I was taking pictures and then one suddenly came out as a white screen. I took another and the same thing. I asked my husband what he thought was wrong. We took out our memory card and tried internal. Same thing again. He said maybe it was the LCD screen. We loaded the pictures in the computer and it was even worse. I contacted Kodak several times. They don't care about their customers. I have talked to several others in similar situations with similar results. We will try to get their attention with a lawsuit. If interested contact me [...</review_text>
I received this as a Christmas present.  This digital camera works fine for still shots, pictures of my family, etc, but for action shots, kids playing outside, basketball games, etc. it is a BIG disappointment.  I took 47 pictures of my son playing basketball in our school gym and only 5 of them were worth keeping. I've taken to several games/activities to try it out. I've tried using the different functions, adjusting the manual setting, and playing with the zoom but nothing has worked.  Many of the shots are blurred, have shadows (because of movement), or are so dark the people can't be seen.  I wish I would have known this before I asked for this camera.</review_text>
If you purchase this lens adapter for the Xacti HD1A, you will not be able to take still photos using the built in flash. The adapter blocks the flash and causes black shadows in the bottom half of your photos</review_text>
I got this lens in a kit with a Nikon D80 camera.  This lens failed to deliver the goods 99% of the time.  Why buy an expensive camera and then use a cheap lens like this?  Its silly to spend big money on the camera and have only blurry pictures to show from it.  It was only tolerable in very bright situations and using less than 100mm focal length.  A cloudly day or all of the 200 mm zoom would result in a picture that had significant distortion noticeable even on little 4x6 prints.  Very few pictures came out when it was used in the fullest zoom (200mm).  I disliked this lens enough to return the entire camera kit and purchase a different camera (D200) that came with the highly ranked 18-200 VR lens from Nikon.If your interested in nice sharp pics, then pass on this lens.  If you want to save a few bucks and like blurry photos, this lens is for you..</review_text>
This adapter vignettes badly at wide-angle settings on my A700, so much sothat the field of view for which there is no vignetting is essentially identicalto that without the adapter at the widest setting of the regular lens.Thus absolutely nothing has been gained by using the adapter. Canon, normally aresponsible firm with many excellent products, is beneath contempt in marketingthis lens.  I called Canon customer service and spoke with a sympatheticrepresentative who took the matter up with "someone else".  The outcome was thatthey admit that there "is very little increase" in the non-vignetted field of viewby using this adapter.  She said she would put my comments on a company-internalproblem compilation called "customer voice".  I can only hope it reaches someonehigh enough to do some good</review_text>
After receiving the case and trying to use it on the camera, I discovered it was very cumbersome and almost impossible to manipulate.  For instance, you cannot access the CF card or camera with the attached portion screwed into the tripod mount, Also, taking the front cover off to take a picture was a hassle.  This is not useable for a carry-around use.I have it sitting in the corner of my office unused, spent good money for nothing.</review_text>
Bought this case along with a Digital Rebel XTi, my first SLR. Instead of the 18-55mm kit lens I opted for the Sigma 17-70mm lens. Sad to say, but the case fits only with the kit lens.. The Rebel XTi with the 17-70mm lens barely fits.So a word of cuation to everyone, if you're planning on anything other than the kit lens, then don't get this</review_text>
This is a poorly designed camera case.  You have to take the camera out of the case completely each time you shoot pictures. I expected the case to remain on the camera body and just uncover the lens so you can shoot. I was very disappointed. This is rather a leather box than a camera case</review_text>
I own many Sony products, including a Sony Cybershot DSC-F717, which I love. However, I am very disappointed by this camera, the Sony Cybershot DSC-T5.I bought the T5 for my mother and father as a present. It is small, lightweight, portable; easy to use; and stylish. It does take nice photos in brightly lit environments, especially outside.However, after several months of use, a few problems have become consistently evident:(1) There is HORRIBLE red-eye (and white-eye) artifact in MANY pictures. The so-called "red-eye reduction" setting does nothing.(2) Dim-light photography is very grainy, with lots of noise. Night-time photography is impossible.These problems are not unique to our camera... You will find many corroborating reviews above.Overall, I am VERY disappointed in this camera, and wish I could exchange it for something else.Do not buy this camera. Other reviewers suggest the T7 or T9 take much better pictures (and they are still small pocket-size cameras).</review_text>
Bought the camera on a recommendation, and also what looked like good specs on the web. Owned it for less than two weeks when the LCD screen cracked (below the surface of the protective cover). Turns out this is a very common problem with these cameras. Panasonic will not warranty fix this! If you do get one, or own one, be very careful not to use the left nav button. If you do, be very careful on the pressure you apply. This is the camera's glass jaw, and you might end up "bricking" a brand new camera. I am replacing mine with a Canon</review_text>
The Panasonic is very compact, very stylish SEXY as my wife called it, but the photos are very disappointing: they are way to noisy! Even if set on the lowest ASA setting at 80ASA it is just barely acceptable and they do get progressively worse anything above 100ASA.The colours are good, and it does take very good videos, but still photos are just plain bad when compared to other cameras in Photoshop CS2. Of course it is easy to understand why: the native resolution of the images. If one investigates such things, will notice that the Panasonic is only 72 dpi, same as Sony's, Canon improves this to 180, and Nikon is at 300 dpi. It is not just about megapixels folks, but how those megapixels are recorded and at what resolution. Obviously a camera with 72 dpi will have more noise than one at 180 or 300 dpi.So before you buy any digital camera or thinking about upgrading to a newer model, do yourself a favour. Try 4 or 5 cameras in the same megapixel range at a good camera store by taking photos of the same subject in the same light condition. Set the camera for the lowest ASA and the highest picture quality in JPG format, take the photos, pop the SD card  into the computer, compare the images in Photoshop. Enlarge to full pixel size (100%), and and look at the meta data at the same time and you will see for yourself. That is what I did, since I was not very happy with the images my Panasonic produced! I had this camera for 11 months and 20 days exactly, and today I traded it in on a Nikon P5000 after evaluating over a dozen models including the Leica D-lux3 10MP camera, and driving the sales persons crazy with all the testing and spending 4 hours at the store, but it was very educational for them too</review_text>
I spend hours pouring over reviews trying to decide which ultracompact was the best deal and the best overall camera.  In the end, it came down to Panasonic's FX01 and Cannon's SD600.  I read the warnings from other reviewers that the Panasonic's images weren't top quality, but I chose to ignore those reviewers because on paper the FX01 looks like it would out perform the SD600.  I was wrong.After using the FX01 for a few days I knew what those other reviewers were talking about - grainy photo after grainy photo.  I really really wanted this camera to be great, but it just wasn't.  Actually, my old 3mp camera took better shots then the 6mp FX01!  Very disappointing.  I ended up returning this camera to Amazon (very easy-great service) because of the poor image quality.  I mean, wanting good photographs is why you take photos, right?  I know someone with the SD600 and he's very happy with the quality.  Judging by the customer images on the SD600's page on amazon, I think I should've gone with Cannon</review_text>
I purchased 2 of these cameras and both of them came with a USB charging cradle that would not work.  This is terrible, terrible quality control and I will never trust another casio product.</review_text>
After discovering that the makers of a great camera would only offer such an inferior case, I did some more looking.  What I ended up with was a Pelican case.  For those not familiar with these cases stop by any camera/photo shop, and they most likely carry them.  They come in many sizes and are simply an airtight, waterproof high impact plastic case with very snug fitting latches.  The inside is solid soft foam that you &quot;pluck&quot; to fit what ever you want to store in the case.  I purchased the 1300 for my Finepix 3800.  The case easily holds the camera, battery charger, mini tripod, and 3 XD cards.  They come in 4 or 5 colors, and can be used for almost anything you want to protect from damage</review_text>
Just turned out ot be more complicated to set up than I wanted. Never used. Returned it</review_text>
use less than 3 times, the touch screen doesn't work.don't know why~</review_text>
I was completely fooled.  Twice.  My fiancee had told me she was getting me socks and underwear for Christmas.  So as I slowly open the box, I see a pair of socks on top.  There was more underneath, so I start opening it further and there is a camera case, a memory card and then finally at the bottom of the box, the HP Photosmart M525 Digital Camera!  I was overjoyed at finally getting a digital camera of my own.  No more borrowing from my sister when I needed to snap a few pictures.  I put the memory card and batteries in and began taking some pictures.  To put it bluntly, UGH!!!  The first thing that I noticed is that, even in best picture mode, the pictures were a little blurry/grainy even in the best of lighting conditions.  The second thing that I noticed is that the pictures are distorted.  There's a slight fisheye effect (Imagine looking through a peep-hole on a door.) which is quite annoying.  I talked to HP Support (Someone who spoke very poor english I might add.  What is the deal with that?) and after about 45 minutes of discussion it was determined that the easiest thing for me to do was to go back to the store and exchange it for the same model.  Guess what?  Same problem!  So after talking to HP once again, I am returning this one and getting a different brand.  This is a horrible product. My sisters Kodak that I bought 3 years ago is a far superior product.  I am very disappointed.  HP needs to put out a better product, and have some customer support reps that speak better english.  It gets frustrating repeating yourself over and over again to be understood</review_text>
The camera is a great camera.it is one of the best kind of camera in its level.Everything is great in that(perfect picture and easy to work) but in that package as I saw in amazon add, the remote suppose to be in the package and comes with it but it won't and there is not remute in that package and it is kind of cheating...be careful about this product if you think whatever has written comes with package but not.</review_text>
As an owner of the Sony DCR-HC30 model DV Handicam, I want to warn everyone about my horrible experience with this product line.  Design and feature-wise, these Handicams are great.  The problem is, they are built like junk.From the day I opened my box, I got a message that told me that the heads were dirty and needed to be cleaned.  In retrospect, I should have returned it for a replacement then and there.  But being a basically optimistic guy, I decided it just got dirty in transit, and I got a head cleaner and cleaned the heads.  It worked fine for about 30 days - just about the amount of time in Sony's crappy labor warranty.  And from that point forward, I have gotten dirty head messages constantly, which at first could be `cleaned away,' but now, even when the message is gone, problems persist.I often get bars across the screen during playback, and I have already determined that I have lost many a precious memory of my infant children.  Sony's solution to this situation is their standard "flat rate" repair program, truly a bargain for $250 or so - more than half what I paid for the camera in the first place.And Sony wonders why their brand value has all but disappeared? They are just another electronics brand now, and one with sub-par quality and service at that.  Guess I'll be buying Samsungs or Canons next time around.Are you listening, Sony?</review_text>
There is currently a known issue with many of the Sony Camcorders.  This is being called the "black screen of death".What happens is that the camera works great for 1-2 years then the CCD goes out like a light.  The camera will not take video again.Sony is evasive if not downright deceitful about this issue when you call tech support.  The fact is Sony does not stand behind their product.  If this happens to you, Sony will not own the defect and you will be out hundreds of dollars.There is a lengthy thread on CNET on this issue.  Search for Sony black screen.Wishing you luck in the purchase of your (not Sony) video camera,Scot</review_text>
If you purchase this wide angle lens adapter for the Xacti HD1A, you will not be able to take still photos using the built in flash. The adapter blocks the flash and causes black shadows in the bottom half of your photos.It does work well for video. The Sanyo Xacti HD1A camera itself is a disappointment</review_text>
I have had this camera for about a year.  It has been nothing but a problem.  First, the kodak easyshare software has continuous problems.  I have spent HOURS trying to fix it.  Still has bugs in it no matter what I do.Secondly, the camera is very unreliable.  I have a wedding to go to this weekend and I do not trust it and am taking a disposable camera too.  How do I explain the problems I have had?  There are so many.  The camera misfunctions continuously.  Sometimes it does nothing at all.  Other times the zoom lense will not shut.  You turn the option selector on and even though it is on the option you select you get another option.  I sometimes can not even shut the camera off I gotta take the batteries out to do so...if I can even find batteries that work in the camera.Honestly, I call tech supoport and told them the problems I have having and they tell me that only Kodak batteries work with the camera and told me to buy some.  SO I went to a nice camera shop and they do not sell kodak batteries.  The camera salesman told me that Kodak cameras are junk and the brand of battery should not matter.  I believe him.  So my camera which would not work...I asked the salesman to help me out.  It did not work with any lithium batteries.....reusable or rechargable. He popped in some alkaline batteries and amazingly it worked.  Well, everyone knows alkaline batteries have a real short short life.  My camera now does not work with either batteries.  Probably only Kodak batteries....maybe....or maybe Kodak wants to get another ten bucks out of me.I personally don't even think the pictures this camera takes are any good.  Really, when people take pictures of me with this camera my eyes are always closed.  I am so anxious to get rid of this camera.....well would be but know I gotta fork over at least $250 on a good camera.  Trying to save money on this 'disposable' camera was a waste.  STAY AWAY FROM KODAK CAMERAS!  If you don't believe me get a creditable camera magazine and read reviews.</review_text>
I bought the 2700 easy share camera and printer dock.  Money thrown away!!  The camera doesn't take quality pictures in my opinion and the printer was junk, also in my opinion. It truly is junk now as I got so frustrated with it, I threw it on the floor and smashed it.  Not kidding! When I first got it,I called Kodak and they told my son( who is knowledgeable in this stuff) how to reset the printer.  We reset it and it worked for awhile.  Then it wouldn't work any more and I did away with it.  No more Kodak for me and my son bought a different brand after he saw how mine worked</review_text>
We never dropped our camera and until now its still looks fresh and new.  And one day, the lens just won't open.  It lights up then after a few seconds, it turns off automatically.  Called a up a Kodak Service center and they gave me a quote for repair.The price they've given me is close to my purchase price here in Amazon!I'll never buy a Kodak camera again until they come up with a good pricing for repairs.  I do believe that all electronic gadgets die at some point.  So I'm expecting a believable quote for repairs.I think Kodak is making expensive disposable digital camera</review_text>
I'm giving this a 2 stars only because my daughter also had this camera onher wish list. If not I would of been upset having recieved the wrong camerathat I ordered.........</review_text>
I made the mistake of selecting the bundle without reading the requirements closely. The lens is for a variety of Canon cameras but the adapter only works with the A6XX series. My adapter arrived and it doesn't work with my camera. Kinda misleading and now I have to spend more to buy the correct adapter separately. Bummer.Also, Captain Jack is correct about the vignetting. This lens is sort of like a magnifying class that sits in front of the built-in zoom lens. If you zoom wide angle, you see the horrible vignetting he mentioned. If you stay zoomed in, it works ok. Disappointing</review_text>
I bought this lens for my Canon PowerShot G5, and because it requires the use of a long adapter, not only does it cause terrible vignetting (that circle the other poster thought was cool, but which is actually a design flaw) unless you zoom most of the way, it blocks the built-in flash. I have owned four Canon cameras over the past 15 years, and the G5 and everything related to it has been a huge disappointment. (I would have bought the digital Rebel when it first came out so I could use my EOS lenses, but it didn't allow flash exposure compensation (insane for a $1000 camera body).)I do not recommend this lens or any of the G-series digital cameras from Canon. When I've got the money I'll be buying the latest digital Rebel and upgrading some of my old EOS lenses, and selling my entire PowerShot kit. If you are an experienced photographer, you will not like this system at all</review_text>
This is a nice looking brown suede camera case.  Based on all the Stylus models listed, I assumed my Olympic Stylus 595 would fit in it but, unfortunately, it does not.</review_text>
I don't know what case others got, some have said "too tight" but mine was very loose. The camera is swimming around in the case, easily half a centimeter of clearance. Not recommended. Just buy the battery and wait for someone to make a good aftermarket case.</review_text>
Rated one star for the lack of value.You can buy the same Canon brand case for under $14 and a higher capacity, IMHO better, albeit non name brand, 1200mAh battery for under $10 from Amazon.  The neck strap is not worth the difference.</review_text>
I feel that it is just way too much money for what you get. I own a lot of professional (Canon) equipment and gladly paid the price because they are the best things out there. But it makes little sense to market a marginal product and still expect to command a high price.I have the S80. No complaint there. The leather case was just way too tight, which invites a fumble as you try to pull out the camera. The flap issue is an issue. The neck chain is a bit short, and similar and better items can be had for a lower price. If you shop around you can also find the Li battery for less.I'm not upset, but just disappointed with what I got for the price</review_text>
This was my second camcorder- after a Canon that lasted 2 years but developed motor noise. This Panasonic literally suddenly died after only 3 MONTHS ( well, 3 months and a week- thereby a week too late for the warranty and a "too bad, so sad" response from panasonic!). I had used it to film a wedding- it had terrible indoor quality and poor sound quality and obviously had a short pathetic lifespan. Do not buy this camera</review_text>
I have one and Panasonic doesn't have driver or processing downloads for it or even respond to requests. The proprietary video format requires special handling in your PC and can leave you with a camera full of useless clips.  Are they abandoning this product? Look on the Panasonic website and see for yourself</review_text>
While the Everio will work on a Mac, it is with JVC's movie program.  It is not iMovie ready.  There is a very strange "work around" involving DVDrop that will make it work.  Not very pleased with what I feel is misleading information about compatibility with Mac</review_text>
I agree with the many other users who have experienced the "Condensation, Operation Paused" defect on their JVC GR-xxxx. Despite numerous others reporting this problem, JVC says its not a recognized problem. I would disagree - it is a recognized problem, but its your problem, not theirs.</review_text>
I bought this to replace my broken Digital8 Sony camcorder and the same sales guy who sold me the Sony 6 years ago advised me to buy this JVC, on one single criterion: the near-infinite hard disk drive storage. This was almost the only claim that was actually fulfilled.Summary: infinite recording time, disappointing image quality and control for the price, painful editing. Not for the average iMovie user.Positive points:- the storage capacity: a dream. I thought that 7 hours of high-quality video would barely last two weeks of vacation. Actually it took me months to fill them. Mostly because, as with digital cameras, you can throw away all the bad takes at will. I decided I'd keep all my previous good takes until I really would need the space, well... I still have my best clips from 5 months ago in the camcorder, which means that I can always show them at friends and family on location, even if I don't have my computer or DVD copies on me.- the size, weight and shape: perfect. You can take this camcorder anywhere without facing hard packing decisions. It's small, feels rather rugged. I added a wide-angle lens and the bigger optional battery, which makes the camera 50% bulkier but still manageable. The shape is great, at least for my hand size. I can really grab the camera properly in various situations of verticality and bumpiness... The microphones are not that well placed though, and I often cover them with my fingers.- image stabilization: very good. By chance I shot a clip with my wide-angle lens in the way, which gave me a good fixed reference to see how the beast is fast and smooth at correcting unwanted shakiness.- ease of connection: the USB2 link is OK. I'd have preferred firewire, but here we are not dealing with video streams but video files. BTW, this allows faster-than-real-time transfer. A firewire link with the camcorder acting as a hard disk would have been great...OK points: user interface, reaction time (even if it takes a long time to get ready), optics, battery life (with the 3 hour batt. - actually a 1.5 hours).Negative points :- Image quality: considering the price, image quality is disappointing. Frankly. The viewfinder is flattering but color saturation is in fact low, and clips shot on sunny days seem sadder than they are as I found out after shooting for a whole week in Yucatan. Clips shot on my digital camera (Canon IXUS 60)  look better. There is also a lack of control on image quality.- Digital camera: simply forget it. My phone takes better pictures. I'd advise you to buy a 2Mpix+ cellphone and enjoy the benefit of sending your pics and videos immediately to far-away family and pals.- File transfer and editing: pretty horrible with the originally supplied software. In marketing copy, MPEG2 files might seem nice as a target format, but we always have to edit our videos, and this is quite painful, whatever power-users might tell you. You are in for hours of conversion, except if you burn your raw takes, at the risk of boring your audience.I was going to write "don't buy this if you are a Mac user". This is NOT iMovie ready. I have both PCs and Macs, it's equally painful and disappointing, except if you buy yourself a real video editing suite.Still, if you have a Mac and an Everio get yourself the wonderful MPEG Streamclip free utility from Squared 5. It allows batch conversion of the Everio .MOD files into useable formats. You'll have to buy the MPEG2 component from Apple first and change the .MOD extensions to .MPG prior to conversions. Time- and disk-space-consuming but worth it, as the image quality is superior to the one generated by the JVC-supplied software.Neat thing: leave your computer at homeThough you can't use the camcorder as an external hard disk (it is write-protected) you can copy the photographs from the SD card to the hard-disk, which means that with the Everio, you wont need to bring your computer on a trip just to store the pictures from your digital camera.Conclusion: given the choice, I won't buy this camcorder, mainly for the below-par image quality, as I'm ready to cope with the complications of conversion and editing. But I'd seriously miss the storage capacity</review_text>
This is a good charger - quick and portable.  But the battery life of the battery SUCKS!</review_text>
I got this charger with my SD110, and within a few months, it stopped working; it was obviously a battery problem. The battery isn't the best quality either, but when I got a new one, the problem persisted. So obviously it's the charger.</review_text>
I bought this camera 3 months ago and have used it a few times. Last week all of a sudden the pictures look out of focus and over-exposed. I haven't changed anything or done anything. I have no idea what's wrong with the camera, but given the price I'm pretty annoyed and Amazon.com will not refund my money because it has been over 30 days</review_text>
It sounds like a good system if it worked. You cannot use this system or the indoor camera if you or your neighbors within 300 feet have: a wireless computer network, or a cordless phone (2.4 GHz), or a microwave that is running. I'm not kidding - I can't believe this even passed testing. I think MobiCam has a newer system that you should investigate owning. Those have lots of reviews. Pay attention to them</review_text>
The first day I took them out to hunt with them they fogged over.  I brought them home and there is fog INSIDE.  Also inside is some dark crap that you cannot get to...and it is on the lens.  I called Bushnell's help line and they told me..."Well, it isn't internally fog proof, just externally"  When asked about the stuff on the inside.  "That is probably fungus, that sometimes happens"  I JUST BOUGHT THE BINOCULARS!!!  He stated I could send them in and miss my entire hunting season and they would take the fungus out.AVOID THESE AT ALL COSTS!!!  They are a shoddy product with an even worse strap that is plastic and cuts into your neck</review_text>
I read other review, and decided to give it a try. As soon as I recieve it in the mail, and opened the box, I realized this was a mistake. CHEAP quality Binocular with "high power" being a selling point. It came in already broken with two eye ruber pieces falling apart. you can see how the cheap glue was being used to put it in place! It is extremly heavy to hold in hands for more than one minute for nature observation. You will be CONSTANTLY ajdusting the focus. Your fingers bumps with focus bar while you are holding it. Indeed Strap, Case, Lense protectors are all cheap crap, and annoying to have it all ON~! I am taking this back, and buying MADE IN JAPAN "NIKON EAGLE VIEW" 100 times BETTER. YOU GET WHAT YOU PAY FOR~!!!!!</review_text>
Decent camera, but not great.  Shark mode is nice.  Housing looks good, but mine leaked at ~20 ft...camera was dead by the time I got it out of the water.  Good news is that Amazon processed the defective product return rapidly and credited my account in about a week.  Net result was one decent picture and a disappointing Christmas present.  Next time I will buy a housing for a better camera.  Canon has some nice ones</review_text>
If you are going to lay out $500 for a camera, you should expect a fair amount of camera.However, I have a few gripes here.  First, there is no remote control for it which makes setting up a shot tough.  All the Nikons in the D series can use a wireless remote.  You can buy an underwater case for those magnificent Nikons so you can shoot underwater.  You can get over 10 megapixels in a D80, or D200 and you get that great Nikkor lens.  You don't get much of a lens on the DC500, and 5 megapixels don't get you very far when it comes to printing and publication quality images.  Lets face it: this is an expensive point-n-shoot camera for a tourist, not a serious camera.Nuff said.-</review_text>
The first day I took them out to hunt with them they fogged over.  I brought them home and there is fog INSIDE.  Also inside is some dark crap that you cannot get to...and it is on the lens.  I called Bushnell's help line and they told me..."Well, it isn't internally fog proof, just externally"  When asked about the stuff on the inside.  "That is probably fungus, that sometimes happens"  I JUST BOUGHT THE BINOCULARS!!!  He stated I could send them in and miss my entire hunting season and they would take the fungus out.AVOID THESE AT ALL COSTS!!!  They are a shoddy product with an even worse strap that is plastic and cuts into your neck</review_text>
I read other review, and decided to give it a try. As soon as I recieve it in the mail, and opened the box, I realized this was a mistake. CHEAP quality Binocular with "high power" being a selling point. It came in already broken with two eye ruber pieces falling apart. you can see how the cheap glue was being used to put it in place! It is extremly heavy to hold in hands for more than one minute for nature observation. You will be CONSTANTLY ajdusting the focus. Your fingers bumps with focus bar while you are holding it. Indeed Strap, Case, Lense protectors are all cheap crap, and annoying to have it all ON~! I am taking this back, and buying MADE IN JAPAN "NIKON EAGLE VIEW" 100 times BETTER. YOU GET WHAT YOU PAY FOR~!!!!!</review_text>
Sure my Canon sd-30 is super cute and I get lots of compliments on how small and sexy it is, but heaven forbid you want to take pictures with it!!This camera cannot take pictures in low light AT ALL!  Every picture I've taken at parties has been out of focus, which adds up to a lot of hazy photos of great memories.  I took it back to the camera shop and the guy said I had the setting right but "yeah, they don't work well in low light."  Well if I needed a bright sunny day for every shot I could make a pinhole camera out of a cardboard box!The pictures it takes in daylight are nice.  But anyone who wants a tiny little camera like this is planning on putting it in their pocket and taking it to parties!I got the Sony Cybershot 10.1 and it takes GREAT pictures in low light.   Later, Canon.</review_text>
If you like to take pictures with macro lense, it sucks. I've had many canon cameras and this one takes the the prize for worst quality. If you get closer than five inches, the pictures messes up.I've had no other problem with the hardware, though I hate carrying around that dock and it's odd shaped charger. No other charger cable in the world is going to fit! So loose it and you're screwed.oh, and night photos also suck. BIG TIME, even with the flash on</review_text>
Bag is ok but you must be careful if your moving around a lot. With extra batteries in the top zip compartment it is really top heavy and tips upside down while on your shoulder if the camera is out of it. The velcro does not  hold it closed well either. My memory card fell out of the bag during one of these episodes , Thank goodness my husband noticed</review_text>
I have an Olympus FE 100 camera and the battery did NOT fit!  My niece has an Olympus FE 140 camera and the battery did NOT fit in hers either!  The company does not accept returns on batteries that are opened so I was just out of luck</review_text>
This camcorder is terrible in just about every way:Cons:- Unacceptably blurry video; the specs say it records at 640x480, but it looks more like 320x240 (if that!) blown up to VGA.- Noticeable aura around any dark shape on a lighter background.- Awful light sensitivity; forget about recording indoors--no matter how brightly the room is lit, faces will come out too dark.  The built-in LED's don't help much (and not at all at distances over 4 feet from the subject).- Noisy zoom that gets picked up loud and clear by the microphone.- Zooming goes in irregular steps--completely useless while recording.- Video lags noticeably behind camera movement; when image stabilization is turned on, the lag becomes so atrocious that you can't tell when to stop panning--UTTERLY USELESS!- When using AV-in and AV-out cables, the firmware has frozen on me a couple of times; the only way to reset the camera was to remove the battery.- Video encoding (through the AV-in cable) produces an unacceptably noisy and undersaturated result.- The LCD display has a very narrow viewing angle; anything more than about 10% and you can't make out a thing.- Still photos taken at the native 5MP resolution come out strangely grainy and uneven--something like a "sharpen" effect gone wrong.  I can get better looking pictures with my 2MP Canon Powershot A40 camera.- The manual recommends keeping the camera motionless for 2-3 seconds AFTER snapping a picture (that's on top of the 3-4 seconds it takes the thing to focus BEFORE it snaps); but you can't keep THE SUBJECT from moving, folks!  Welcome to the psychedelic land of image trails...- Flash photos come out with wildly different color balance depending on the color of the background.- The manual is a sorry affair--only 17 pages long and doesn't go much beyond identifying external controls and menu options.- I could go on and on, but I'll stop now, as you probably get the picture...Pros:- The camera body seems sturdily built; the controls also have a sturdy feel to them, as do the battery and the USB port covers.  Hmm... it's the only nice thing I can think to say about it.Maybe a child (think pre-teen) could find this "camcorder" exciting as a toy, but I don't see how it can be enough even for an undemanding person looking to capture occasional life's moments on video</review_text>
Poor focus, blurry, awful optics. Don't waste your time with this one! Can't compare to the little PURE DIGITAL camcorder that this device was to replace because of its additional features.</review_text>
